This is someway my story. A great fun, inspirational One!
Before you begin this book, I have a small request. Right here, note down three
things. Write down something that
i) you fear,
ii) makes you angry and
iii) you don’t like about yourself.
 Be honest, and write something that is meaningful to you.
Do not think too much about why I am asking you to do this. Just do it.
One thing I fear:
__________________________________
One thing that makes me angry:
__________________________________
One thing I do not like about myself:
__________________________________
Okay, now forget about this exercise and enjoy the story.
Have you done it?
If not, please do. It will enrich your experience of reading this book.
If yes, thanks Sorry for doubting you. Please forget about the exercise, my doubting
you and enjoy the story.
PROLOGUE
_____________
The night train ride from Kanpur to Delhi was the most memorable
journey of my life. For one, it gave me my second book. And two, it is not
every day you sit in an empty compartment and a young, pretty girl walks in.
Yes, you see it in the movies, you hear about it from friend’s friend but
it never happens to you. When I was younger, I used to look at the reservation
chart stuck outside my train bogie to check out all the female passengers near
my seat (F-17 to F-25)is what I’d look for most). Yet, it never happened. In
most cases I shard my compartment with talkative aunties, snoring men and
wailing infants.
But this night was different. First, my compartment was empty. The
Railways bad just started this new summer train and nobody knew about it.
Second, I was unable to sleep.
I had been to IIT Kanpur for a talk. Before leaving, I drank four cups of
coffee in the canteen while chatting with students. Bad idea, given that it was
going to be boring to spend eight insomniac hours in an empty compartment. I
had no magazines or books to read. I could hardly see anything out of the
window in the darkness. I prepared myself for a silent and dull night. It was
anything but that.
She walked in five minutes after the train bad left the station. She
opened the curtain of my enclosure and looked puzzled.
‘Is coach A4, seat 63 here?’ she said.
The yellow light bulb in my compartment was a moody one. It flickered
as I looked up at her.
‘Hub…’ I said when I saw her face. It was difficult to withdraw from the
gaze of her eyes.
‘Actually it is. My seat is right in front of you,’ she answered her own
question and heaved her heavy suitcase onto the upper berth. She sat down
on the berth opposite me, and gave out a sigh of relief.
‘I climbed onto the wrong coach. Luckily the bogies are connected,’ she
said, adjusting her long hair that ended n countless ringlets. From the corner
of my eye I tried to look at her. She was young, perhaps early to midtwenties.
Her waist-length hair had a life of its own: a strand fell on her
forehead repeatedly. I could no see her face clearly, but I could tell one thing
—she was pretty. And her eyes—once you looked into them, you could not
turn away. I kept my gaze down.
She re-arranged stuff in her handbag. I tried to look out of the window.
It was completely dark.
‘So, pretty empty train,’ she said after ten minutes.
‘Yes,’ I said. ‘It’s the new holiday special. They just started it, without
telling people about it.’
‘No wonder. Otherwise, trains are always full at this time.’
‘It will get full. Don’t worry. Just give it a few days,’ I said ad leaned
forward, ‘Hi. I am Chetan by the way, Chetan Bhagat.’
“Hi,’ she said and looked at me for a few seconds. ‘Chetan…I don’t
know, your name sounds familiar.’
Now this was cool. It meant she had heard of my first book. I am
recognized rarely. And of course, it had never happened with a girl on a night
train.
‘You might have heard of my book, Five Point Someone. I’m the
author,’ I said.
‘Oh yes,’ she said and paused. ‘Oh yes, of course. I’ve read your book.
The three underperformers and the prof’s daughter one, right?’ she said.
‘Yes. So how did you like it?’
‘It was all right.’
I was taken aback. Man, I could have done with a little more of a
compliment here.
‘Just all right?’ I said, fishing a bit too obviously.
‘Well…’ she said and paused.
‘Well what?’ I said after ten seconds.
‘Well. Yeah, just all right… okay okay types,’ she said.
I kept quiet. She noticed the expression of mild disappointment on my
face.
‘Anyways, nice to meet you Chetan. Where are you coming from? IIT
Kanpur?’
‘Yes,’ I said, my voice less friendly than a few moments ago. ‘I had to
give a talk there.’
‘Oh really? About what?’
‘About my book—you know the just okay-okay type one. Some people do
want to hear about it,’ I said, keeping a sweet tone to sugarcoat my sarcasmfilled
words.
‘Interesting,’ she said and turned quite again.
I was quite too. I didn’t want to speak to her anymore. I wanted my
empty compartment back.
The flickering yellow light above was irritating me. I wondered if I
should just shut it off, but it was not that Late yet.
‘What’s the next station? Is it a non-stop train?’ she asked after five
minutes, obviously to make conversation.
‘I don’t know,’ I said and turned to look out of the window again even
though I couldn’t see anything in the darkness.
‘Is everything okay?’ she asked softly.
‘Yes, why?’ I sad, the tone of my ‘why’ giving away that everything was,
in fact, not okay.
‘Nothing. You’ve upset about what I said about your book right?’
‘Not really,’ I said.
She laughed. I looked at her. Just like her gaze, her smile was arresting
too. I knew she was laughing at me, but I wanted her to keep smiling. I
dragged my eyes away again.
‘Listen. I know your book did well. You are like this youth writer and
everything. But at one level… just forget it.’
‘What?’ I said.
‘At one level, you are hardly a youth writer.’
I turned silent and looked at her for a few seconds. Her magnetic eyes
had a soft but insistent gaze.
‘I thought I wrote a book about college kids. That isn’t youth?’ I said.
‘Yeah right. So you wrote a book on IIT. A place where so few people
get to go. You think that represents the entire youth? She asked and took out
a box of mints from her bag. She offered me one, but I declined. I wanted to
get this straight.
‘So what are you trying to say? I had to start somewhere, so I wrote
about my college experiences. And you know the story is not so IIT-specific. It
could have happened anywhere. I mean, just for that you are trashing my
book.’
‘I am not trashing it. I am just saying it hardly represents the Indian
youth,’ she said and shut the box of mints.
‘Oh really… ‘I began, but was interrupted by the noise as the train
passed over a long bridge.
We didn’t speak for the next three minutes, until the train had returned
to smoother tracks.
“what represents the youth?’ I said.
“I don’t know. You’re the writer. You figure it out,’ she said, and
brushed aside a few curls that had fallen on her forehead.
‘That’s not fair,’ I said, ‘that is so not fair.’ I sounded like a five-yearold
throwing a tantrum. She smiled as she saw me grumbling to myself. A few
seconds later, she spoke again.
‘Are you going to write more books?’ she said.
‘I’ll try to,’ I said. I wasn’t sure if ever wanted to talk to her again.
‘So what is it going to be? IIMs this time?’ she said.
‘No.’
‘Why not?’
‘Because it does not represent the country’s youth.’
She stared laughing.
‘See, I am taking feedback. And now you laugh at me,’ I said.
‘No, no, she said. ‘I am not laughing at you. Can you stop being so oversensitive?’
‘I am not over-sensitive. I just want to take feedback,’ I said and turned
my face away.
‘Well, well now. Let me explain. See, I just felt the whole IITian thing is
cool and all, but what does it all mean in the broader sense? Yes, the book
sells and you get to go to IIT Kanpur. But is that what it is all about?’ she said.
“Well, then what is it about?’
‘If you want to write the youth, shouldn’t you talk about young people
who really face challenges? I mean yes, IITians face challenges, but what
about the hundred and thousand of others/’
‘Like whom?’
‘Just look around you. What is the biggest segment of your facing
challenges in modern India?’
‘I don’t know. Student?’
‘Not those, Mr. Writer. Get out of the student-campus of your first book
now. Anything else you see that you find strange and interesting? I mean,
what is the subject of your second novel?’
I turned to look at her carefully for the first time. Maybe it was the time
of night, but I kid you not, she was one of the most beautiful women I had
ever seen. Everything about her was perfect. Her face was like that of a child.
She wore a bindi, which was hard to focus on as her eyes came in the way.
I tried to focus on her question.
‘second novel? No, haven’t though of a subject yet,’ I said.
‘Really? Don’t you have any ideas?’
‘I do. But nothing I am sure about.’
‘Inte…resting, she drawled.’ Well, just bask in your first book success
then.’
We kept quiet for the next half an hour. I took out the contents of my
overnight bag and rearranged them for no particular reason. I wondered if it
even made sense to change into a night suit. I was not going to fall asleep
anyway. Another train noisily trundled past us in the opposite direction,
leaving silence behind.
‘I might have a story ides for you,’ she said, startling me.
‘Huh?’ I was wary of what she was going to say. For no matter what her
idea was, I had to appear interested.
‘What is it?’
‘It is a story about a call center.’
‘Really?’ I said. ‘Call centers as in business process outsourcing centers
or BPOs?’
“Yes, do you know anything about them?’
I thought about it. I did know about call centers, mostly from my cousins
who worked there.
“Yes, I know a little bit,’ I said. ‘Some 300,000 people work in the
industry. They help US companies in the sales, service and maintenance of
their operations. Usually younger people work there in night shifts. Quite
interesting, actually.’
‘Just interesting? Have you ever thought of what all they have to face?’
she asked, her voice turning firm again.
“Uh, not really…’ I said.
‘Why? They aren’t the youth? You don’t want to write about them?’ she
said, almost scolding me.
‘Listen, let’s not start arguing again…’
‘I’m not arguing. I told you that I have a call center story for you.’
I looked at my watch. It was 12.30 a.m. A story would not be such a bad
ides to kill time, I thought.
‘Let’s hear it then, I said.
‘I’ll tell you. But I have a condition,’ she said.
‘Condition?’ I was intrigued. ‘What? That I don’t tell it to anyone else?’ I
asked.
‘No. Just the opposite in fact. You have to promise me to writ it as your
second book.’
‘What I said, almost falling from my seat.
Wow! Now that was something. Okay, so I meet a girl who appears
interesting and has a nice pair of eyes and looks like she can tell me a story to
kill time. However, it does not mean I will spend two years of my life turning
it into a book.
‘Like a full book? Are you kidding? I can’t promise that. It’s a lot of
work,’ I said.
‘Up to you,’ she said and turned silent.
I waited for ten seconds. She did not speak.
‘Can’t I decide after you tell me the story?’ I said. ‘If it is interesting, I
may even do it. But how can I decide without listening to it?’
‘No. it is most about choice. If I tell you, you have to write it,’ she said.
‘A whole book…?’ I asked again.
‘Yes. Like it’s your own story. In first person—just like in your first
book. I’ll give you the contacts of the people in the story. You can meet them,
do your research, whatever it takes, but make it your second book.’
‘Well then, I think it’s better if you don’t tell me,’ I said on her berth,
and then arranged her pillow and blanket. I guesses she was planning to go to
sleep.
I checked my watch again. It was 1:00 a.m., and I was still wide awake.
This was a non-stop train, and there were no stations to look forward to until
Delhi in the morning. She switched off the flickering yellow light. Now the
only light in the compartment was an errie blue one; I couldn’t figure out
where the bulb was. It felt strange, like we were the only two people in the
universe.
As she was sliding under her blanket, I asked, ‘What is the story about?
At least tell me a little bit more.’
‘Will you do it then?’
I shrugged in the semi-darkness. ‘Can’t say. Don’t tell me the story yet
—just tell me what it is about.’
She nodded and sat up. Folding her legs beneath her, she began talking.
‘All right, she said, ‘It is a story about six people in a call center as one
night.’
‘Just one night? Like this one?’ I interrupted.
‘Yes, one night. One night at the call center.’
‘You sure that can be a full book? I mean, what is so special about this
night?’
She heaved a sigh and took a sip from her bottle of mineral water.
‘You see,’ she said, ‘it wasn’t like any other night. It was the night
there was a phone call.’
‘What?’ I said and burst out laughing. ‘So a call center gets a phone cal.
That is the special part?’
She did no smile back. She waited fro me to stop laughing and then
continued as if I hadn’t said anything. ‘You see, it wasn’t an ordinary phone
call. It was the night…it was the night there was a phone call from God.’
Her words had me spring to attention.
‘What?’
‘You heard me. That night there was a phone call from God,’ she said.
‘What exactly are you talking about?’
‘I just told you what the story was about. You asked, remember?’ she
said.
‘And then… how… I mean…’
‘I’m not telling you anymore. Now you know what it’s about, if you want
to hear the story, you know my condition.’
‘That is a tough condition,’ I said.
‘I know. Up to you,’ she said and lifted her blanket again. She lay down
and closed her eyes.
Six people. One night, call center. Call from God. The phrases kept
repeating in my head as another hour passed. At 2:00 a.m. she woke up to
have a sip of water.
‘Not sleeping?’ she asked, with eyes only half open.
Maybe there was a voltage problem, but this time even the blue light in
the compartment started flickering.
‘No, not sleepy at all, I said.
‘Okay, goodnight anyway, she said, and began to lie down again.
‘Listen,’ I said. Got up. Sit down again.’
‘Huh?’ she said, rubbing her eyes. ‘Why? What happened?’
‘Nothing. You tell me what happened. Tell me the story’ I said.
‘So you will write it?’
‘Yes,’ I said, with a bit of hesitation.
‘Good,’ she said, and sat up again. The cross-legged position was back.
The rest of the night, she told me the story that begins from the next
page. It is a story about six people, three guys and three girls who worked as
the Connexions Call Center. I choose to tell the story through Shyam’s eyes.
This is because, after I met him, I found him the most similar to me as a
person. The rest of the people and what happened tat night—well, I will let
Shyam tell you that.
FROM #29
Otherwise? Esha Said.
‘Otherwise we die,’ Vroom said.
We stayed quiet for a minute.
‘Everyone dies one day,’ I said, just to break the silence.
‘Maybe it is simpler this way. Just end life rather than deal with it,’
Vroom said.
I nodded. I was nervous and I was glad Vroom was making small talk.
‘My main question is– what if no one finds us even after we die. What
happens then?’ Vroom said.
‘The vultures will find us. They always do. I saw it on Discovery
Channel,’ I said.
‘See, that makes me uncomfortable. I don’t like the idea of sharp beaks
rearing my muscles, cracking my bones and ripping me to shreds. Plus, my
body will be smelling like hell. I’d rather be burnt in a dignified manner and
go up in that one last ultimate puff of smoke.’
‘Can you guys stop this nonsense? At least be silent,’ Esha said and
folded her arms.
Vroom smiled at her. Then he turned to me. “I don’t thinking Esha will
smell too much. Her Calvin Klein perfume will keep her carcass fresh for
days.’
#1
I was splashing my hands in the water pointlessly in the sea. I can’t even
swim in a pond, let alone in the Indian Ocean. I was in the water while my
boss Bakshi was in a boat next to me. He was pushing my head down in the
water. I saw Priyanka drifting away in a lifeboat. I screamed even as Bakshi
used both his hands to keep my head submerged. Salt water filled my mouth
and nostrils as I heard loud beeps at a distance.
My nightmare ended as my cell phone alarm rang hard in my left ear and
I woke up to its Last Christmas ring tone. The ring tone was a gift from
Shefali, my new semi-girlfriend. I squinted through a half-shut eye and lifted
on the screen.
‘Damn,’ I said and jumped out of bed.
I would have loved to analyze my dream and its significance in my
insignificant life, but I had to get dressed for work.
‘Man, the Qualis will be here in twenty minutes,’ I thought, digging
matter out of my eye. I was still tired, but scared to sleep more because I was
getting late. Besides, there was a serious risk of Bakshi making a comeback in
my dreams.
By the way, hi. I am Shyam Mehra, or Sam Marcy as they call me at my
workplace, the Connexions call center in Gurgaon. (American tongues have
trouble saying my real name and prefer Sam. If you want, you can give me
another name too. I really don’t care.)
Anyway, I am a call center agent. There was hundred of thousands,
probably millions of agents like me. But this total pain-in-the neck author
chose me, of all the agents in the country. He met me and told me to help
with his second book. In fact, he near as well wanted me to write the book for
him. I declined, saying I can’t even write my resume or even other simple
things in life, there is no way I can write a whole damn book. I explained to
him how my promotion to the position of team leader had been put off for
one year because my manager Bakshi had told me I don’t have the ‘required
skill-set’s yet. In my review, Bakshi wrote that I was ‘not a go-getter’. (I don’t
even know what ‘go-getter’ means, so I guess I’m not one for sure.)
But this author said he didn’t care—he had promised someone he’d do
this story so I’d better cooperate, otherwise he would keep pestering me. I
tried my best to wriggle out of it, but he wouldn’t let go of me. I finally
relented and that’s why I’m stuck with this assignment, while you are stuck
with me.
I also want to give you one more warning. My English is not that great—
actually, nothing about me is great. So, if you are looking for something posh
and highbrow, then I’d suggest you read another book which has some big
many-syllabus words. I know only one big, many-syllable word, and I hate that
word—‘management’. But we’ll get to that later. I told the author about my
limited English. However, the pain-in-the-neck author said big emotions do
not come from big words. So, I had no choice but to do the job. I hate
authors. For now, let us go back to the story. If you remember, I had just
woken up at my home.
There were noises in the living room. Some relatives were in town to
attend a family wedding. My neighbor was getting married to his cousin…er
sorry, I was too groggy to figure this out—no, my cousin was getting married to
his neighbor. But I had to work, so I could not go to the wedding. It doesn’t
matter, all marriages are the same, more or less.
I reached the bathroom still half-asleep, it was already occupied.
The bathroom door was open. I saw five of my aunts scrambling to get a
few square-inches of the wash-basin mirror. One aunt was cursing her
daughter for leaving the matching bindis at home. Another aunt had lost the
little screw of her gold earring and was flipping out.
‘It is pure gold, where is it?’ she screamed into my face. ‘Has the maid
stolen it?’ like the maid had nothing better to do then steal one tiny screw.
Wouldn’t she steal the whole set? I thought.
‘Auntie, can I use the bathroom for five minutes. I need to get ready for
office,’ I said.
‘Oh hello, Shyam. Woke up finally?’ my mother’s sister said. ‘Office?
You are not coming for the wedding?’
‘No, I have to work. Can I have the bath…’
‘Look how big Shyam has become,’ my maternal aunt said. ‘We need to
find a girl for him soon.’
Everyone burst into giggles. It was their biggest joke of the day.
‘Can I please…’ I said.
‘Shyam, leave the ladies alone,’ one of my older cousins interrupted.
‘What are you doing here with the women? We are already so late for the
wedding’
‘But I have to go to work. I need to get dressed,’ I protested, trying to
elbow my way to the bathroom tap.
‘You work in a call center, right? My cousin said.
‘Yes.’
‘Your work is through the phone. Why do you need to dress up? Who is
going to see you?’
I didn’t answer.
‘Use the kitchen sink,’ an aunt suggested and handed me my
toothbrush.
I gave them all a dirty look. Nobody noticed. I passed by the living room
on my way to the kitchen. The uncles were outside, on their second whiskey
and soda. One uncle said something about how it would be better if my father
were still alive and around this evening.
I reached the kitchen. The floor was so cold I felt I had stepped on an
ice tray. I realized I had forgotten soap. I went back but the bathroom door
was bolted. There was no hot water in the kitchen, and my face froze as I
washed it with cold water. Winter in Delhi is a bitch. I brushed my teeth and
used the steel plates as a mirror to comb my hair. Shyam had turned into Sam
and Sam’s day had just begun.
I was hungry, but there was nothing to eat in the house. Because they’d
be getting food at the wedding, my mother had felt there was no need to cook
at home.
The Qualis horn screamed at 8.55 p.m.
As I was about to leave, I realized I had forgotten my ID. I went to my
room, but could not find it. I tried to find my mother instead. She was in her
bedroom, lost in more aunties, saris and jewellery sets. She and my aunts
were doing some major weight comparisons of which aunt’s set was heaviest.
Usually the heaviest aunt had the heaviest set.
‘Mom, have you seen my ID?’ I said. Everyone ignored me. I went back
to my room as the Qualis honked for the fourth time.
‘Damn, there it is,’ I said as I finally located the ID under my bed. I
pulled it out by its strap and strung it around my neck.
I waved a goodbye to everyone, but no on acknowledged me. It wasn’t
surprising, I am only cared for so much. Every cousin of mine is becoming a
doctor or engineer. You can say I am the black sheep of my family. Though I
do not think that I expression is correct. After all, what’s wrong with black
sheep—don’t people wear black sweaters? But you get an idea of my status in
my clan. In fact, the only reason people somewhat talk to me is I have a job
and get a salary at the end of the month. You see, I used to work in the
website department of an ad agency before this call center job. However, the
ad agency paid horrible money. Also, all the people there were pseudos, more
interested in office politics than websites. I quit, and all hell broke loose at
home. That is when the black sheep term was tagged onto me. I saved myself
by joining Connexions, as with money in your wallet the world gives you some
respect and lets Priyanka worked there. Of course, that reason was no longer
relevant.
My aunt finally found the gold screw tapped in her fake hair bun.
The Qualis horn screamed again, this time in an agency tone.
‘I’m coming,’ I shouted as I ran out of the house.
#2
‘What sahib. Late again?’ The driver said as I took the front seat.
‘Sorry, sorry. Military Uncle’s place first?’ I panted to the driver.
‘Yes,’ he replied, looking at his watch.
‘Can we reach the call center by 10:00 p.m.? I have to meet someone
before their shift ends,’ I said.
‘Depends if your colleagues come on time,’ the driver replied
laconically as he drove towards Military Uncle’s house. ‘Anyway, let’s pick up
the old man first.’
Military Uncle hates it if we are late. I prepared myself for some dirty
looks. His tough manner comes from the Army background, from which he
retired a few years ago. A fifty plus, he is the oldest person in the call center.
I do not know him well, and I won’t talk about him much. But I do know that
he used to stay with his son and daughter-in-law before he moved one (read—
thrown out) to be on his own. The pension was meager, and he tried to
supplement his income by working in the call center. However, he hates to
talk and is not a voice agent. He sits on the solitary online chat and email
station. Even though he sits in our room, his desk is at a far corner near the
fax machine. He rarely speaks more than three words at a time. Most of his
interactions with us are limited to giving us condescending you-young-people
glances.
The Qualis stopped outside Uncle’s house. He was waiting at the
entrance.
‘Late?’ Uncle said, looking at the driver.
Without answering, the driver got out to open the Qualis back door.
Uncle climbed in, ignored the middle seat and sat at the back. He probably
wanted to sit as far away from me as possible.
Uncle gave me an it-must-be-your-fault look. Older people think they
have a natural right to judge you. I looked away. The driver took a U-turn to
go to Radhika’s house.
One of the unique features about my team is that we not only work
together, we also share the same Qualis. Through a bit of route planning and
driver persuasion, we ensured that my Western Appliances Strategic Group all
came and left together. There are six of us: Military Uncle, Radhika, Esha,
Vroom, Priyanka and me.
The Qualis moved to Radhika Jha, or agent Regina Jones’s house. As
usual, Radhika was late.
‘Radhika madam is too much,’ the driver said, continuously pressing the
horn. I looked at my watch anxiously. I didn’t want Shefali to throw a
tantrum.
Six minutes later Radhika came running towards us, clutching the ends
of her maroon shawl in her right hand.
‘Sorry, sorry sorry…’ she said a dozen times before we could say
anything.
‘What?’ I asked her as the Qualis moved again.
‘Nothing. Almost milk for mom-in-law. Took longer to crush the
almonds,’ she said, learning back exhausted in her seat. She had taken the
middle seat.
‘Ask mom-in-law to make her own milk,’ I suggested.
‘C’mon Shyam,’ she said, ‘she’s so old, it is the least I can do, especially
when her son is not here.’
‘Yeah right,’ I shrugged. ‘Just that and cooking three meals a day and
household chores and working all night and…’
‘Shh…’ she said,’forge all that. Any news on the call centre? I’m scared.’
‘Nothing new from what Vroom told me. We have to new orders, call
volumes are at an all time low— Connexions is doomed. Just a question of
when,’ I said.
‘Really?’ her eyes widened.
It was true. You might have heard of those swanky, new-age call centers
where everything is hunky-dory, clients are plenty and agents get
aromatherapy massage. Well, our Connexions was not one of them. We live
off one and only one client—Western Computers and Appliances. And even
their call flow had dwindled. Rumors that the call center would collapse
floated in every day.
‘You thing Connexions will close down? Like forever?’ Radhika asked.
Uncle raised an eyebrow to look at us, but soon went back to brooding
by himself in the back seat. I sometimes wished he would say more, but I
guess it’s better for people to shut up rather than say something nasty.
‘That, or they will do major job cuts. Ask Vroom.’ I said.
The Qualis moved painfully slow as it was a heavy wedding date in Delhi.
On every street, there was a wedding procession. We edged forward as the
driver dodged several fat grooms on their own-burdened horses. I checked the
time again. Shefali would do some serious sulking today.
‘I need this job. Anuj and I need to save.’ Radhika said, more to herself.
Anuj was Radhika’s husband. She married him three years ago after a
whirlwind courtship in college. She now lived in a joint family with Anuj’s
ultra-traditional parents. It was tough for daddy’s only girl, but it’s amazing
what people do for love.
The driver drove to Esha Singh’s (agent Eliza Singer’s) place next. She
was already outside her house. The driver kept the Qualis ignition on as he
opened the back door.
Esha entered the Qualis and the smell of expensive perfume filled the
vehicle. She sat next to Radhika in the middle row and removed her suede
jacket.
‘Mmm…nice. What is it?’ Radhika said.
‘You noticed…’ Esha was pleased. ‘Escape, by Calvin Klein.’ She bent
her knees and adjusted the tassels at the end of her long, dark brown skirt.
‘Oooh. Went shopping?’ Radhika said.
‘Call it a momentary laps of reason,’ Esha said.
The driver finally reached a stretch of empty road and raced the Qualis
fast.
I looked at Esha again. Her dress sense is impeccable. Esha dresses
better on an average day than I ever did in my whole life. Her sleeveless
coffee-colored top perfectly contrasted with her skirt. She wore chunky
brown earrings that looked edible and her lipstick was a thick cocoa, as is she
had just kissed a bowl of chocolate sauce. Her eyes had at least one of these
things—mascara, eyeliner and/or eye-shadow (I can’t tell, but Priyanka told
me they are different things).
‘The Lakme fashion week is in four months. My agent is trying to get me
an assignment,’ Esha said to Radhika.
Esha wanted to become a model. She was hot, at least according to
people at the call center. Two months ago, some agents in the Western
Computers bay conducted a stupid poll in office. You know, the secret ones
that everyone knows about anyway. People vote for various titles, like who is
hot, who is handsome and who is pretty. Esha won the title of the ‘hottest
chick at Connexions’. She acted very dismissive of the poll results, but from
that day there’s been just this tiny hint of vanity in her. But otherwise, she is
fine. She moved to Delhi from Chandigarh a year ago, against her parent’s
wishes. The call center job helps her earn a regular income, but during the
day she approached agencies and tries to get modeling assignments. She’s
taken part in some low-key fashion shows in West Delhi. But apart from that
and the hottest-chick in-house title, nothing big has come her way so far.
Priyanka once told me (making me swear that I’d keep it to myself) that she
thinks Esha will never make it as a real model. ‘Esha is too short and too
small-town for a real model’—is what she said exactly. But Priyanka doesn’t
know crap. Esha is five-five, only two inches shorter than me (and one inch
taller than me with her heels). I think that is quite tall for a girl. And the
whole ‘small-town’ thing, that just went over my head. Esha is only twentytwo,
give her a chance. And Chandigarh is not a small town, it is a union
territory and the administrative capital of two states. But Priyanka’s
geography is crap as well. I think Priyanka is just jealous. All non-hot girls are
jealous of the hot ones. Priyanka wasn’t even considered for the hottest
chick. Now I do find Priyanka nice looking, and she did get a nomination for
the ‘call center cutie award’, which I think is just because of her dimples and
cure round face. But Priyanka didn’t win. Some girl in HR won that.
We had to pick Vroom next; his real name is Varun Malhotra (of agent
Victor Mell). However, everyone calls him Vroom because of his love for
anything on wheels.
The Qualis turned into the lane for Vroom’s house. He was sitting on his
bike, waiting for us.
‘What’s the bike for?’ I said, craning out of the window.
‘I’m coming on my own,’ Vroom said, adjusting his leather gloves. He
wore black jeans and trekking shows that made his thin legs look extra long.
His dark blue sweatshirt had the Ferrari horse logo on it.
‘Are you crazy?’ I said. ‘it’s so cold. Get in, we’re late already.’
Dragging the bike he came and stood next to me.
‘No, I’m stressed today. I need to get it out of me with a fast ride.’ He
was standing right beside me and only I could hear him.
‘What happened?’
‘Nothing. Dad called. He argued with mom for two hours. Why did they
separate? They can’t live without screaming their guts out at each other?’
‘It’s okay man. Not your problem,’ I said.
Vroom’s dad was a businessmen who parted from his wife two years
ago. He preferred banging his secretary to being with his family, so Vroom and
his mother now lived without him.
‘I couldn’t sleep at all. Just lay in bed all day and now I feel sick. Need
to get some energy back,’ Vroom said as he straddled his bike.
‘But it’s freezing, dude…’ I began.
‘What is going on Shyam sahib?’ the driver asked. I turned around. The
driver looked at me with a puzzled expression. I shrugged my shoulders.
‘He’s coming on his bike,’ I told everyone.
‘Come with me,’ Vroom said to me. ‘I’ll make you reach in half the
time.’
‘No thanks,’ I said, and folded my hands. I was not leaving the cozy
Qualis to go anywhere.
Vroom bent over to greet the driver.
‘Hello, driver sahib,’ Vroom said.
‘Vroom sahib, don’t you like my Qualis?’ the driver said, visibly
dejected.
‘No Driver ji, I am in a mood to ride,’ Vroom said, and offered a pack of
cigarettes to the driver. The driver took one. Vroom signaled him to keep the
whole pack.
‘Drive the Qualis if you want,’ the driver said and lifted his hands off
the steering wheel.
‘No maybe later. Right now I need to fly.’
‘Hey Vroom. Any news on Connexions? Anything happening?’ Radhika
asked, adjusting her hair.
Apart from the dark circles around her eyes, you would say Radhika was
pretty. She had high cheekbones and her fair skin went well with her wispy
eyebrows and soot-black eyes. Her sleep-deprived face still looked nice. She
wore a plain mustard sari, as saris were all she could wear in her in-laws’
house. This was different apparel from the jeans and skirts Radhika preferred
before her marriage.
‘No updates. Will dig for stuff today but I think Bakshi will screw us all.
Hey Shyam, the website manual is all done by the way. I emailed it to office,’
Vroom said and started his bike.
‘Cool, finally. Let’s send it in today,’ I said, perking up.
We left Vroom and moved to out last pickup at Priyanka’s place. It was
9.30 p.m. still an hour away from our shift. However, I was worried as Shefali
finished her shift and left by 10:20 p.m.
Fortunately, Priyanka was standing at her pick-up point when we
reached her place.
‘Hi,’ Priyanka said, as she entered the Qualis and sat next to Esha in the
middle seat. She carried a large, white plastic bag apart from her usual giant
handbag.
‘Hi,’ everyone replied except me.
‘I said hi, Shyam,’ Priyanka said.
I pretended not to hear. It is strange, but even since we broke up, I find
it difficult to talk to her. Even though I must think of her thirty times a day.
I looked at her. She adjusted her dupatta around her neck. The forest
green salwar kameez she was wearing was new, I noticed. The colors suited
her light brown skin. I looked at her nose and her nostrils that flared up every
time she was upset. I swear tiny flames appeared in them when she was mad.
‘Shyam, I said hi,‘ she said again. She gets really pissed if people don’t
respond to her.
‘hi,’ I said. I wondered if Bakshi would finally promote me after he saw
my website manual tonight.
‘Where’s Vroom?’ Priyanka said. She had to know everything all the
time.
‘Vroom is riding…vroom,’ Esha said, making a motorbike noise.
‘Nice perfume, Esha. Shopping again, eh?’ Priyanka said and sniffed,
puckering up that tiny nose.
‘Escape, Calvin Klein,’ Esha announced and struck a pose.
‘Wow! Someone is going designer,’ Priyanka said and both of them
laughed. This is something I will never understand about her. Priyanka has
bitched fifty times about Esha to me, yet when they are with each other, they
behave like long-lost sisters.
‘Esha, big date coming?’ Radhika said.
‘No dates. I’m still so single. Suitable guys are an endangered species,’
Esha said and all the girls laughed. It wasn’t that funny if you ask me. I wished
Vroom was in the Qualis too. He is the only person in my team I can claim as a
friend. At twenty-two he is four years younger than I am, but I will find it
easiest to talk to him. Radhika’s household talk is too alien to me. Esha’s
modeling trip is also beyond me as no one is ever going to pay me for the
looks. I am certainly not good looking: my day is made if someone describes
my looks as ‘slightly above average’.
Priyanka was a friend and a lot moiré until recently. Four months ago,
we broke up (Priyanka’s version) or she dumped me (my version).
So now I try to do what she wants us to do—‘move on’—which is why I
hang out with Shefali.
Beep Beep. Beep Beep.
Two pairs of loud beeps from my shift’s pocket startled everyone.
‘Who’s is that?’ Priyanka said.
‘Oh Sorry. It’s my SMS.’ I said and opened the new message.
Where r u my eddy teddy?
Come soon-curly wurly
It was Shefali. She is into cheesy nicknames these days. I replied to the
SMS.
Qualis stuck in traffic
Will b there soon
‘Who’s that?’ Esha asked me.’
‘Nobody important,’ I said.
‘Shefali?’ Radhika said.
‘No,’ I said and everybody looked at me.
‘No,’ I said again.
‘Yes, it is. It is Shefali, isn’t it,’ Esha and Radhika said together and
laughed.
‘Why does Shefali always babytalk?’ I heard Esha whisper to Radhika.
More titters followed.
‘Whatever,’ I said and looked at my watch. The Qualis was still on the
NH8, at the entrance to Gurgaon. We were ten minutes away from
Connexions.
‘Cool, will meet Shefali by 10:10, I thought.
‘Can we stop for a quick tea at Inderjeet? We will still make it by
10:30,’ Priyanka said. Inderjeet dhabha on NH8 was famous for its all-night
tea and snacks among truck drivers.
‘We won’t get late?’ Radhika crinkled her forehead.
‘Of course not. Driver Ji asked saved us twenty minutes in the last
stretch. Come Driver ji, my treat,’ Priyanka said.
‘Good idea. Will keep me awake,’ Esha said.
The driver slowed the Qualis near Inderjeet dhabha and parked it near
the counter.
‘Hey guys, do we have to stop? We will get late,’ I protested against the
chai chorus.
‘We won’t get late. Let’s treat Driver ji for making us reach fast,’
Priyanka said and got out of the Qualis. She just has to do things I don’t want
to do.
‘He wants to be with Shefali, dude,’ Esha elbowed Radhika. They
guffawed again. What is so damn funny, I wants to ask, but didn’t.
‘No, I just like to reach my shift a few minutes early,’ I said and got out
of the Qualis. Military Uncle and the driver followed us.
Inderjeet dhabha had angithis next to each table. I smelled hot
paranthas, but did not order as it was getting late. The driver arranged plastic
chairs for us. Inderjeet’s minions collected tea orders as per the various
complicated rules laid out by the girls.
‘No sugar in mine,’ Esha said.
‘Extra hot for me,’ Radhika said.
‘With cardamom for me,’ Priyanka said.
When we were in college together, Priyanka used to make cardamom
tea for me in her hostel room. Her taste in men might have changed, but
obviously not her taste in beverages.
The tea arrived in three minutes.
‘So what’s the gossip?’ Priyanka said as cupped her hands around the
glass for warmth. Apart from cardamom, Priyanka’s favourite spice is gossip.
‘No gossip. You tell us, things are happening I your life,’ Radhika said.
‘I actually do have something to tell,’ Priyanka said with a sly smile.
‘What?’ Radhika and Esha exclaimed together.
‘I’ll tell you when we get to the bay. It’s big,’ Priyanka said.
‘Tell now,’ Esha said, poking Priyanka’s shoulder.
‘No time. Someone is in a desperate hurry,’ Priyanka said glancing
meaningfully at me.
I turned away.
‘Okay, I also have something to share. But don’t tell anyone, Esha said.
‘What?’ Radhika said.
‘See, Esha said and stood up. She raised her top to expose a flat midriff
—on which there was a newborn ring.
‘Cool, check it out,’ Priyanka said, ‘someone’s turning trendy.’
Military Uncle stared as if in a state of shock. I suspect he was never
young, was just born straight forty years old.
‘What’s that? A navel ring?’ Radhika asked.
Esha nodded and covered herself again.
‘Did it hurt?’ Radhika said.
‘Oh yes,’ Esha said. ‘Imagine someone stapling your tummy hard.’
Esha’s statement churned my stomach.
‘Shall we go,’ I said, gulping down my tea.
‘Let’s go girls, or Mr Conscientious will get upset,’ Priyanka suppressed
a smirk. I hate her.
I went to the counter to pay the bill. I saw Vroom watching TV.
‘Vroom?’ I said.
‘Hi. What are you guys doing here?’ he said.
I told about the girls’ tea idea.
‘I arrived twenty minutes ago man,’ Vroom said. He extinguished his
cigarette and showed me that butt. ‘This was my first.’
Vroom was trying to cut down to four cigarettes a night. However, with
Bakshi in our life, it was impossible.
‘Can you rush me to the call center? Shefali will leave soon,’ I said.
Vroom’s eyes were transfixed on the TV set on Inderjeet dhabha’s
counter. The NDTV news channel was on, and Vroom is a sucker for it. He
worked in a newspaper once and is generally into social and global issues and
all that stuff. He thinks that just by watching the news, he can change the
world. That, by the way, is his trip.
A TV reporter was speaking in front of Parliament house, announcing
elections in four months.
‘Hey, I know that guy. He used to work in my previous job,’ Vroom said.
‘The newspaper?’
‘Yes, Boontoo we used to call him—total loser guy. Didn’t know he
moved to television. Check out his contact lenses,’ Vroom said, as both of us
paid the bill.
‘Let’s go, man. Shefali will kill me.’
‘Shefali. Oh you mean curly wurly,’ Vroom laughed.
‘Shut up man. She has to catch the Qualis after her shift. This is the
only time I get with her.’
‘On one hand you had Priyanka, and now you sink to Shefali levels,’
Vroom said, and bent his elbow to rest his six-feet-two-inches frame on the
dhabha counter.
‘What’s wrong with Shefali?’ I said, shuffling from one foot to the other.
‘Nothing, just that it is nice to have a girlfriend with half a brain. Why
are you wasting your time with her?’
I’m waning myself off Priyanka. I’m trying to move on in life,’ I said and
took a sweat from the candy jar at the counter.
‘So what’s Shefali, a pacifier? What happened to the re-proposal plan
with Priyanka?’ Vroom said.
‘I’ve told you. Not until I become team leader. Which should be soon—
maybe tonight after me submit the website manual. Now can we please go?’ I
said.
‘Yeah, right. Some hopes you live on,’ Vroom said, but moved away
from the counter.
I held on tight as Vroom zipped through NH8 at 120 km an hour. I closed
my eyes and prayed Shefali would not be mad, and that I would teach alive.
Beep Beep. Beep Beep. My mobile went off again.
Curly wurly is sad
Eddy teddy is very bad
I leave in 10 min : (
I jumped off the bike as Vroom reached the call center. The bike jerked
forward and Vroom had to use both his legs to balance.
‘Easy man. Vroom said in an irritated voice. ‘Can you just let me park?’
‘Sorry. I’m really late,’ I said and ran inside.
#3
‘I’m not talking to you,’ Shefali said and started playing with one of her
silver earrings. The ring-shaped earrings were so large, they could be bangles.
‘Sorry Shefali. My bay people made the Qualis late.’ I stood next to her,
leaning against her desk. She sat on her swivel chair and rotated it ninety
degrees away from me to showcase her sulking. The dozens of workstations in
her bay were empty as all the other agents had left.
‘Whatever. I thought you were their team leader,’ she said and
pretended to work on her computer.
‘I am not the team leader. I am due, but not one yet,’ I said.
‘Why don’t they make you team leader?’ she turned to me and fluttered
her eyes. I hate this expression of hers.
‘I don’t know. Bakshi said he’s trying, but I have to bring my leadership
skills up to speed.’
‘What is up to speed?’ she said and opened her handbag.
‘I don’t know. Improve my skills I guess.’
‘So you guys don’t have any team leader.’
‘No. Bakshi says we have to manage without one. I help with supervisory
stuff for now. But Bakshi told me I have strong future potential.’
‘So why doesn’t your team listen to you?’
‘Who says they don’t? Of course they do.’
‘So why were you late/’ she said, beginning her sentence with a ‘so; for
the third time.
‘Shefali come on, drop that,’ I said, looking at my watch. ‘How did your
shift go?’
‘Shift was okay. Team leader said call volumes have dropped for
Western Computers. All customers are using the troubleshooting website
now.’
‘Cool. You do know who made that right?’
‘Yes, you and Vroom. But I don’t think you should make a big deal out of
it. The website has cost Connexions a lot of business.’
‘But the website helps the customers a lost, right?’ I said.
‘Shh. Don’t talk about the website here. Some agents are very upset.
Someone said they would cut people.’
‘Really?’
‘I don’t know. Listen, why are you so unromantic? Is this how Eddy
Teddy should talk to his Curly Wurly/’
I wanted to know more about what was going on at Connexions. Bakshi
was super-secretive—all the said was there were some confidential
management priorities. I thought of asking Vroom to spy some more.
‘Eddy Teddy?’ Shefali repeated. I looked at her. If she stopped wearing
Hello Kitty hairpins, she could be passably cute.
‘Huh?’
‘Are you listening to me?’
‘Of course.’
‘Did you like my gift/’
‘What gift?’
‘The ring tones. I gave you six rings tones. See, you don’t even
remember,’ she said and her face turned sad.
‘I do. See I put Last Christmas as my tone,’ I said and picked up my
phone to play it. Vroom would probably kill me if he heard it, but I had to for
Shefali.
‘So cute,’ Shefali said and pinched my cheeks. ‘So cute it sounds, my
Eddy teddy.’
‘Shefali…’
‘What?’
‘Can you stop calling me that/’
‘Why/ you don’t like it?’
‘Just call me Shyam.’
‘You don’t like the name I gave you?’ she said, her voice transcending
from sad to tragic.
I kept quiet. You never tell women you don’t like something they have
done. However, they pick up on the silence.
‘That means you don’t like the ring tones either,’ she said and her voice
started to break.
‘I do,’ I said, fearing a round of crying. ‘I love the ring tones.’
‘And what about the name? You can choose another name if you want. I
am not like your other girlfriends,’ she said and tiny tears appeared in her
eyes. I looked at my watch. There more minutes and time will heal
everything. I thought. I took a deep breath. A hundred and eighty seconds and
she would have to leave for sure. Sometimes counting seconds is a great way
to kill time through woman’s tantrums.
‘What kind of girlfriends/’ I said.
‘Like,’ she sniffed, ‘bossy girls who impose their way on you. Like youknow-who.’
‘Who?’ What are you implying,’ I said, my voice getting firmer. It was
true; Priyanka could be bossy, but only if you didn’t listen to her.
‘Forget it. But will you give me a name if I stop crying?’ her sobs were at
a serious risk of transforming into a full-fledged bawl.
‘yes,’ I said and became normal. ‘Give me a name,’
I though hard. Nothing came to mind.
‘Sheffy? How about Sheffy?’ I said finally.
‘Nooo. I want something cuteeer,’ she said. Shefali loves to drag out
words.
‘I can’t of anything cute right now. I have to work. Isn’t your Qualis
leaving soon too?’ I said.
She looked at her watch and stood up.
‘Yes, I better leave now. Will you think of a name by tomorrow?’ she
said.
‘I will, bye now.’
‘Give me a kissie,’ she said and tapped a finger on her cheek.
‘What?’
‘Kissie.’
‘You mean a kiss? Yeah sure.’ I gave her a peck on the check and turned
around to return to my bay.
‘Bye bye. Eddy Teddy,’ her voice followed me.
#4
The others were already at the desk when I returned from Shefali’s bay.
Our bay’s name is the ‘Western Appliances Strategic Group’ or WASG.
Unlike the other bay that troubleshoots for computer customers, we deal with
customers of home appliances such as refrigerators, ovens and vacuum
cleaners. Management calls us the strategic bay because we specialize in
troublesome and painful customers. These ‘strategic’ customers call a lot and
are too dumb to figure out things (actually the latter applies to a lot of
callers).
We fell special, as we are not part of the main computers bay. The main
bay has over a thousand agents and handles the huge ‘Western Computers’
account. While the calls are less weird there, they miss the privacy we enjoy
in the WASG.
I came and took my seat at the long rectangular table. We have a fixed
seating arrangement: I sit next to Vroom, while Priyanka is right opposite me;
Esha is adjacent to Priyanka and Radhika sits next to Esha. The bay is an open
plan, so we can all see each others. Military Uncle’s chat station is at the
corner of the room. At each of the other three corners, there are,
respectively, the restroom, a conference room and a stationery supplies
room.
However, no one apart from Uncle was at their seat when I sat down.
Everyone had gathered around Priyanka.
‘What’s the news? Tell us now,’ Esha was saying.
‘Okay, okay. But on one condition. It doesn’t leave the WASG,’ Priyanka
said, sitting down. She pulled out a large plastic bag from under her seat.
‘Guys,’ I said, interrupting their banter.
Everyone turned to look at me.
I pointed at the desk and the unmanned phones. I looked at my watch.
It was 10:29 p.m. The call system routine backup was about to finish, and our
calls would begin in a minute.
Everyone returned to their chairs and put on their headsets.
‘Good evening, everyone. Please pay attention to this announcement,’ a
loud voice filled our bay. I looked up. The voice came from the fire drill
speaker.
‘I hate this irritating announcement,’ Priyanka said.
‘This is the control room,’ the speaker continued. ‘This is to inform all
agents of a fire drill next Friday at midnight. Please follow instructions during
the fire drill to leave the call center safely. Thank you. Have a nice shift.’
‘Why do they keep doing this? Nobody is going to burn this place down,’
Esha said.
‘Government rules,’ Vroom said.
Conversations stopped mid-way as two begs on the computer screens
signaled the start of our shift.
Calls began at 10”31 p.m. Numbers started flashing on our common
switchboard as we picked up calls one after the other.
‘Good afternoon, Western Appliances, Victor speaking, how may I help
you?’ Vroom said as he took one of his first calls.
‘Yes, according to my records I am speaking to Ms Smith, and you have
the WAF-200 dishwasher. Is that right?’ Esha said.
Esha’s ‘memory’ impressed the caller. It was not a big deal, given that
our automated system had every caller’s records. We knew their name,
address, credit card details and past purchases from Western Appliances. We
also had details on when they last called us. In fact, the reason why her call
had come to our desk—the Western Appliances Strategic desk—was because
she was a persistent caller. This way the main bay could continue to run
smoothly.
Sometimes we had customers that were oddballs even by WASG
standards. I will not go into all of them, but Vroom’s 10:37 p.m. call went
something like this:
‘Yes s Paulson, of course we remember you. Happy Thanksgiving, I hope
you are making a big turkey in our WA100 model oven,’ Vroom said, reading
from a script that reminded us about the American festival of the day.
I could not hear the customer’s side of the conversation, but Ms Paulson
was obviously explaining her problem with the oven.
‘No Ms Paulson, you shouldn’t have unscrewed the cover,’ Vroom said,
as politely as possible.
‘No, really madam. An electrical appliance like the WA100 should only
he serviced by trained professionals,’ Vroom said, reading verbatim from the
WA100 service manual.
Ms Paulson spoke for another minute. Our strategic bay hardly had a
reputation for efficiency, but long calls like these could screw up Vroom’s
response times.
‘See madam, you need to explain to me why you opened the top cover.
Then perhaps we’ll understand why you got an electric shock… so tell me…
yes… oh really? Vroom continued, taking deep breaths. Patience, key to
becoming a star agent, did not come naturally to him.
I looked around; people were busy with calls. Radhika helped someone
defrost her fridge; Esha assisted a customer in unpacking a dishwasher.
Everyone was speaking with an American accent and sounded different from
how they had in the Qualis. I took a break from the calls to compile the call
statistic of thee previous day. I did not particularly like doing this, but Bakshi
had left me with little choice.
‘See madam,’ Vroom was still with Ms Paulson, ‘I understand your
turkey did not fit and you did not want to cut it, but you should not have
opened up the equipment…. But see that is not the equipment’s fault… I can’t
really tell you what to do… I understand your son is coming, madam…. Now If
you had the WA150, that is a bigger size… ‘Vroom said, beginning to breathe
faster.
Ms Paulson ranted on for a while longer.
‘Ms Paulson, I suggest you take the oven to your dealer as soon as
possible’ Vroom said firmly. ‘And next time, get a smaller turkey... and yes, a
readymade turkey will be a good idea for tonight… No, I don’t have a dial-aturkey
number. Thank you for calling Ms Paulson, bye.’ Vroom ended the call.
Vroom nagged his fist on the table.
‘Everything okay?’ I said, not looking up from my papers.
‘Yeah. Just a psycho customer,’ he mumbled as another number started
flashing on his screen.
I worked on my computer for the next ten minutes, compiling the call
statistics of the previous day. Bakshi had also assigned me the responsibility
of checking the other agent’s etiquette. Every now and then, I would listen in
on somebody’s call. At 10:47 p.m., I connected to Esha’s line.
‘Yes sir. I sound like your daughter? Oh, thank you. So what is wrong
with the vacuum cleaner/’ she was saying.
‘Your voice is so soothing,’ the caller said.
‘Thanks you sir. So, the vacuum cleaner…?’
Esha’s tone was perfect—just the right mix of politeness and firmness.
Management monitored us on average call handling times, or AHTs. As WASG
got the more painful customers, our AHT Benchmarks were higher at two-anda-half
minutes per call. I checked my files for everyone’s AHT—all of us were
within targets.
‘Beep! The sound of the fax machine made me look up from my papers.
I wondered who could be faxing us at this time. I went to the machine and
checked the incoming fax. It was from Bakshi.
The fax machine took three minutes to churn out the seven pages he
had sent. I tore the message sheet off the machine and held the first sheet
up.
From: Subhash Bakshi
Subject: Training Initiatives
Dear Shyam,
Just FYI, I have recommended your name to assist in accent
training as they are short of teachers. I am sure you can
spare some time for this. As always, I am trying to get you
more relevant and strategic exposure.
Yours,
Subhash Bakshi
Manager, Connexions
I gasped as I read the rest of the fax. Bakshi was sucking me into several
hours outside my shift to reach new recruits. Apart from the extra work, I
hate accent is so confusing. You might think the Americans and their language
are straightforward. Far from it—with them, each letter can be pronounced
several different ways.
I will give you just one example— T. With this letter Americans have
four different sounds. T can be silent so ‘internet’ becomes ‘innernet’ and
‘advantage’ becomes ‘advannage’. The second way is when T and N merge
—‘written’ becomes ‘writn’ and ‘certain’ is ‘certn’. The third sound is when T
is in the middle. There, it sounds like a D—‘daughter’ is ‘daughter’ and
‘water’ in ‘wauder’. The last category, if you still care, is when Americans say
T actually like a T. This happens when T is the beginning of the word like
‘table’ or ‘stumble’. Man, it drivers me nuts. And this is just one consonant.
The vowels are another, more painful story.
‘What’s up/’ Vroom said, coming up to me.
I passed the fax to Vroom. He read it and smirked.
‘Yeah right. He sent you an FYI. Do you know what an FYI is?’ Vroom
said.
‘What/’
‘Fuck you Instead. It is a standard way to dump responsibility on
someone else.’
‘I hate accent training man. You can’t teach Delhi people to speak like
American in a week.’
‘Just as you can’t train Americans to speak with a Punjabi accent,’
Vroom said and chuckled. ‘Anyway, go train-train, lose your brain.’
‘What will I do?’ I said, beginning to walk back towards our desk.
‘Go train-train, lose your brain,’ Vroom said and laughed. He liked the
rhyme, and repeated it several times as we walked back to the bay.
I was back at my seat, Vroom’s words—‘train, train’—echoing in my
head. They were making me remember another kind of train altogether. It
brought back memories of the Rail Museum—where I had a date with Priyanka
a year ago.
#5
My Past Dates with
Priyanka—I
Rail Museum, Chanakyapuri
One year before this night
She came thirty minutes late. I had seen the whole museum twice,
examined every little train model, stepped inside India’s oldest coal engine,
understood the modern interactive siren system. I went to the canteen, which
was on an island inn the middle of an artificial pond. It was impressive
landscaping for museum. I though of lighting a cigarette, but I caught sight of
the sign: ‘Only Steam Engines are Allowed to Smoke.’ I was cradling a
lukewarm Coke in the museum canteen when she arrived.
‘Okay. Don’t say anything. Sorry, I’m late, I know, I know,’ she said and
sat down with a thump in front of me.
I didn’t say anything. I looked at her tiny nose. I wondered ho it allowed
in enough oxygen.
‘What, say something,’ she said after five seconds.
‘I thought you told me to be quiet,’ I said.
‘My mother needs professional help,’ Priyanka said. ‘She really does.’
‘What happened/’ I swirled the straw in my coke, making little fizzy
drops implode.
‘I’ll tell you. First, how do you like this place/ cute, isn’t it?’
‘The Rail Museum?’ I said, throwing my hands in the air. ‘How old are
we, twelve? Anyway, what happened with mom? What was the fuel today?
‘We don’t need fuel, just a spark is enough. Just as I was ready to leave
to come here, she made a comment on my dress.’
‘What did she say?’ I asked, looking at her clothes. She wore a blue tieand-dye
skirt, and a T-shirt that had a peace sign on it. It was typical Priyanka
stuff. She wore earring with blue beads, which matched her necklace. She
had a hint of kohl in her eyes, which I was crazy about.
‘I was almost at the door and then she says, why don’t you wear the
gold necklace I gave you for you your last birthday?’ Priyanka said.
‘And then/’ she obviously wasn’t wearing any gold necklace, as my gaze
turned to the hollow of her neck, which I felt like touching.
‘And I was like, no mom, it won’t go with my dress. Yellow metal is
totally uncool, only aunties wear it. Boom, next thing we are having this big,
long argument. That’s what made me late. Sorry,’ she said.
‘You didn’t have to fight. Just wear the chain in front of her and
remove it later,’ I said as the waiter came to take our order.
‘but that’s not the point. Anyways,’ she said and turned tot eh waiter,
get me a plate of samosas, I’m starving. Actually wait, that is so fattening, do
you have a salad?’
The waiter gave us a blank look.
‘Where do you think you are?’ I said. ‘this is the Rail Museum canteen,
not an Italian bistro. You get what you see.’
‘Okay, okay,’ she said, eyeing the stalls. ‘Get me the potato chips. No,
get me the popcorn. Popcorn is lighter right? She looked at the waiter as if he
was a nutritionist.
‘Just get the popcorn,’ I said to the waiter.
‘So, what else is happening? Met Vroom?’ she said
‘;Was supposed to, but couldn’t. he had a date.’
‘With who? New girl?’
‘Of course. He never sticks to one. I wonder what girls see in him. All
hot ones too,’ I said.
‘I can’t understand the deal with Vroom. He is the most materialistic
and unemotional person I have met in my entire life,’ Priyanka said as the
popcorn arrived at our table.
‘No he isn’t,’ I said grabbing more popcorn than I could hold.
‘Well, look at him—jeans, phones, pizzas and bikes. That is all he lives
for. And this whole new girlfriend every three months, c’mon, at some point
you’ve got to stop that, right?’
‘Well, I’m happy to stick to the one I have,’ I said, my mouth
overflowing with popcorn.
‘You are so cute,’ Priyanka said, as she blushed and smiled. She took
some more popcorn and stuffed it into my mouth.
‘Thanks,’ I said as I munched the popcorn. ‘Vroom has changed. He
wasn’t like this when he first joined from his previous job.’
‘The one at the newspaper?’
‘Yeah, journalist trainee. He started in current affairs. Do you know
what one of his famous pieces was called?’
‘No, what? Oh crap,’ Priyanka said, looking at someone behind me.
‘What happened?’
‘Nothing, just don’t look back. Some relatives of mine with their painful
kids are here. Oh no,’ she said, looking down at our table.
Now when someone tells you not to look at something, you always feel
an incredible urge to do just that. From the corner of my eye I saw a family
with two kids at the corner of the room.
‘Who else do you expect to come here but kids?’ I said. ‘Anyway, they
are quite far.’
‘Shut up and look down. Anyway, tell me about Vroom’s piece,’ she
said.
‘Oh yeah. It was called ‘Why Don’t politicians Ever Commit Suicide?”’
‘What? Sounds morbid.’
‘Well, the article said all kinds of people-students, housewives,
businessmen, employees and even film stars—commit suicide. But politicians
never do. That tells you something.’
‘What?’ she said, still keeping her eyes down.
‘Well, Vroom’s point was that suicide is a horrible thing and people do it
only because they are really hurt. This means they feel something. But
politicians don’t. So, basically, this country is run by people who don’t feel
anything.’
‘Wow! Can’t imagine that going down well with his editor.’
‘You bet it didn’t. However, Vroom had sneaked it in. the editor only
saw it after it was printed and all hell broke loose. Vroom somehow saved his
job, but his bosses moved him to Page 3.’
‘Our Vroom? Page 3?’
‘They told Vroom he was good looking, so he would fit in there. In
addiction, he had done a photography course. He could click the pictures
himself.’
‘Cover Page 3 because you are good looking? Now that sounds dumb,’
she said.
‘It is dumb. But Vroom look his revenge there too. He took unflattering
pictures of the glitterati—faces stuffed with food, close-ups of cellulite thighs,
drunk people throwing up—that sort of stuff showed up in papers the next
day.’
‘Oh my God,’ Priyanka laughed. ‘He sounds like an activist. I can’t
understand his switching to the call center for money.’
‘Well, according to him, there is activism in chasing money too.’
‘And how does that work?’
‘Well, his point is that the only reason Americans have say in this world
is because they have cash. The day we get money, we can screw them. So the
first thing we have to do is get the money.’
‘Interesting,’ Priyanka said and let out a sigh. ‘Well, that is why we slog
at night. I could have done my B.Ed right after college. But I wanted to save
some money first. Can’t open my dream nursery school without cash. So until
then, it is two hundred calls a night, night after night.’ Priyanka rested her
chin on her elbows. I looked at her. I think she would make the cutest nursery
school principal ever.
‘Western Appliances, Sam speaking, how may I help you? Please let me
help you? Please…’ I said, imitating an American accent.
Priyanka laughed again.
‘Priyanka dideeee,’ a five-year old boy’s voice started customers from
their samosas.
The boy running towards Priyanka had a model train set and a glass of
fountain coke precariously balanced in his hands. He ran without coordination:
the excitement of seeing his didi was too much for him. He
tripped near our table and I lunged to save him. I succeeded, but his fountain
coke fell all over my shirt.
‘Oh no,’ I said eve as I saw another three-year-old girl with a huge
lollipop in her mouth running towards us. I moved aside from the tornado to
save another collision. She landed straight on Priyanka’s lap. I went to the
restroom to clean my shirt.
‘Shyam,’ Priyanka said when I returned, ‘meet my cousin, Dr Anurag.’
The entire family had shifted to our table. Priyanka introduced me to
everyone. I forgot their names as soon as I heard them. Priyanka told her
doctor cousin I worked at a call center. I think the cousin was less interested
in talking to me after that. The kids had eaten half the popcorn and spilt the
rest of it. The boy was running his model train set through popcorn fields on
the table and screaming a mock siren with his sister.
‘Sit, Shyam,’ Priyanka said.
‘No, actually I have an early shift today,’ I said and got up to leave.
‘But wait…’ Priyanka said.
‘No, I have to go,’ I said and ran out of the Rail Museum, which had
turned as chaotic as a railway station.
#6
‘Ouch, Esha scream in the middle of her call broke my train of though
and memories.
‘What?’ I said.
‘I heard loud static. Really bad line… hello, yes madam, Esha said.
Radhika was knitting something with pink wool while she waited for a
call. People were busy, but I could sense that the call volume was lower than
usual tonight.
‘Eew,’ Priyanka said five seconds later.
‘Freaking hell,’ Vroom said as he pulled off his headset from his ears.
‘What’s going on?’ I said.
‘There’s shrill static coming every few seconds now. Ask Bakshi to send
someone,’ Vroom said, rubbing his ear.
‘I’ll go to his office. You guys cover the calls,’ I said and looked at the
time. It was 10:51 p.m. The first break was in less than an hour.
I passed by the training room on my way to Bakshi’s office. I perked
inside: fresh trainees were attending a session. Some students were snoozing;
they were probably still getting used to working at night.
‘35=10’, the instructor wrote in big bold letters on the blackboard.
I remembered the 35=10 rule from my training days two years ago. It
helped agents adjust to their callers.
‘Remember,’ the instructor said to the class, ‘a thirty-five-year-old
American’s brain and IQ is the same as a ten-years-old Indian’s brain. This will
help you understand your clients. You need to be as patient as you are when
dealing with a child. Americans are dumb, just accept it. I don’t want anyone
losing their cool during the calls…’
I dreaded the day when I would have to teach in such classes. My own
Delhi accent was impossible to get rid of, and I must have come last in my
accent class.
‘I have to get out of this,’ I said to myself as I went to Bakshi’s cabin.
Bakshi was in his oversized office, starting at his computer with his
mouth open. As I cam in, he rapidly closed the windows. He was probably
surfing the Internet for bikini babes or something.
‘Good evening sir,’ I said.
‘Oh hello, Sam… please come in.’ Bakshi liked to call us by our Western
names. I hated it.
I walked into his office slowly, to give him time to close his favorite
websites.
‘Come, come Sam, don’t worry. I believe in being an open door
manager.’ Bakshi said.
I looked at his big square face, unusually large for his 5’6” body. The
oversized face resembled the Ravan cut-out at Dusshera. His face shone as
usual. It was the first thing you noticed about Bakshi—the oilfields on his face.
I think if you could recreate Bakshi’s skin as our landscape, you could solve
India’s oil problem. Priyanka told me one that when she met Bakshi for the
first time, she had an overwhelming urge to take a tissue and wipe it hard
across his face. I do not think one tissue would be enough though.
Bakshi was around thirty but looked forty and spoke like he was fifty.
He had worked in Connexions for the past three years. Before that, he did an
MBA from some unpronounceable university in South India. He though he was
Michael Porter or something (Porter is this big management guru—I didn’t
know either, but Bakshi told me in an FYI once) and loved to talk in manager’s
languages or Managese, which is another languages like English and American.
‘So, how are the resources doing?’ Bakshi said, swiveling on his chair.
He never refers to us a people; we are all ‘resources.’
‘Fine, sir. I actually to talk about a problem. The phone lines are not
walking property—lots of static coming in the calls. Can you ask systems…’
‘Fine, sir. I actually wanted to talk about a problem. The phone lines
are not working propely—lots of static coming in the calls. Can you ask
systems…’
‘Sam,’ Bakshi said, pointing a pen at me.
‘Yes?’
‘What did I tell you?’
‘About what?’
‘About how to approach problems.’
‘What?’
‘Think.’
I though hard, but nothing came to mind.
I don’t remember sir…. Solve them?’
‘No. I said big pictures. Always start at the big picture.’
I was puzzled. What was the big picture here? There was static coming
through on the phones and we had to ask systems to fix it. I could have called
them myself, but Bakshi’s intervention would get a faster response.
‘Sir, it is a specific issue. Customers are hearing disturbance…’
‘Sam,’ Bakshi sighed and signaled me to sit down, ‘what makes a good
manager?’
‘What?’ I sat down in front of him and surreptitiously looked at my
watch. It was 10:57 p.m. I hoped the call flow was moderate so the others
wouldn’t have a tough time with one less person on the desk.
‘Wait,’ Bakshi said and took out a writing pad and pen. He placed the
pad on the middle of the table and then drew a graph that looked like this:
He finished the graph and turned the notebook hundred and eighty
degrees to make it face me. He clicked his pen shut with a swagger, as proud
as da Vinci finishing the Mona Lisa.
‘Sir, systems?’ I said, after staying silent for a few seconds.
‘Wait, first you tell me. What is this?’ Bakshi said and taped his index finger
on the diagram.
I tried to make sense of the chart and possibly connection to the static
on the phone lines. I couldn’t get it.
I shook my head in defeat.
‘Tch-tch, see let me tell you,’ Bakshi said. ‘This chart is your career. If
you want to be more senior, you have to move up this curve.’ He put a finger
on the curve and traced it, guiding me on how I should look at my life.
‘Yes sir’ I said having nothing better to say.
‘And do you know how to do that/’
I shook my head. Vroom probably though I was out smoking. I did feel
some smoke coming out of my ears.
‘Big Picture. I just told you focus on the big picture. Learn to identify
the strategic variables, Sam.’
Before I could speak, he had pulled out his pen again and was drawing
another diagram.
‘Maybe I can explain this to you with the help of a 2x2 matrix,’ Bakshi
said and bent down to wrote ‘High and ‘Low’ along the boxes. I had to stop
him.
‘Sir please,’ I said, placing both my hands down to cover the sheet.
‘What?’ he said with irritation, as if Einstein had been disturbed at
work.
‘Sir, this is really interesting to me. I must come back and learn this. But
right now any team is waiting and my shift is in progress.’
‘So?’ Bakshi said.
‘The phones, sir. Please tell systems they should check the WASG bay
urgently,’ I said, without pausing to breathe.
‘Huh?’ Bakshi said, surprised at how fast I speaking.
‘Just call systems sir,’ I said and stood up, ‘using that.’ I pointed at his
telephone and rushed back to my bay.
#7
‘Nice break eh?’ Vroom said when I returned to our bay ‘C’mon man,
just went to Bakshi’s office about the static,’ I said.
“Is he sending someone?’ Vroom asked as he untangled his phone wires.
‘He said I should identify the strategic variable first,’ I said and sat down
on my seat. I rested my face on my hands.
‘Strategic variables? What’s that?’ Vroom said, without looking at me.
‘How the hell do I know?’ I snorted. ‘If I did, I would be team leader. He also
made some diagrams’
Radhika, Esha and Priyanka were busy on calls. Every few seconds, they
would turn the phone away from their ears to avoid the loud static. I wished
the systems guy would come by soon.
‘What diagram?’ Vroom said, as he took out some chewing gum from his
drawer. He offered one to me.
‘Some crap 2x2 matrix or something,’ I said, declining Vroom’s offer.
‘Poor Bakshi, he is just a little silly but a harmless creature. Don’t worry
about him,’ Vroom said.
‘Where the hell is the systems guy?’ I picked up the telephone and
spoke to the systems department. They had not yet received a call from
Bakshi. ‘Can you please come fast…yes, we have an emergency…yes, our
manager knows about it.’
‘I can’t believe Bakshi hasn’t called them yet,’ I said, after I had got the
systems guys to promise they’d send someone right away.
‘Things are bad around here, my friend,’ Vroom said. ‘Bad news may be
coming.’
‘What do you mean? Are they cutting jobs?’ I asked, now a little worried
and anxious, along with being frustrated. It’s amazing how all these nasty
emotions decide to visit me together.
‘I’m trying to find out,’ Vroom said, clinking open a window on his
screen. ‘The Western Computers account is really suffering. If we lose that
account, the call center will sink.’
‘Crap. I heard something about it from Shefali. I think the website we
made was too useful. People have stopped calling us,’ I said.
A visitor in our bay interrupted our conversation. I knew he was the
systems guy, as he had three pages on his belt and two memory cards around
his neck.
Priyanka told him about the problem and made him listen to the static.
The systems guy asked us to disconnect our lines for ten minutes.
Everyone removed their headsets. I saw Esha adjusting her hair. She
does it at least ten times a night. First she will remove the rubber band that’s
tying up her hair and her hair will come loose. Then, she assembles it all
together and ties it back again.
Her hair was light-colored and intensely curly towards the ends: the
result of an expensive hair styling job, which cost as much as a minor surgery.
It didn’t even look that nice if you ask me. Naturally curly hair is one thing,
but processed curly hair looks like tangled telephone wires.
I saw Vroom stare at Esha. It is never easy for guys to work with a hot
girl in office. I mean, what are you supposed to do? Ignore their sexiness and
stare at your computer? Sorry, somehow I don’t think men were designed to
do that.
Radhika took her pink wool out from her bag and started to knot
frantically Military Uncle’s system was still working and somehow glued to his
monitor.
‘What are you knitting?’ Esha turned to Radhika.
‘A scarf for my mother-in-law. Damn sweet she is, feels cold at night,’
Radhika said.
‘She is not sweet—‘ Vroom began to say but Radhika interrupted him.
‘Shh Vroom. She is fine, just traditional.’
‘And that sucks, right? Vroom said.
‘Not at all. In fact, I like the cozy family feeling. They are only a little
bit old-fashioned,’ Radhika said and smiled. I did not think the smile was
genuine, but it was none of my business.
‘Yeah right. Only a little. As in always cover your head with your sari
types,’ Vroom said.
‘They make you cover your head?’ Esha asked, speaking through teeth
clenched around her rubber band.
‘They don’t make me do anything, Esha. I am willing to follow their
culture. All married women in their house do it,’ Radhika said.
‘Still it is a bit weird,’ Esha said.
‘Anyway, I tool it as a challenge. I love Anuj and he said he came as a
package. But yeah, sometimes I miss wearing low waist jeans like you wore
the day before.’
I was amazed Radhika remembered what Esha wore the day before.
Only women have this special area in the brain that keeps track of everything
they and their friends wore the last fifty times.
‘You think those jeans?’ Esha said, her eyes lighting up.
‘I love them. But I guess you need the right figure for them,’ Radhika
said. ‘Anyways, sorry to change the topic guys, but we’re forgetting
something here.’
‘What? The systems?’ I asked, as I looked under the table. The systems
guy lurked within, in a jungle wires. He told me would need ten more
minutes.
I checked my watch. I was 11:20 p.m. I wondered if Bakshi would be
coming for his daily rounds soon.
‘Not the static,’ Radhika said as she kept her knitting aside. ‘Miss
Priyanka has some big news for us, remember?’
‘Oh yes. C’mon Priyanka tell us,’ Esha screamed. Military Uncle looked
up from his screen for a second, and then went back to work. I wondered if
he’d been this quiet when he lived with his son and daughter-in-law.
‘Okay I do have something to tell you,’ Priyanka said with a sheepish
grin, making her two dimples more prominent. She brought out a box of
sweets from her large plastic bag.
‘Whatever your news is, we do get to eat the sweets, right? Vroom
wanted to know.
‘Of course,’ Priyanka said, carefully opening the red cellophane
wrapping on the box. I hate it when she is so methodical. Just trip the damn
wrapping off, I thought. Anyway, it was not my business. I looked under the
table for a few seconds, as if to help the systems guy. Of Course, my ears
were focused on Priyanka’s every word.
‘So, what’s up? Oh milk cake, my favourite,’ Radhika said, even as
Vroom jumped to grab the first piece.
‘I’ll tell you, but you guys have to swear it won’t leave WASG,’ Priyanka
said. She offered the box to Radhika and Esha. Radhika took two pieces, while
Esha broke the tiniest piece possible with human fingers. I guess the low-cut
jeans figure comes at a price.
‘Of course we won’t tell anyone. I hardly have any friends outside the
WASG. Now tell please,’ Esha said and wiped her long fingers with a tissue.
‘Well, let’s just say, my mom is the happier person on earth today,’
Priyanka said.
‘No riddles man. Just tell and the story,’ Vroom said.
‘Well, you know my mom and her obsession for an NRI match for her
rebellious daughter.’
‘Uh-uh, Radhika nodded as she ate her milk cake.
‘So these family friends of ours brought a proposal for me. It came from
one of their relatives in Seattle. I would have said no like always. However,
this time, I saw the pictures, which were cute. I spoke to the guy on the
phone—he sounded decent. He works in Microsoft—so is doing well. His
parents are in Delhi and I met them today. Nice people,’ Priyanka said and
paused to break a piece for herself. She could have broken a smaller piece, I
thought, but it was not really my business.
‘And,’ Esha said, her eyes opened wide and starting at Priyanka.
‘I don’t know, just something clicked or what,’ Priyanka said, playing
with her milk cake rather than eating it. ‘They asked for my decision upfront
and I said—yes.’
‘Waaaoooow! Oh wow!’ the girls screamed at their highest pitch
possible. The system guy shook in terror under the table. I told him
everything was fine and asked him to continue. At least everything was fine
outside. Inside, I had a burning feeling, like someone had tossed a hot coal in
my stomach.
Radhika and Esha got up to hug Priyanka as if India had won the World
Cup or something. People get married everyday. Did these girls really have to
create a scene? I wished the phones would start working again so I did not
have to listen to his nonsense.
I looked at my computer screen and saw that Microsoft Word was open.
Angrily I closed all windows with the Microsoft logo on it.
‘Congratulations, Priyanka,’ Vroom said, ‘that’s big news.’
Even Military Uncle got up and came to shake hands with Priyanka.
Grown ups like it when young people decide to get married. Of course, he was
back at his desk in twenty seconds.
‘This deserves more than milk cake. Where is our treat?’ Esha asked.
Girls like Esha hardly eat anything, but still jump around asking for treats.
‘Treat will come guys,’ Priyanka said, her smile taking permanent
residence on her face. ‘I have only said yes. No ceremonies have happened
yet.’
‘You’ve met the guy?’ Vroom said.
‘No, he’s in Seattle. But we spoke for hours on the phone. And I have
seen his picture. He is cute. Want to see the photo?’ Priyanka said.
‘No thanks,’ I blurted out in reflex. Damn, I could not believe I’d said
that by sheer luck, I had not said it loud enough for Priyanka to hear.
‘Huh? You said something?’ Priyanka asked, looking at me.
I shook my head and pointed under the table. Yes, my only focus was to
fix the phones.
‘Do you want some milk cake?’ Priyanka asked and shunted the box
towards me.
‘No, thanks,’ I said and slid the box back.
‘I thought milk cake was your favorite.’
‘Not anymore. My tastes have changed,’ I said. ‘And I’m trying to cut
down.’
‘Not eve n a small piece?’ she asked and titled her head. At some stage
of my life, I sued to find that head-tilt cute, but today I remained adamant.
I shook my head. Our eyes locked. When you have shared a relationship
with someone, the first change is in how you look into each other’s eyes. The
gaze becomes more fixed, and it is hard to pull away from it.
‘Aren’t you going to say anything?’ Priyanka said. When girls say that,
it’s not really a question. It means they want you to say something.
‘About what? The phone lines? They’ll be fixed in ten minutes,’ I said.
‘Not that. I’m getting married, Shyam.’
‘Oh really,’ I said, as if this were first time I had heard the news.
‘I just said yes to a proposal today,’ she said.
‘Good,’ I said and turned to my screen.
‘Show us the picture!’ Esha screamed, as if Priyanka was going to show
her Brad Pitt naked or something. Priyanka took out a photograph from her
handbag and passed it around. I saw it from a distance: he looked like a
regular software geek, similar to the guy under our table, but with better
clothes. He stood straight with his stomach pulled in—an old trick any guy with
a paunch applies when he gets his picture clicked. He wore glasses, and had a
super neat hairstyle as if his mom clutched his cheeks and combed his hair
every morning. Actually, she just might have for this ‘arranged marriage’
picture. He was standing with the statue of Liberty in the background,
perhaps to emphasize that he was an NRI match and this better than others.
His forced smile made him look like a total loser if you ask me—like the kind
of guy who never spoke to a girl in college. However, now he was hot, and
girls with dimples were ready to marry him without even meeting him.
‘He’s so cute. Like a little teddy bear,’ Esha said and passed the picture
to Radhika.
When girls call a guy ‘teddy bear’, they just mean he is nice but they
will never be attracted to him. Girls may say they like such guys, but teddy
bears never get to sleep with anyone. Unless of course their moms hunt the
neighborhood for them.
‘Are you okay?’ Priyanka said to me. The others were busy analyzing
the picture.
‘Yeah. Why?’
‘No. just expected a little more reaction. We’ve known each other for
four years, more than anybody else on the desk.’
Radhika, Esha and Vroom turned their hands away from the picture to
look at us.
‘Reaction?’ I said. ‘I’m thought I said good.’
‘That’s all?’ Priyanka said. Her smile had left the building.
‘What?’ I said. ‘I’m busy trying to get the system fixed.’
Everyone continued to stare at me.
‘Okay,’ I said, ‘okay, Priyanka. This is great news. I am so happy for
you. Okay?’
‘You could have used a better tone,’ Priyanka said. ‘Anyway, I’ll just
come back,’ she mumbled, and walked away quickly towards the ladies room.
‘What? Why is everyone staring at me?’ I said and everyone turned
away.
The systems gut finally came our from under the table.
‘Fixed?’ I said.
‘I need signal testing equipment,’ he said, wiping sweat off his
forehead. ‘The problem could be outside. Builders are digging all over
Gurgaon right now, some stupid contractor may have dug over our lines. Just
take a break while I come back. Call your manager here as well,’ he said and
left.
I picked up the telephone to call Bakshi. The line was busy. I left a voice
mail for him to come to the desk.
Priyanka returned from the restroom. I noticed she had washed her
face. Her nose still has a drop of water on top of it.
‘Sounds like an easy night. I hope it never gets fixed,’ Radhika said,
knotting ferociously.
‘Nothing better than a call center job if the phones are not working,’
Priyanka said and closed the box of sweets.
‘So tell us more, what is he like?’ Esha said.
‘Who? Ganesh?’ Priyanka asked.
‘His name is Ganesh? Nice,’ Esha said and switched on her mobile
phone. Everyone else followed suit and several opening tones filled the room.
Normally agents could not use cell phones in the bay, but it was okay to do so
now as the system was down.
I had two text messages from Shefali: One wishing me goodnight, and
another one wishing me sweet dreams and a cuddly night. I cringed.
‘Does Ganesh like to talk? Sometimes the software types are real quite,’
Radhika said.
‘Oh yes, he talks a lot. In fact, I might get a cal from him now because
my phone is on,’ Priyanka said and smiled. ‘We’re still getting to know each
other, so any communications good.’
‘You sound sooo happy,’ Esha said. Her ‘so’ lasted four seconds.
‘I am happy. I can see what Radhika says now about getting a new
family. Ganesh’s mom came home today and gave me a big gold chain. And
she was all hugging me and kissing me.’
‘Sounds gross,’ Vroom said.
‘Shut up, Vroom,’ Esha said. ‘Oh Priyanka, you’re so lucky.’
Vroom sensed that I was not exactly jumping with joy at the
conversation.
‘Cigarette?’ he said.
I looked at my watch. It was 11:30, our usual time for taking a smoke. In
any case, I preferred burning my lungs to sticking around to find out Ganesh’s
hobbies.
#8
Vroom and I went to the call center parking lot Vroom leaned against his
bike and lit two cigarettes with one matchstick. I looked at his tall and thin
frame. If he weren’t so skinny, you’d say he was a stud. Still, a cigarette
looked out of place on his boyish face. Perhaps conscious of the people who
had called him Baby Face before, he always kept a one-day old stubble. He
passed an already burning cigarette to me. I took a puff and let it out in the
cold night air.
We kept quiet for a minute and I was thankful to Vroom for that. One
finally thing guys do know is when to shut up.
Vroom finally spoke, starting with a neutral topic. ‘I need a break man.
Good thing I’m going to Manali next weekend.’
‘Cool, Manali is really nice,’ I said.
‘I’m going with my school buddies. We might ride up there on bikes.’
‘Bikes? Are you buts, you’ll freeze to death.’
‘Two words: leather jackets. Anyway, when did you go there?’
‘Last year. We took a bus though,’ I said.
‘Who all went?’ Vroom said as he looked for a place to flick ash. He
found none. He stepped to a corner of the parking lot and plucked two large
leaves from a tree. We tapped our cigarette on the improvised ashtray.
‘Priyanka and I,’ I said and turned silent. Vroom did not respond either
for ten seconds.
‘Fun?’ he finally said.
‘Yeah, it was great. Apart from the aches from the bus ride,’ I said.
‘Why, what happened?’
‘We took a bus at four in the morning from ISBT. Priyanka was in her
anti-snob phase, so she insisted we take the ordinary slow bus and not the
deluxe fast one. She also anted to enjoy the scenery slowly.’
‘And then?’
Then what? The moment the bus reached the highway, she learned on
my shoulder and slept off. My shoulder cramped and my body turned sore. But
apart from that horrible journey, it was great fun.’
‘She’s a silly girl,’ Vroom said. Letting out a big puff, his face smiling
behind the smoke ring.
‘She is. You should have seen her then. She used to wear all these
beads and FabIndia stuff all the time. And then she’d sit with the truck drivers
and have tea.’
‘Wow. Can’t imagine Priyanka like that now,’ Vroom said.
‘Trust me, the girl has a wild side,’ I said and paused, as her face came
to mind. ‘Anyway, it’s history now. Girls change.’
‘You bet. She’ll all set now.’
I nodded. I didn’t want to talk about Priyanka anymore. At least one
part of me didn’t. The rest of my parts always wanted to talk about her.
‘NRI catch, Microsoft and all. Not bad,’ Vroom continued as he lit
another cigarette. I narrowed my eyes at him.
‘What?’ he said. It’s in my daily quota. It is only my third of five.’ He
exhaled a giant cloud.
‘It’s a little too quick, isn’t it?’ I said.
‘What? The cigarette? I need it today.’
‘Not theat. Priyanka’s wedding. Don’t you think she is deciding too
fast?’
‘Fast? C’mon man, you don’t get matches like this everyday. He is in
freaking Microsoft. As good as they get. He is MS Groom 1.1—deluxe edition.’
‘What is the deal with Microsoft? Good job?’
‘Dude, I’m sure he packs close to a hundred grand a year.’
‘What is that? A hundred thousand US dollars a year?’
Vroom nodded. I tried to convert hundred thousand US dollars to rupees
and divide it by twelve to get the monthly salary. There were too many zeros
and it was a tough calculation to do in my head. I racked my brain for a few
seconds.
‘Stop calculating in rupees,’ Vroom said and smiled.
‘I’m not doing any calculations.’
‘Priyanka’s got a catch. I’m telling you,’ Vroom repeated.
He paused and looked at me. His eyes were wet like a puppy’s brown
and kind to look at. I could see why girls flocked to him. It was the eyes.
‘I’m going to ask you a question. Will you answer it honestly?’ Vroom
said.
‘Sure.’
‘Are you upset she is getting married? I know you have feelings for her.’
‘No,’ I said and stated laughing. ‘I just find it a bit strange. But I
wouldn’t say I’m upset. That is too strong a word. It is not like we’re going
around now or anything. No sir, I am not upset.’
Vroom waited while I continued to laugh exaggeratedly. When I’d
stopped he said, ‘Okay, don’t bullshit me. What happened to your re-proposal
plans?’
I remained silent.
It’s okay man. You can tell me.’
I sighed, ‘Well, of course I feel for her. But they are just vestigial
feelings.’
‘Vesti what?’
‘Like vestigial organs. They serve no purpose or value. But they can give
you a pain in the appendix. Same with my feelings for Priyanka. I’m supposed
to have moved on, but obviously it hasn’t happened. Meanwhile, MR NRI
comes and gives me a kick in the rear end,’ I said.
‘Talk to her. Don’t tell me you’re not going to,’ Vroom said and exhaled
two smoke rings.
‘I was planning to real soon. I though we’d submit the website user
manual and hopefully that would have made it easier for Boston to approve
my promotion. How did I know there would be milk cake distribution tonight?
How was it by the way? I didn’t touch it.’
‘Milk cake was great. Never sulk when food is at stable dude. Anyways,
screw that. Listen, you still have some time. She has only said yes.’
‘I hope so. Though even as team leader, it’s hard to compete with Mr
Microsoft,’ I said.
We remained silent for a few more seconds. Vroom spoke again.
‘Yeah man, Girls are strategic. They’ll take about love and romance and
all, that crap—but when it comes to doing the deal, they will choose the
fattest chicken,’ he said, and bunched up the leaf ashtray so it became like a
bowl.
‘I guess I can only become fat, not a fat chicken,’ I said.
‘Yeah, you need to be far, fresh and fluffy. Girls know their stuff. That’s
why you shouldn’t feel so upset. We aren’t good husband material—just
accept it.’
‘Thanks Vroom, that really makes my day.’ I said. I did agree with
Vroom though. It was evolution. Maybe nature wanted dimple-cheeked,
software-geek, mini-Ganesh babies. They were of far more value to society
than depressed, good-for-nothing junior Shyams.
‘And anyway, it’s the girl who always gets to choose. Men propose and
women accept the proposal or, as in many cases, reject it.’
It’s true. Girls go around rejecting men like it is their birthright. They
have no idea how much it hurts us. I read once (or maybe saw it during one of
my Discovery Channel phases) that the reason for this is that the female of
the species has to beat their offspring with a lot of effort. Hence they choose
their mates carefully. Meanwhile, men dance around, spend cash, make them
laugh, write stupid poems, anything to win them over. The only species where
courting works in reverse is the sea horse. Instead of the females, the male
sea horse bears the offspring: they carry baby sea horse eggs in their pockets.
Guess what? The female sea horses are always hitting on the males, while the
latter pucker their noses and get to pick the cutest female. I wished if I were
a sea horse. How hard can it be to carry a couple of eggs in a backpack?
Vroom interrupted my thoughts.
‘But who knows. Priyanka isn’t like other girls, or maybe she is after all.
Either way, don’t give up man. Try to get her back,’ Vroom said and patted
my shoulder in encouragement.
‘Speaking of back, shouldn’t we be heading back to the bay?’ I said and
looked at my watch, it’s 11:45 p.m.’
We passed the Western Computers main bay as we returned from the
parking lot. The main bay sounded like a noisy school, except the kids
weren’t talking to each other, but to customers. Monitor problem, viruses,
strange error message—there was nothing Connexions could not help you
with.
‘Still looks busy,’ I said.
‘Not at all. People have told me call traffic is down forty percent. I think
they’ll cut a lot of staff, or worst case scenario, cut all people and shift the
client to the Bangalore center.’
‘Bangalore? What will happen here?’ I said.
They’ll close this poorly managed madhouse down. What else? That is
what happens when people like Bakshi spend half their time playing politics
with other managers,’ Vroom said. He spotted a good looking girl in the
Western Computers bay and pointed her out to me.
 ‘Close down!’ I said, after studying the pretty girl for half a second.
‘Are you serious, what will happen to the hundreds of jobs here?’
‘Like they care. You think Bakshi cares?’ Vroom said and shrugged his
lanky shoulders.
‘Crap happens in life. It could happen tonight,’ Vroom said as we
reached the WASG.
#9
The systems guy was under the table again.
‘No calls yet. They’ve called for a senior engineer,’ Priyanka said.
‘It’s an external fault. Some cables are damaged I think. Gurgaon is
going nuts with constructions,’ the systems guy said, as he emerged from
under the table.
‘Bakshi knows?’ I said.
‘I don’t know,’ Priyanka said.
Vroom and I sat down at our desk.
‘It’s not too bad. Nice break,’ Esha said as she filed her nails with a
weirdly shaped nail cutter.
Priyanka’s cell phone began to rung startling everyone.
‘Who is calling you so late?’ Radhika said, still knitting her scarf.’
‘Long distance I think,’ Priyanka said and smiled.
‘Oooh!’ Esha squealed, like a two-year-old on a bounce castle. What is
the big deal about a long distance phone call? I thought.
‘Hi Ganesh. I just switched my phone on,’ Priyanka said. ‘I can’t believe
you called so soon.’
I could not hear Ganesh’s response. Thank God.
‘Fifteen times? I can’t believe you tried my number fifteen times…so
sorry,’ Priyanka said, looking idiotic with happiness.
‘Yes I’m at work. But it’s really chaotic today. Systems are down…
Hello?... How come you’re working on Thanksgiving? Oh, nice of the Indians to
offer to work…hello? Priyanka said.
‘What happened?’ Esha said.
‘There’s hardly any network,’ Priyanka said, shaking her phone as if
that would improve the reception. I felt like shaking her.
‘We’re in the basement. Nothing comes into this black hole,’ Vroom
said. He was surfing the internet, and was on the Formula I website.
‘Landline,’ Esha said, pointing to the spare phone on one desk. Every
team in Connexions had a spare independent landline at their desk for
emergency use. ‘Tell him to call on the landline.’
‘Here?’ Priyanka asked, looking to me for permission.
Normally this would be unthinkable, but our systems were down so it
did not really matter. Also, I did not want to look like a sore loser preventing
a new couple from starting their romance.
I nodded and pretended to be absorbed by my computer screen. As the
ad-hoc team leader, I had some powers. I could approve any personal calls. I
could also listen in on any line on the desk on my headset. However, I could
not listen in on the independent emergency phone. Not unless. I went under
the table and tapped it.
‘Tap the landline,’ a faint voice echoed in my head.
‘No, it’s wrong,’ I said and mentally reprimanded myself.
I could still hear one side of the conversation though.
‘Hello… Ganesh, call the landline… yes 2246343 and 11, for Delhi… Call
after ten minutes, our boss might come on his rounds soon… I knew ten
minutes is six hundred seconds, I’m sure you’ll survive, she laughed
uncontrollably and hung up. When women laugh non-stop, they’re flirting. I
hate Priyanka.
‘He sounds so cute,’ Esha said, stretching the last word to five times its
normal length.
‘Enough is enough, I’m going to call Bakshi. We need to fix the systems,’
I said and stood up. I couldn’t bear the systems guy lurking under the table
anymore. More than that, I could not bear six-hundred-seconds-without-you
survival stories.
I was walking towards Bakshi’s office when I noticed him walking
towards me.
‘Agent Sam, why aren’t you on your desk?’ Bakshi said.
‘I was looking for you sir,’ I said.
‘I’m all yours,’ Bakshi said as his face broke into a smile. He came and
placed his arm around my shoulder. I hate it when he does that.
Bakshi and I returned to WASG. Everyone heard the sound of Bakshi’s
heavy steps. Radhika hid her knitting gear under the table. Esha pout her nail
file in her bag. Vroom opened his screen to an empty MSWord document.
The systems guy came out from under the table and called his boss, the
head of the IT department.
‘Looks like we have technology issues here’ Bakshi said and the systems
guy nodded his head.
The head of IT came soon after. He and the systems guy discussed geek
stuff between themselves in so-called English. When the discussions were
over, the IT head ranted out incomprehensible technical details to us. I only
understood that the system was under a strain: eighty percent of the WASG
capacity was damaged, and the remaining twenty percent could not handle
the current load.
‘Hmmm,’ Bakshi said, his left hand rubbing his chin ‘hmmm…that’s
really bad, isn’t it?’
‘So, what do you want us to do?’ the IT head asked.
All eyes turned to Bakshi, it was a situation Bakshi hated—to be asked to
take a decision or recommend action.
‘Hmmm,’ Bakshi said and flexed his knees, knee by slow knee, to buy
time. ‘We really need a methodical game plan here.’
‘We can shut down the WASG system tonight. Western Computers main
bay is running fine anyway,’ the junior IT guy suggested.
‘But, WASG has one lost all its capacity. Boston won’t like it if we shut
the bay,’ the IT head said, referring to the Western Computers and appliances
headquarters in Boston.
‘Hmmm,’ Bakshi said again and pressed a sweaty palm on my desk.
‘Upsetting Boston will not be good at this time. We are already on a slippery
slope at Connexions. Let’s try to be proactively oriented here.’
Vroom couldn’t resist a snigger at Bakshi’s jargon. He looked away and
clenched his teeth.
‘Sir, can I make a suggestion,’ I said, even though I should have kept my
trap shut.
‘What?’ Bakshi said.
‘We could take Bangalore’s help,’ I said, referring to the location of the
second Western Appliances and Computers call center in India.
‘Bangalore?’ Bakshi and the IT head said in unison.
‘Yes sir. It is thanksgiving and call volumes are low. So Bangalore will be
running light as well. If we pass most of our calls there, it will get busier for
them, but it won’t overload them. Meanwhile, we can handle a limited flow
here,’ I said.
‘That makes sense. We can easily switch the flow for a few hours. We
can fix the systems here in the morning,’ the junior IT guy said.
‘That’s fine,’ I said. ‘And people will start their Thanksgiving dinner in
the States soon, so call volumes will fall even more.’
Everyone on the desk looked at me and nodded. Secretly they were
thrilled at the easy shift tonight. Bakshi, however, had fallen into silent
contemplation.
‘Sir, you heard what Shyam said. Let’s ask Bangalore. That is our only
option,’ Priyanka said.
Bakshi remained silent and pondered for a few more seconds. I want to
know what he actually thinks in these moments.
‘See, the thing is,’ Bakshi said and paused again,’…aren’t we comparing
apples to oranges here?’
‘What?’ Vroom looked at Bakshi with a disgusted expression.
I wondered what Bakshi was talking about. Was I the apple? Was Delhi
the orange? What fruit was Bangalore?
‘I have an idea. Why don’t we use Bangalore?’ Bakshi said and snapped
his fingers.
‘But that is what Shyam—‘ the junior IT guy began, but Bakshi
interrupted him. Poor junior IT guy, he isn’t familiar with Bakshi’s ways.
‘See, it sounds unusual, but sometimes you have to do out-of-the-box
thinking. Bakshi said and tapped his head in self-administration.
‘Yes sir,’ I said. ‘That is a good idea. We have it all sorted now.’
‘Good,’ the IT guys said and started playing with the computer menus.
Bakshi had a smug smile on his face.
Before the IT guys left they told us the WASG call volume would be
super-light, maybe even less than twenty calls an hour. We were overjoyed,
but kept a straight face before Bakshi.
‘See, problem solved,’ Bakshi said and spread his hands. ‘That is what
I’m here for.’
‘Lucky us, sir,’ Priyanka said.
We thought Bakshi would leave, but he had other plans. ‘Shyam, as you
are free tonight, can you help me with some strategic documents? You know,
it will give you some exposure.’ 
‘What is it, Sir?’ I said, not happy about sacrificing my night.
‘These are ten copies of the monthly data sheets I just printed out,’
Bakshi said and held up some documents in his right hand. ‘For some reason
the sheets didn’t come in order. It is ten page ones, then page twos and so
on. Can you help fix this?’
‘You didn’t collate them. You can choose the option when you print,’
Vroom said.
‘You can choose to collate?’ Bakshi asked, as if we’d told him about an
option for brain transplants.
‘Ye,’ Vroom said and took some chewing gum from his drawer. He
popped a piece into his mouth. ‘Anyway, it is easier to take one printout and
photocopy the est. comes out stapled too.’
‘I need to upgrade my technical skills. Technology changes so fast,’
Bakshi said. ‘But Shyam, can you help arrange and staple them this time?’
‘Sure,’ I said. As if I had a choice.
Bakshi dumped the sheets on my table and left the room.
Priyanka looked at me with her mouth open.
‘What?’ I said.
‘I can’t believe it,’ She shook her head. ‘Why do you let him do this to
you?’
‘C’mon Priyanka, leave Shyam alone. Bakshi runs his life,’ Vroom said.
‘Exactly. Because he lets him. Why can’t people stand up for
themselves?’
 I don’t know why I can’t stand up for myself, but I definitely can’t stand
Priyanka’s rhetorical questions. She doesn’t understand the point, and then
asks the world out aloud.
I tried to ignore her. However, her words had affected me. It was
difficult to focus on the sheets. I stacked the first set and was about to staple
them when Vroom said, He can’t take on Bakshi right now. Not at this time,
Priyanka, they are in the mood to fire people.’
‘Yes thanks Vroom. Can someone explain reality? I need to make a
living. I don’t have Mr Microsoft PowerPoint waiting for me in Seattle,’ I said
and pressed the stapler hard. I missed and staple pin pierced my finger.
‘Oww!’ I screamed loud enough to uproot Military Uncle from his desk.
‘What happened?’ Priyanka said and stood up.
I lifted my finger to show the streaks of blood. A couple of drops split
onto Bakshi’s document.
The girls squealed ‘eews’ in rapid succession.
‘Symbolism, dude. Giving your life blood to this job,’ Vroom said. ‘Can
someone give this guy a band-aid before he makes me throw up?’
‘I have a band-aid,’ Esha said as the girls came up and surrounded e.
Western love to repair an injury—as long as it is not to gross.
‘That’s bad,’ Esha said, taking out a band-aid from her bag. She had like
fifty of them.
‘It’s nothing. Just a minor cut,’ I said. I clenched my teeth hard as it
hurt like hell.
Priyanka took out a few tissues from her bag. She held my finger and
cleaned the blood around it.
‘Ouch!’ I screamed.
‘Oh, the staple is still in there,’ she said. ‘We need forceps. Forceps
anyone?’
Esha had forceps in her handbag, which I thin k she uses to rip her
eyebrows out. Girl’s handbags have enough to make a survival kit for
Antarctica.
Priyanka held the forceps and went to work my finger with a surgeon’s
concentration.
‘Here’s the culprit,’ she said as she pulled out a staple pin drenched in
blood. I swear, ever since I’ve developed a fear of staple—staplophobia, you
can call it.
Priyanka wiped my figure and then struck the band-aid on it. With no
more fun, bloody sights to see, everyone returned to their seats. I went back
to collating sheets. Perhaps my abilities really did lie in mindless labor.
Esha and Radhika began talking about Bakshi.
‘He had no idea what IT was saying,’ Radhika said.
‘Yeah, but did you see his face?’ Esha said. ‘He looked like he was doing
a CBI investigation.’
I looked at Priyanka. The word CBI brought back memories. Even as I
collation Bakshi’s sheets, my mind drifted to Pandara Road.
 # 10
My Past Dates with
Priyanka—II
Havemore Restaurant, Pandara Road
Nine months before this night
‘Shyam,’ Priyanka said as she tried to push me away. ‘This is not the
place to do these things. This is Pandara Road.’
‘Oh really,’ I said, refusing to move away. We were sitting on a corner
table. A carved wooden screen partially hid us. ‘What’s wrong with Pandara
Road?’ I said, continuing to kiss her.
‘This is a family place,’ she said; she spread a palm on my face and
pushed me back again, firmly this time.
‘So, families get made by doing these things.’
‘Very funny. Anyway, you chose this place. I hope the food is as good as
you said it was.’
‘It’s the best in Delhi,’ I said. We had come to Havemore Restaurant,
one of the half-dozen overpriced but excellent restaurants on Pandara Road.
We had done enough museums. After the Rail Museum, we had gone to the
Planetarium (the dark empty theatre with its romantic possibilities was fun, I
admit), the Natural History Museum, the Doll Museum and the Science
museum. According to Priyanka, museum offered good privacy, great gardens
and cheap canteens.
‘A hundred and thirty bucks for daal’ Priyanka exclaimed as she opened
the menu. Her kohl-lined eyes expression of a stunned cartoon character. It
was embarrassing, especially as the waite.- was already at out table to take
the order.
‘Just order okay?’ I said in a hushed voice.
Priyanka took five more minutes to place the order. Here is how she
decides. Step two: r-sort the cheaper ones based on calories.
‘One naan, no butter. Yellow daal,’ she said as I glared at her.
‘Okay, not yellow, black daal,’ she said. ‘And…’
‘And one shahi paneer,’ I said.
‘You always order the same thing, black daal and shahi paneer,’ she
made a face.
‘Yes, same girl, same food. Why bother experimenting when you already
have the best,’ I said.
‘You are so cute,’ she said. Her smile made her eyes crinkle. She
pinched my cheeks and fed me a little vinegar-onion from the table. Hardly
romantic, but I liked it.
She moved he hand away quickly when she saw a family being led to the
table adjacent to us. The family consisted of a young married couple, their
little daughters and an old lady. The daughters were twins, probably four
years old.
The entire family had morose faces and no one said a word to each
other. I wondered why they had come out when they could be grumpy for
free at home.
‘Anyway,’ Priyanka said, ‘what’s the news?’
‘Not much, Vroom and I are busy with the troubleshooting website.’
‘Cool, how’s it coming along?’
‘Really well. Nothing fancy though: the best websites are simple. Vroom
even checked out many sites meant for mentally handicapped people. He said
if we can model it on such websites. Americans will surely be able to use it.’
‘They’re not that dumb,’ Priyanka laughed. ‘Americans invented
computers remembers remember?’
The waiter came with our food.
‘Yeah, American has like ten smart guys. The rest call us at night,’ I
said, as I tore a piece of my naan and dipped it in the daal.
‘I agree the people who call us are pretty thick. I’m like—figure out
where the power button is, hello/’ she said.
She put micro-portions of food on her plate.
‘Eat properly,’ I said. ‘Stop dieting all the time like Esha.’
‘I am not that hungry,’ she said, even as I forcefully gave her human
portions of food.
‘Hey, did I tell you about Esha?’ Don’t tell anyone,’ she said, her voice
dipping, eyebrow dancing.
I shock my head. ‘You love to gossip. Don’t you? Your name should be
Miss Gossip FM 99.5,’ I said.
‘I never gossip,’ she said, waving a fork at me solemnly. ‘Oh my God,
the food is so good here.’
My chest inflated with pride as if he had spent all night cooking the
dishes myself.
‘Of Course you love to gossip. Whenever someone starts with “don’t you
anymore’, that to me is a juicy tit-bit of gossip coming,’ I said.
Priyanka blushed and the tip of the nose turned tomato-red. She looked
cute as hell. I would have kissed her right then, but the grumpy family next to
us was beginning to argue murmurs. I did not want to spoil the somber
ambience for them.
‘Okay so may be I gossip, but only a little bit,’ Priyanka relented. ‘But I
read somewhere, gossip is good for you.
‘Oh really?’ I teased.
‘Yes, it’s a sign you’re interested in people and care for them.’
‘That is so lame,’ I burst out laughing, pointing my spoon at her.
‘Anyway, what about Esha. I know Vroom has the hots for her. But does she
like him/’
‘No Shyam, which is old news. She has rejected Vroom’s proposal
before. The latest is that she had signed up for the Femina Miss India contest.
Last week she is five-five, the minimum is five-six. Radhika saw her cry in the
toilet.’
‘Oh wow! Miss India?’
‘C’mon, she is not that pretty. She should really stop this modeling trip
of hers. God, she is so thin though. Okay, I’m not eating anymore.’ She
pushed her plate away.
‘Stupid, eat. You want to be happy on thin?’ I said, pushing her plate
back towards her.
‘Thin.’
‘Shut up, eat properly. The name of the restaurant should tell you
[something. And s for Esha, well too bad Miss India didn’t work out. However,
trying doesn’t hurt,’ I said.
‘Well, she was crying. So it hurt her. After all, she’s come to Delhi
against her parent’s wishes. It’s not easy struggling alone,’ she said.
I nodded.
We finished our meal and the waiter reappeared like a genie to clear
our plates.
‘Dessert?’ I said
‘No way. I’m too full,’ Priyanka said, placing her hand on her neck to
show just how full. She is way too dramatic sometimes, just like her mom. Not
that I dare tell her that.
‘Okay, one kulfi please,’ I said to the waiter.
‘No, order gulab jamun, no?’ she said.
‘Huh? I thought you didn’t want…okay, one gulab jamun please.’
‘Same. We haven’t had a cry fest since last week’s showdown, so that
alone is a reason to celebrate. Maybe I will have half a gulab jamun.’
‘And what happened last week?’
‘Last week? Oh yes, my uncles were over for dinner. So picture this:
dinner ends and we are all having butterscotch ice cream at the dinning table.
One uncle mentioned that my cousin was getting married to a doctor, a
cardiac surgeon or something,’ Priyanka said.
The water came and gave us the gulab jamuns. I took a bite.
‘Ouch, careful, these are hot,’ I said, blowing air out ‘Anyway, what
happened then?’
‘So I’m eating my ice cream and my mother screams “Priyanka, make
sure you marry someone well settled”.’ The latter phrase was said in falsetto.
‘I’m going to be a team leader soon,’ I said and fed her a slice of gulab
jamun.
‘Relax, Shyam,’ Priyanka said, as she took a bite and patted my arm. ‘it
has nothing to do with you. The point is how could she spring it on me in front
of everyone. Like, why can’t just have ice cream like the others. Why does
my serving have to come with this hot guilt sauce. My younger brother,
nobody says anything to him while he stuffs his face.’
I laughed and signaled for the bill.
‘So what did you do then?’ I said.
‘Nothing. I slammed my spoon down on the plate and left the room.’
‘Major drama, you are no less,’ I said.
‘Guess what she says then, to everyone, “This is what I get for bringing
her up and loving her so much. She doesn’t care. I nearly died in labour when
she was born, but she doesn’t care”.’
I laughed uncontrollably as Priyanka did an outstanding imitation of her
mother. The bill arrived and my eyebrows shot up for a second as I paid the
four hundred and sixty three bucks.
We stood up to leave and the grumpy family’s voices reached us.
‘What to do? Since the day this woman came to our house, our family’s
fortunes have been ruined,’ the old woman was saying. ‘The Agra girl’s side
were offering to set up a full clinic. I don’t know where our brains were
then.’
The daughter-in-law had tears in her eyes. She had not touched her
food. The man was eating nonchalantly.
‘Look at her now, sitting there with a stiff face. Go, go to hell now. Not
only did you not bring anything, now you have dumped these two girls like
two curses on me,’ the mother-in-law said.
I looked at the little girls. They had identical plaints with cute pink
ribbons in them. The girls were holding one hand of their mother each. They
looked scared.
Priyanka was starting at them. I noticed they had ordered kulfi and
wondered if I should have done the same and at least saved my now scalded
tongue.
‘Say something now, you silent statue,’ the mother-in-law said and
shook the daughter-in-law’s shoulders.
‘Why doesn’t she say anything?’ Priyanka whispered to me.
‘Because she can’t,’ I said. ‘When you have a bad boss, you can’t say
anything.’
‘Who will pay for these two curses? Say something now,’ the mother-inlaw
said. The daughter-in-law’s tears came down faster.
‘I’ll say something,’ Priyanka shouted, facing the mother-in-law.
The grumpy family turned to look at us in astonishment. I looked for a
deep to hide myself from the embarrassment.
‘Who are you?’ she husband asked, probably his first words during the
entire meal
‘We’ll worry about that later,’ Priyanka said, ‘but who the hell are you/
her husband I presume?’
‘Huh? Yes I am. Madam, this is a family matter,’ he said.
‘Oh really? You call this is a family? Doesn’t look like a family to me,’
Priyanka said. ‘I just see an old shrew and a loser wimp who are troubling
these girls. Don’t you have any shame? Is this what you married her for?’
‘See, here is another one,’ the mother-in-law said. ‘Look at the girls of
today” don’t know how to talk—look at her, eyes made up like a heroine.’
‘The young girls know how to talk and behave. It is you old ones who
need to be taught a lesson. These are your granddaughters, and you are
calling them curses?’ Priyanka said, her nose a cuter red than before. I
wanted to takes picture of that nose.
‘Whom are you madam? What is your business here?’ the husband said,
this time in a firmed voice.
‘I’ll tell you who I am,’ Priyanka said and fumbled in her handbag. She
took out her call center id card and flashed it for a nanosecond. ‘Priyanka
Sinha, CBI, Women’s Cell.’
‘What?’ the husband said, in half-disbelief.
‘What is your car number?’ Priyanka said, talking in a flat voice.
‘What?’ Why?’ the bewildered husband asked.
‘Or should I go outside to check,’ she said and glanced at the keys on
the table. ‘Santro, isn’t it?’
‘DGI 463. Why?’ the husband said.
Priyanka took out her cell phone and pretended to call a number.
‘Hello? Sinha here. Please retrieve records on DGI 463...yes...Santro…thanks.’
‘Madam, what is going on?’ the husband said, his voice quivering.
‘Three years. Harassing women in punishable for three years. Quick
trial, no appeal,’ Priyanka said and started t the mother-in-law.
The old woman pulled one of the twin granddaughter onto her lap.
‘What? Madam this is just a f-f-f-family affair and…’ the husband
stammered.
‘Don’t’ say family!’ Priyanka said, her voice loud.
‘Madam,’ the mother-in-law said, her tone now sweet, as if someone
had soaked her vocal cords in gulab jamuns, ‘we are just here to have a meal.
I don’t even let her cook see, we just had—’
‘—Shut up! We have your records now. We will keep track. If you mess
around, your son and you can have lost of meals together—in jail.’
‘Sorry madam,’ the husband said with folded hands. He asked for the
bill and fumbled for cash. Within a minute, they had paid and left.
I looked at Priyanka with my mouth open.
‘Don’t say anything,’ she said, ‘let’s go.’
‘CBI?’ I said.
‘Don’t. Let’s go.’
We sat in the Qualis I had borrowed from the call center driver.
‘Stupid old witch,’ Priyanka said. I started to drive. Five minutes later,
Priyanka turned to me. ‘Okay, you can say what you want now.’
‘I love you,’ I said.
‘What? Why this now?’
‘Because, I love it when you stand up for something that you feel for.
And that you do such a horrible job of acting like a CBI inspector. I love it
when you want to order the cheapest dishes only because I’m paying for
them. I love the kohl in your eyes. I love it when your eyes light up when you
have gossip for me. I love it that you say you don’t want dessert and then ask
me to change mine so you can have half. I love your stories about your
mother. I love it that you believe in me and are patient with my career.
Actually, you know what, Priyanka?’ I said.
‘What?’
‘I may not be a heart surgeon—but the one little heart I have, I have
given it to you.’
Priyanka laughed aloud and put her hand on her face. ‘Sorry,’ she said
and shook her head, still laughing. ‘Sorry, you were doing so well, but for the
heart surgeon line. Now, that is seriously cheesy.’
‘You know what,’ I said and removed one hand from the steering wheel
to tweak her nose. ‘They should put you in jail for killing romantic lines.’
#11
‘I can’t believe this,’ Radhika said and threw her mobile phone on her
desk, breaking up my Pandara Road dream.
Everyone turned to look at her. She covered her face with her hands
and took a couple of deep breaths.
‘What’s up,’ Priyanka said.
‘Nothing,’ Radhika said and heaved a sigh. She looked upset, but also
younger at the same time. Five years ago, Radhika must have been pretty, I
thought.
‘Tell no,’ Esha said.
‘It’s Anuj. Sometimes he can be so unreasonable.’ She said and showed
her phone to Esha. On the screen was an SMS message.
‘What is it?’ Priyanka said.
‘Read it out,’ Radhika said as she fumbled through her bag for her antimigraine
pills. ‘damn, I only have one pill left.’
‘Really? Okay.’ Esha said and started reading the message:
’Show elders respect. Act like a daughter-in-law should.
Goodnight.’
‘What did I do wrong/ I was in a hurry, that is all, Radhika mumbled to
herself as she took her pill with a sip of water.
Esha put a hand on her shoulder.
‘What happened?’ Esha asked softly. Women do this so well: a few
seconds ago she was squealing in excitement over Ganesh, now she was
whispering in concern over Anuj.
‘Anuj is in Kolkata on tour. He called home and my mother-in-law told
him “Radhika made a face when I told her to crush the almonds a bit finer”.
Can you believe it? I was running to catch the Qualis and still made her milk,’
Radhika said and started to press her forehead.
‘Is this what mom and son talk about?’ Priyanka said.
Radhika continued, ‘And then she told him, “I am old, if the pieces are
too big they will choke my food pipe. Maybe Radhika is trying to kill me.” Why
would she say something so horrible?’
‘And you’re still knitting a scarf for her?’ Vroom said, pointing at the
knotting needles.
‘Trust me, being a daughter-in-law is harder than being a model,’
Radhika said. The pill was starting to have an effect: her face was looking
calm again. ‘Anyway, leave my boring life and me. What’s up? Ganesh calling
soon or what?’
‘Are you okay?’ Esha said, still holding Radhika’s arm.
‘Yes, I’m fine. Sorry guys, I overreacted. It’s just a little
miscommunication between Anuj and me.’
‘Looks like your mother-in-law likes melodrama. She should meet you
mother,’ Priyanka said.
‘Really?’ Radhika said.
‘Oh yes. She is the Miss Universe of melodrama. We cry together at least
once a week. Though today, she is on cloud nine,’ Priyanka said. She pulled
the landline closer to her.
My attention was diverted by a call flashing on my screen.
‘I’ll take it,’ I said, raising my hand. ‘Western Appliances, Sam speaking,
how may I help you?’
It was one of my weird calls of the night. The caller was from Virginia
and was having trouble defrosting his fridge. It took me four minutes to figure
out the reason. Turns out the caller was a ‘big person’, which is what
Americans call fat people. Hence his fingers were too thick to turn the tiny
knob in the fridge’s compartment that would activate the defrosting
mechanism. I suggested that he use a screwdriver or a knife. Fortunately, that
solution worked after seven attempts.
‘Thanks you for calling Western Appliances, sir,’ I said and ended the
call.
‘More politeness, agent Sam. Be more courteous,’ I heard Bakshi’s voice
and felt his heavy breath on my neck.
‘Sir, you again?’ I said and turned around. Bakshi’s face was as shiny as
ever. So oily, he probably slipped off his pillow every night.
‘Sorry, I forgot something important,’ he said. ‘Have you guys done by
the Western Computers website manual? I am finally sending the project
report to Boston.’
‘Yes sir. Vroom and I finished it yesterday.’ I said and took out a copy
from my drawer.
‘Hmm,’ Bakshi said as he scanned the cover sheet.
Western computers troubleshooting Website
User Manual and Project Details
Developed by Connexions, Delhi
Shyam Mehra and Varun Malhotra
(Sam Mason and Victor Mell)
‘Do you have a soft copy that you can email me/’ Bakshi said. ‘Boston
wants it urgently.’
‘Yes sir,’ Vroom said, pointing to his computers, ‘I have it stored here.
I’ll send it to you.’
‘Also, did you dot eh collation, Sam?’
‘Yes sir,’ I said and passed him the ten sets.
‘Excellent. I empowered you, and you delivered the output. Actually, I
have another document, the board meeting invite. Can you help?’
‘What do I have to do?’ I said.
‘Here is a copy,’ Bakshi said and gave me a five-page document. ‘I
didn’t print more this time. Can you Xerox ten copies for me please? My
secretary is off today.’
‘Err. Sure Sir, just Xeroxing right?’
Bakshi nodded.
‘Sir,’ Vroom said, ‘what is the board meeting for?’
‘Nothing, just routine management issues,’ Bakshi said.
‘Are people going to get fired?’ Vroom asked, his direct question making
everyone spring to attention.
‘Err… ‘Bakshi said, at his usual loss for words when asked something
meaningful.
‘There are rumors in the Western Computers main bay. We just want to
know it we will be fine,’ Vroom said.
‘Western Appliances won’t be affected, right/’ Esha said.
Bakshi took a deep breath and said, ‘I can’t say much. All I can say is we
are under pressure to right size ourselves.’
‘Right size?’ Radhika asked in genuine confusion.
‘That means people are getting fired, right?’ Vroom said. Right size
never meant otherwise.
Bakshi did not respond.
‘Sir, we need to increase our sales force to get new clients. Firing
people is not the answer,’ Vroom said, with a boldness that was high even by
his standards.
Bakshi had a smirk on his face as he turned to Vroom. He put his hand
on Vroom’s shoulder. ‘I like your excitement Mr Victor,’ he said, ‘but a
seasoned management has to study all underlying variable and come up with
an optimal solution. It is not so simple.’
‘But sir, we can get more…’ Vroom was saying as Bakshi patted his
shoulder twice and left.
Vroom waited to ensure that Bakshi was out of the room before he
spoke again.
‘this is insanity. Bakshi’s fucked up the place and they are firing
innocent agents he said, his voice at shouting levels.
‘Stay clam,’ I said, and started assembling the sheets.
‘Yes stay calm. Like Mr Xerox Boy here—finds acceptance in everything,’
Priyanka said.
‘Excuse me,’ I said looking up. ‘Are you talking about me?’
Priyanka kept quiet. I felt agitated inside and just had to respond.
‘What is your problem? I come here, make fifteen grand a month and go
home. It shucks that people are being fired, and I am trying to do my best to
save my job. Overall, yes I accept my situation. And Vroom, before I forget,
can you email Bakshi the user manual please?’
 ‘I’m doing it, Vroom said, as he clicked his mouse, ‘though what is
happening here is still wrong.’
‘Don’t worry. We’ve done the website. We should be safe,’ I said.
‘You have pizza that often?’ Esha said.
‘Isn’t it unhealthy?’ Radhika asked. Despite the SMS argument, she was
back to knitting her scarf. Knitting habits die hard I guess.
‘No way. Pizzas are the ultimate balanced diet. Look at the contents:
grain in the curst, milk protein in the cheese, vegetables and meat as
toppings. It has all the food groups. I read it on the Internet—pizza is good for
you.’
‘You and your Net,’ Esha said. It was true. Vroom got all his information
off the internet—bikes, jobs, politics,, dating tips and, as I had just learnt,
pizza nutrition as well.
‘Pizzas are not healthy. I gain weight so fast if I have a lot of it,’
Priyanka said, ‘especially with my lifestyle. I hardly get time to exercise. On
top of that, I jut sit and work in a confined space.’
‘Priyanka’s last two words made my heart skip a beat. ‘Confined space’
means only one thing to me—that night at the 32nd Milestone disco.
#12
My Past Dates with
Priyanka—III
32nd Miltestone, Gurgaon Highway
Seven months before this night
I should not really call this one a date, since this time it was a group
thing with Vroom and Esha joining us. I argued earlier with Priyanka about
going out with work people, but she told me I should be less anti-social.
Vroom picked 32nd milestone and the girls agreed because the disc had no
door-bitch. According to Priyanka, a door-bitch is the hostess who stands
outside the disco. She screens every girl walking in, and if your waist is more
than twenty-four inches, or if you were not wearing something right out of an
item number, the door-bitch will raise an eyebrow at you like you are a fiftyyear-old
aunty.
‘Really? I never noticed those door girls before,’ I said as we took stools
at the bar.
‘It’s a girl to girl thing. They size you up, and unless you are drop dead
gorgeous, you get that mental smirk,’ Priyanka said.
‘So why should you care? You are gorgeous,’ I said. She smiled and
pinched my cheek.
‘Mental smirk? Girls and their coded communication. Anyway, drink
anyone?’ Vroom said.
‘Long Island Ice tea please,’ Esha said and I noticed how stunning she
looked with make-up. She wore a black fitted top and black pants. Her pants
were so tight, she would probably have to roll them down when removing
them.
‘Long Island? Want to get drunk quick or what?’ I said.
‘C’mon. I need to de-stress. I ran around like mad last month chasing
modeling agencies. Besides, I have to wash down last week’s one thousand
calls,’ Esha said.
‘That’s right. Twelve hundred calls for me,’ Vroom said. ‘Let’s all have
Long Islands.’
‘Vodka cran for me please,’ Priyanka said. She wore camel-colored
pants and a pistachio-green sequined kurti. I had given her the kurti as a gift
on her last birthday. She had just a hint of eyeliner and a gift on her last
birthday. I preferred it to Esha’s Asian Paints job.
‘Any luck with modeling assignments?’ I idly asked Esha.
‘Not much. I did meet talent agent. He said he would refer me to some
designers and fashion show producers. I need to be seen in those circles,’
Esha said as she pulled her top down to cover her navel.
Vroom went to the bartender to collect our drinks. I scanned the disc.
The place had two levels: a dance floor on the mezzanine and a lounge bar on
the first floor. A remixed version of Dil Chahta Hai played in the background.
As it was Saturday night, the disc had more than three hundred customers.
They were all rich, or at least had rich friends who could afford drinks at over
Rs 300 a cocktail. Our budget was a lavish thousand bucks each: a treat for
making it through the extremely busy summer period at the call center.
I noticed some stick-thin models on the dance floor. Their stomachs
were so flat, If they swallowed a pill you would probably see an outline of it
when it landed inside. Esha’s looks are similar, except she is a bit short.
‘Check it out. She is totally anorexic. I can bet on it,’ Priyanka said,
pointing to a pale-complexioned model on the dance floor. She wore a top
without any sleeves or neck or collar. I guess the girls call it ‘off-shoulder’.
Defying physics, it did not slip off, though most men waited patiently.
The pale-complexioned model turned, displaying a completely bare
back.
‘Wow, I wish I were that thin. But, oh my god, look at what she is
wearing,’ Esha said.
‘I can’t believe she is not wearing a bra, must be totally flat,’ Priyanka
said,
‘Girls’ I said.
‘Yes? Esha and Priyanka turned to me.
‘I’m bored. Can you choose more inclusive conversation topics,’ I
pleaded. I looked for Vroom, he had collected the drinks and was waving
manically at us for help.
‘I’ll go,’ Esha said and went over to Vroom.
Finally, to my relief, it was only Priyanka and I.
‘So,’ she said as she leaned forward to peck at my lips. ‘You’re feeling
left out with our girlie talk?’
‘Well, this was supposed to be a date. I forced myself to come with
them. I haven’t caught up with you in ages.’
‘I told you, Vroom asked me and I didn’t want to be anti-social,’
Priyanka said as she ruffled my hair. ‘But we’ll go out for a walk in a bit. I
want to be alone with you too, you know?’
‘Pleas, let’s go soon.’
‘Sure, but they’re here now,’ Priyanka said as Vroom and Esha arrived.
Vroom passed us our drinks. We said ‘cheers’, and tried to sound lively and
happy, as everyone in a disc always should.
‘Congrats on the website guys. I heard it’s good,’ Esha said as he took a
sip.
‘The website is cool,’ Vroom said. ‘The test customers love it. No more
dialing. And it’s so simple—just right for those spoon-feed-me Americans.’
‘So, promotion finally coming for Mr Shyam here,’; Priyanka said. I
noticed she had finished a third of her drink in just two sips.
‘Now Mr Shyam’s promotion is another story,’ Vroom said. ‘Maybe My
Shyam would like to tell it himself.’
‘Please man. Some other time,’ I said even as Priyanka looked at me
expectantly.
‘Okay, well Bakshi said he is talking to Boston to release headcount. But
it will take a while.’
‘Why can’t you just be firm with him?’ Priyanka said.
‘Like how? How can you be firm with your own boss?’ I said, my voice
loud with irritation.
 ‘Cool it guys,’ Vroom said. ‘It’s party night and—‘
A big noise interrupted our conversation. We noticed a commotion on
the dance floor as the DJ turned off the music.
‘What’s up?’ Vroom said and we all went towards the dance floor.
A fight had broken out on the floor. A gang of drunken friends had
thought someone had pawed one of the girls with them. They accused that
someone else and grabbed his collar. Soon, Mr Accused’s own gang came to
his defense. As the dance floor was too noisy for vocal arguments, people
expressed themselves only with fists and kicks. The music stopped when
someone knocked one guy flat on the floor. Several others were on top of
each other. Bouncers finally disentangled everyone and restored peace. A
stretcher emerged to carry away the knocked-out guy.
‘Man, I wish it had gone on a bit longer,’ Vroom said.
It’s true. The only thing better than watching beautiful people in a disc
is watching a fight. A fight means the party is totally rocking.
Five minutes later the music was back and occupying the floor again was
the anorexic girl’s brigade.
‘That is what happens to kids with rich dads and too much money,’
Vroom said.
‘C’mon Vroom. I thought you said money is good. That is how we’ll beat
the Americans, right?’ Priyanka said with the confidence that comes after
drinking a Long Island Iced Tea in seven minutes.
‘Yes, doesn’t money pay for your mobile phones, pizzas and discos?’ I
asked.
‘Yes, but the difference is that I’ve earned it. These rich kids, they have
no clue how hard it is to make cash,’ Vroom said and held up his glass. ‘This
drink is three hundred bucks—it takes me almost a full night of two hundred
irritating Americans screaming into my ear to earn it. Then I get this drink.
Which is full of ice-cubes anyway. These kids can’t make that comparison.’
‘Oh, I feel so guilty drinking this now, Priyanka said.
‘C’mon, you get good money. Significantly more than the eight grand
you made as a journalist trainee,’ I said.
‘Yes,’ Vroom said as he took a big hundred-and-twenty-rupees sip. ‘We
get paid well, fifteen thousand a month. Fuck, that is almost twelve dollars a
day. Wow I make as much a day as a US burger boy makes in two hours. Not
bad for my college degree. Not bad at all. Fucking nearly double of what I
made as a journalist anyway.’ He pushed his empty glass and it slid to the
other end of the table.
Everyone was silent for a minute. Vroom on his temper trip is
unbearable.
‘Stop being so depressed. Let’s dance,’ Esha said and tugged at Vroom’s
hand.
‘No,’ Vroom said.
‘Come for one song,’ Esha said and stood up from her stool.
‘Okay, but if anyone teases you, I’m not getting into a fight,’ Vroom
said.
‘Don’t worry, no one will. There are prettier girls here,’ Esha said.
‘I don’t think so. Anyway, let’s go,’ Vroom said as they went tot eh
dance floor. The song playing was Sharara Sharara, one of Esha’s favorites.
Priyanka and I watched them dance from our seats.
‘Want to go for a walk now?’ Priyanka said after a few minutes.
‘Sure,’ I said. We held hands and walked out of 32nd Milestone. The
bouncer at the door stamped our palms so that we could re-enter the disco.
We headed to the parking lot, as the music was softer there. My ears never
felt so nice.
‘It’s so calm here,’ Priyanka said. ‘I don’t like it when Vroom gets all
worked up. The boy needs to control his temper. Top much unchecked
aggression going on there.’
‘He’s young and confused. Don’t worry, life will slap him into shape. I
think he regrets moving to Connexions sometimes. Besides, he had not taken
his dad and mom’s separation so well. It shows now and then.’
‘Still, he should get a grip on himself. Get a steady girlfriend maybe,
that will help him relax.’
‘I think he likes Esha,’ I said.
‘I don’t know if Esha is interested. She’s quite focused on her modeling
trip.’
We reached our Qualis. I opened the door to take out a pack of
cigarettes.
‘No smoking near me,’ she said and grabbed the pack from me.
‘See, maybe it is not such a good idea to have a steady girlfriend,’ I
said.
‘Really? So Mr Shyam is having second thoughts?’ she said, tilting her
head.
‘No,’ I said, and opened the Qualis again. I took out a bottle.
‘What’s that?’ she asked.
‘Some Bacardi we keep handy. It’s three hundred bucks for a drink
inside, the cost of this whole bottle.
‘Cool. You guys are smart,’ Priyanka said and pulled at my cheek. Then
she took a sip from the bottle.
‘Careful. There’s no need to get drunk just because it’s free.’
‘Trust me. There is a need when you a have a psycho parent.’
‘What happened now?’
‘Nothing. I don’t want to talk about her today. Let’s do a shot.’ The
bottle’s lid acted as one cup, and I broke the top of a cigarette packet for the
other. We poured Bacardi into both and warmth traveled down from my lips
to my insides as we tossed down our first shot.
‘I’m sorry about the Bakshi comment I made inside,’ she said.
‘It’s alright. Doesn’t matter,’ I said, and wondered if we should do shot
number two now or later.
‘I can be a bitch sometimes. But I do make it up to you. I’m a loving
person, no?’ she said, high from mixing her drinks.
‘You’re just fine,’ I said and looked at her moist eyes. Her nose
puckered up a bit and I could have looked at it forever.
‘So, she said.
‘So what?’ I said, still hypnotized by her nose.
‘Why are you looking at me like that?’ she said and smiled.
‘Like what?’
‘The come-hither look. I see mischief in your eyes, mister,’ she said
playfully, grabbing both my hands.
‘There is no mischief—that’s just your imagination,’ I said.
‘We’ll see,’ she said and came up close. We hugged as she kissed me on
my neck.
‘Listen,’ she said.
‘What?’ I mumbled.
‘When was the last time we made love?’
‘Oh, don’t even ask. It’s really pathetic—over a month ago.’
It was true. The only place we made love was my house when it was
empty. However, recently my mom had started staying more at home because
of the cold. She had even given up her favorite past time of meeting relatives.
‘Have you ever made love in confined spaces?’
‘What?’ I said loudly, right into her ear.
‘Ouch!’ she said, rubbing her ear. ‘Hello? You heard me right?’
‘What are you talking about?’
‘Well, we have the time, soft music and a desolate spot.’
‘So?’
‘So, step into the Qualis, my friend,’ she said and opened the door. I
climbed into the backseat and she followed me.
Our Qualis was parked right behind the disco, and we could hear the
music of we were quiet. The song changed to Mahi Ve from the movie
Kaante.
‘I love this song,’ she said and sat astride my lap, facing me.
‘It’s a pole dancer song. You know that?’ I said.
‘yes. But I like the lyrics. Their love is true, but fate has something else
in store.’
‘I never focus on the lyrics.’
‘You just notice the scantily clad girls in the video,’ she said and ran her
fingers through my hair.
I stayed silent.
‘So, you didn’t answer my question—have you made love in confined
spaces?’ she said.
‘Priyanka, are you crazy or are you drunk?’
She unbuttoned the top few buttons of my shirt. ‘Both, Okay mister, the
thing about confined spaces is that you have to cooperate. Now move your
hands out of the way,’ she said.
We were quiet, apart from our breathing.
She confirmed that the windows were shut and ordered me to remove
my shirt. She took off her kurti first, and then slowly unhooked her bra.
‘be careful with your clothes, we’ll need to find them quickly
afterwards,’ she said.
‘Are you mad…’ I gasped even as I raised my arms so she could pull my
shirt over my head. She moved to keep my shirt aside and her foot landed on
my left baby toe.
‘Ouch!’ I screamed.
‘Oops, sorry,’ she said in a naughty-apologetic tone. As she moved her
foot away, her head hit the roof.
‘Ouch,’ she said. ‘Sorry, this isn’t as elegant as in the Titanic movie.’
‘It’s alright. Clumsy sex is better than choreographed sex. And certainly
better than no sex,’ I said as I pulled her close.
‘By the way, do you have a condom?’ she said.
‘Yes sir. We live in constant hope,’ I said as I pulled out my wallet.
We laughed as she embraced me. She started kissing me on my face. I
kissed her shoulders. In a few moments, I forgot I was in the company Qualis.
Twenty minutes later we collapsed in each other’s arms on the
backseat.
‘Amazing. That is simply amazing, Ms Priyanka.’
‘My pleasure, Sir,’ she said and winked at me. ‘Can we lie here and talk
for a while?’
‘Sure,’ I said, reaching for my clothes.
She cuddled me again after we had dressed.
‘Do you love me?’ she asked. Her voice was serious.
‘More than anybody else on this planet, and that includes me,’ I said,
caressing her hair.
‘You think I’m a caring person?’ she said. Her voice told me she was
close to tears.
‘Why do you keep asking me that?’ I said.
‘My mother was looking at our family album today. She stopped at a
picture of me when I was three years old: I’m sitting on a tricycle and my
mother is pushing me. She saw that picture, and you know what she said?’
‘What?’
‘She said I was so cute when I was three.’
‘You’re cute now,’ I said pressed her nose like a button.
‘And she said I was solving and caring then and that I wasn’t so loving
anymore. She said she always wondered what had made me so heartless…’
Priyanka said and burst into tears.
I held her tight and felt her body shake. I thought hard about what I
could say. Guys can never figure out what to say in such emotional moments
and always end up saying something stupid.
‘Your mother is crazy…’
‘Don’t say anything about my mother. I love her. Can you just listen to
me for five minutes?’ Priyanka said.
‘Of course. Sorry…’ I said as her sobs grew louder. I swore to myself to
stay quiet for the next five minutes. I started counting my breath to pass the
time. Sixteen a minute is my average; eighty breaths would mean I had
listened to her for five minutes.
‘We weren’t always like this. My mom and I were best friends. Until
class eight I think. Then as I became older, she became crazier,’ she said.
I wondered if I should point out that she had just told me not to call her
mum crazy. However, I had promised myself I would keep quiet.
‘She had different rules for me and my brother. And that began to
bother me. She would comment on everything I wore, everywhere I went,
whereas my brother…she would never say anything to him. I tried to explain it
to her, but she just became more irritating, and by the time I reached
college, I couldn’t wait to get away from her.’
‘Uh-uh,’ I said, calculating that almost half my time must have passed.
My leg was cramping. When sex is over, confined spaces are a pain.
‘All through college I ignored her and did what I wanted. In fact, this
whole don’t-care phase was born out of that. But at one level, I felt so guilty.
I tried again to connect with her after college. But she had a problem with
everything—my thinking, my friends, my boyfriend.’
The last word caught my attention. I had to speak, even though only
fifty-seven breaths had passed.
‘Sorry, but did you say boyfriend?’
‘Well yeah. She knows I’m with you. And she had this thing about me
finding someone settled.’
Settled? The words rewound and repeated itself in my head several
times. What does that mean anyway? Just someone rich, or someone who
gets predictable cash flows at the end of every month. Except parents do not
say it that way because then it really sounds like they’re trading their
daughter to the highest bidder. But in some ways, they are. They do not give
a damn about love or feelings or crap like that. ‘Show me the money and keep
our daughter for the rest of your life.’ That is the arrangement in an arranged
marriage.
‘What are you thinking about?’ she said.
‘I’m a loser according to your mom, isn’t it?’ I said.
‘That is not what I said.’
‘Don’t you bring up Bakshi and my promotion every time we have a
conversation/’ I said, moving away.
‘Why do you get so defensive? Anyway, if Bakshi doesn’t promote you,
you can look for another job.’
‘I’m tired of job hunting. There is nothing good out there. And I’m tired
of rejections. Moreover, what is the point of joining another call center? I’ll
just have to start as a junior agent all over again—without you, without my
friends. And let me tell you this, I may not be team leader, but I am happy I
am content. You realize that? And tell your drama queen mom to come say it
to my face that I am a loser. And she can send you off with whichever fucking
settled annuity income earner she likes. I am what I am...’ I said, my face
beetroot-red.
‘Shyam, please can you try and understand?’
‘Understand what? Your mother? No, I can’t. And you can’t either, but I
suspect deep down you might agree with her. Like, what am I doing with this
loser,’ I said.
‘Stop talking nonsense,’ Priyanka shouted. ‘I just made love to you for
god’s sake. And stop using that loser word; she said and broke into tears
again.
Two brief knocks on the window disturbed our conversation. It was
Vroom; Esha was standing next to him.
‘Hello? I thought we came together. You love birds are inseparable, eh?’
he said.
#13
The loud ring of the landline telephone brought me back from 32nd
Milestone. Priyanka grabbed the phone. ‘Hiiii Ganesh,’ she said, her stretched
tone too flirty, if you ask me. But then, who the hell cares for my opinion
anyway.
I wondered what his tone like. ’Get under the table. Tap the phone.
Shyam,’ a voice told me. I immediately scolded myself for the horrible
thought.
‘Of course I knew it was you. No one else calls on this emergency line,’
Priyanka said and ran her fingers through her hair. Women playing with their
hair while talking to a guy is an automatic female preening gesture; I saw it
once on Discovery Channel.
‘Yeah,’ Priyanka said after a few seconds, ‘I like cars. Which one are
you planning to buy?...Lexus?
‘Lexus! The dude is buying a Lexus,’ Vroom screamed, loud enough for
me to understand that this was an expensive car.
‘Ask him which model, ask him please,’ Vroom said and Priyanka looked
at him startled. She shook her head at Vroom.
‘Let them talk, Vroom. They’re got better things to discuss than car
models, ’Esha said.
‘What colour? C’mon it’s your car. How can I decide for you?’ Priyanka
said as her fingers started playing with the curled telephone wire. Over the
next five minutes Ganesh did most of the talking, while Priyanka kept saying
monosyllabic ‘yes’ or equivalents.
‘Tap the phone,’ the voice kept banging in my head. I hated myself for
it, but I knew I would to do it. I wondered when Priyanka would step away
from the desk.
‘No, no, Ganesh, it’s fine, go for your meeting. I’m here only, call me
later,’ Priyanka said as she ended her call. I guess Mr Microsoft did have some
work to do after all.
‘Vroom is Lexus a nice car?’ Priyanka said.
Vroom was already on the Net, surfing Lexus pictures. He turned his
monitor to Priyanka. ‘Check this out. Lexus is one of the coolest cars. The guy
must be loaded.’
Priyanka looked at Vroom’s screen for a few seconds and then turned to
the girls. ‘He wants me to choose the colour. Can you believe that? I don’t
think I should though,’ she said.
Vroom pushed himself back in his swivel chair. ‘Go for black or silver.
Nothing is s cool as the classic colors. But I’ll check our some more for you,’
he said. ‘And tell him the interiors have to be dark leather.’
Meanwhile, my interiors were on fire. I felt like throwing up. I
wondered when I could tap the phone. It was totally wrong, and Priyanka and
the rest of the girls would probably kill me if they found out. But I had to do
it. It was masochistic, but I just had to hear that ass my ex-girlfriend away
with the promise of expensive cars.
I tried to set the stage so I had some excuse to get beneath the table.
Why have there been no calls in the last ten minutes?’ I said. ‘I should
check of the connections are fine.’
‘Let it be,’ Esha said. I’m enjoying the break.’
‘Yes me too,’ Radhika said. ‘And the connection is okay. Bangalore is
just over-eager and picking up all the calls.’
‘Bio?’ Priyanka said to Esha it was their code word to go the toilet
together for a private conversation.
‘Sure.’ Esha sensed the need for gossip and got up from her chair.
‘I’ll come too,’ Radhika said and stood up. She turned to me: ‘The girls
want a bio break, team leader.’
‘You’re all going?’ I said, pretending to be reluctant, but secretly
thrilled. This was my chance. ‘Well, okay, since nothing much is happening
right now.’
As soon as the girls were out of sight I dived under the table
‘What are you doing?’ Vroom said.
‘Nothing. I don’t think the connections are firm,’ I said.
‘And what the hell do you know about the connections,’ Vroom said. He
bent down to look under the table. ‘Tell me honestly what you’re doing.’
I told him about my uncontrollable urge to tap the phone. Vroom
scolded me for five seconds, but then got excited by the challenge and joined
me under the table.
‘I can’t believe I’m helping you with this. The girls will kill us if they
find out,’ Vroom said.
‘They won’t have a clue,’ I said, and connected the wires. ‘Look, it’s
almost done.’
Vroom picked up the landline and we tested the arrangement. I could
select an option on my computer and listen in on the landline via my headset.
Mr Microsoft was in the bag.
‘Why are you doing this?’ Vroom said.
‘I don’t know. Don’t ask me that.’
‘And why are the girls talking so long?’
‘You know them, they have their girl talk in the toilet.’
‘And you don’t want to hear what they’re saying? I’m sure they’re
discussing Mr Microsoft there.’
‘Oh no,’ I said, worried about what I could be missing. ‘Although how
would we be able to eavesdrop?’
‘From the corner stall of the men’s toilet,’ Vroom said. ‘it shares a wall
with the girl’s toilet. If you press your ear hard against the wall, you can hear
them.’
‘Really?’ I said, my eyes lighting up.
Vroom nodded.
‘It’ll be wrong though, eavesdropping through a stall,’ I said.
‘Yes it will.’
‘But who cares. Let’s go,’ I said and Vroom and I jumped off our chairs.
Vroom and I squeezed in and bolted the door in the corner stall of the
WASG men’s toilet. We pressed our ears against the wall. I could hear
Radhika’s voice.
‘Yes, he sounds like a really nice guy,’ she was saying.
‘But I shouldn’t tell him the color, no?’ it’s his car and it is so
expensive. But you know what he said>’ Priyanka said.
‘What? Radhika said.
‘He said “no, it is our car”, and then he said “you have brought colour
to my life, so you get to choose the color”.’
‘Oh, he sounds so romantic,’ Esha said.
‘That is such a lame loser line. Color of my life, my ass,’ I said to Vroom.
‘Shh. They’ll hear us, stupid. Keep quiet,’ Vroom said and put his hand
on my mouth.
‘Anyway, how’s Anuj?’ Priyanka said. I could hear the jingle of her
bangles. She was probably brushing her hair.
‘Anuj is fine,’ Radhika said. ‘He is at a dealer conference in Kolkata. I
think he has to be up late as some dealers can’t seem to have enough to
drink.’
‘Sales jobs are tough,’ Esha said. ‘Okay, excuse me, but I have to
change this…ouch!’
‘What’s happening?’ I said
Vroom shrugged his shoulders.
‘Esha, your wound has not healed for days. Just a band-aid is not
enough,’ Priyanka said. I guessed Esha was changing the band-aid on her shin.
‘No, I’m fine. As long as it heals before the Lakme fashion week,’ Esha
said.
‘Let’s go back girls, it is almost 1:00 a.m.,’ Radhika said. ‘Otherwise the
boys will grumble.’
‘The boys always grumble. Like they never have their cigarette breaks,’
Esha said.
‘But today they are extra grumbly. At least someone is,’ Radhika said.
Vroom pointed a finger at me. Yes, the girls were talking about me.
I grumbled in lip sync.
‘You think Shyam is not taking the news well?’ Priyanka said her voice
becoming fainter as they walked towards the toilet’s exit.
‘You tell us. You know him better than we do,’ Esha said.
‘I wish I knew him now. I don’t know why he sulks and acts so childish
sometimes,’ Priyanka said as they left the toilet.
‘Childish? Me? I am childish?’ I said to Vroom, jumping up and down in
the stall. ‘What the hell. Mr Microsoft gives these cheesy lines and he is cute
and romantic. I say nothing and I am childish,’ I banged a fist on the stall door.
‘Shyam, don’t behave like a kid,’ Vroom said.
We came out of the stall. I jumped back a step as I saw Bakshi by the
sink
Through the mirror, Bakshi saw both of us. His jaw dropped as he
turned towards us.
‘Hello Sir,’ Vroom said and went up to the sink next to him.
‘Sir, it is not what you think…’I said, pointing back at the stall.
‘I am not thinking anything. What you do in your personal lives is up to
you. But why aren’t you at the desk?’ Bakshi said.
‘Sir, we just took a short break. Call traffic is very low today,’ I said.
‘Did you log your break? The girls are missing from the bay as well,’
Bakshi said. His face was turning from a shiny pink to a shiny red.
‘Really? Where did the girls go/’ Vroom said.
Bakshi turned away from us and walked to the urinal stalls. I went to the
stall adjacent to him.
‘Didn’t you just use the toilet?’ Bakshi said.
‘Sir,’ I said and hesitated. ‘Sir, that was different, with Vroom.’
‘Please. I don’t want to know,’ Bakshi said.
‘Sir, no,’ I said.
Now this is something women never have to deal with; standing next to
your boss in the toilet as he pees is one of the world’s most awkward
situations. What are you supposed to do? Leave him alone or give him
company and entertain him? Is it okay to talk to him while he is doing his
business or not?
‘Sir, how come you are using this restroom?’ I said, as I had not seen
him there before.
‘Didn’t mean to. I always use the executive toilet,’ Bakshi said,
emphasizing his superior position to me.
‘Yes sir,’ I said and nodded my head. I had acknowledge his
magnanimous gesture of peeing in the same bay as us. But why was he here?
‘Anyway, I came to your desk to drop off a courier for Esha.’
‘Courier/’ Vroom said from his position at the sink. ‘At this time?’
‘I’ve kept the parcel on her desk. Just tell her,’ Bakshi said as he zipped
up.
‘Also, Shyam, can you tell the voice agents to come to my office for a
team meeting later, say 2:30 a.m., okay/’ Bakshi said.
‘What’s up sir?’ Vroom said.’
‘Nothing. I want to share some pertinent insights with the resources.
Anyway, can I ask you a couple of questions on the website? You know it well,
right?’
‘Yes sir. And most questions will be answered in the FAQ section of the
user manual we sent you,’ Vroom said.
‘FAQ?
‘Frequently asked questions.’
‘Good. Boston may have some questions. I will rely on you smart people
to answer them. For instance, how do you update the site for new computer
models?’
‘It’s easy, Sir. Any systems person can modify the website backend and
change the queries to suit the model,’ Vroom said.
Bakshi asked us a few more questions. They were simple enough for
Vroom or me to answer them. Especially as we had built the website from
scratch.
‘Good, good. I am impressed by your knowledge. Anyway, thanks for the
user manual, I have already sent it to Boston,’ Bakshi said and shook his hands
dry. I moved away to avoid any droplets failing on me.
‘You did/’ both of us said in unison.
‘Sir, if you could have copied us on the email…we would like to be in
the loop,’ Vroom said. Good one, he was using Bakshi’s phrases back at him.
‘Oh, I didn’t? I am so sorry. I am not good with emails anyway. I’ll just
forward it to you. But you guys man the bay now, okay?’
‘Of course, Sir,’ I said.
‘And have you finished the ad-hoc task I gave you,’ Bakshi said.
‘What, Sir?’ I said, and then realized he meant the photocopying of the
board meeting invite. ‘Almost done, Sir. I will send it to you.’
Bakshi nodded and left us behind in the restroom. I felt weird that
Bakshi had not copied us on the email sending out the website proposal.
However, it did not surprise me.
‘Is he a total moron or what? Can’t cc people on an email?’ Vroom said.
‘Easy man. Let’s get back to the bay,’ I said.
#14
We returned from the men’s room. Call flow had resumed at the WASG.
Radhika explained to a caller how to open his vacuum cleaner. Priyanka
advised a lady not to put hot pans in the dishwasher. Esha taught an old man
to pre-heat an oven and simultaneously dodged his telephonic ‘your-voice-isso-sexy’
pass.
Another call flashed on my screen.
‘I know this guy. Can I take this call?’ Vroom said.
‘Who is it?’ I raised my eyebrows.
‘A prick called William Fox. Listen in if you want,’ Vroom said.
I selected the option on my computer.
‘Good afternoon, Western Appliances, Victor speaking. Ho may I help
you today, Mr Fox,’ Vroom said.
‘You bloody well help me smart ass,’ the man on the phone said. He had
a rough voice, with a heavy southern American accent; he sounded like he
was in his mid-thirties. I could guess he was drunk.
‘Who is he,’ I whispered, but Vroom shushed me.
‘Sir, if I may confirm, I am speaking to Mr William Fox?’
‘You bet you are. You think just ‘cos you know my name it’s okay to sell
me crap hoovers?’
‘What is the problem with your vacuum cleaner, Sir? It’s a VX-100?’
‘’Sir, do you remember when you last changed the dust bags?’ Vroom
said.
‘Like fuck I remember when you last changed the dust bags. It’s just a
crap machine you dumbass.’
Vroom took three deep breaths. He remembered the suggested line in
such a situation. ‘Sir, I request you to not use that language.’
‘Oh really? Then make your fucking hoover work.’
Vroom pressed a button on his phone before he spoke again.
‘Fuck you first you sonofabitch prickhead…’ he said.
‘What are you doing?’ I said, panicking.
‘Just venting, don’t worry it is on mute,’ Vroom smirked. ‘Back to
normal now.’ He pressed the button again and, trying his best to keep his
tone calm, said, Sir, you need to change the dust bags when they are full.’
‘Who am I speaking to?’ the voice on the phone became agitated.
‘Victor, sir.’
‘Tell me your fucking name. You’re some kid in India, isn’t it?’
‘Sir, I am afraid I can’t disclose my location.’
‘You’re from India. Tell m, boy.’
‘Yes sir. I am in India,’ Vroom gave in.
‘So what did you have to do to get this job? Fucking degree in nuclear
physics?’
‘Sir, do you need help with your cleaner or not?’ Vroom said. 
‘C’mon son, answer me. I don’t need your help. Yeah, I’ll change the
dust bag. What about you guys? When will you change your dusty country?’
‘Excuse me, sir, but I want you to stop talking like that,’ Vroom said.
‘Oh really, now some brown kid will tell me what to do— William Fox’s
voice stopped abruptly as I cut off the call.
Vroom didn’t move for a few seconds. His whole body trembled and he
was breathing heavily. Then he placed his elbows on the table and covered his
face with his hands.
‘You don’t have to talk to those people. You know that,’ I said to
Vroom.
The girls glanced at us while still on their calls.
‘Vroom, I’m talking to you,’ I said.
He raised his face and slowly turned to loot at me. Then he banged a fist
on the table. ‘Damn,’ he screamed and kicked hard under the table.
‘What the...’ Priyanka said. ‘Mt call just got cut.’
Vroom’s kick had dislodged the power wires, disconnecting all our calls.
I wanted to check the wires, but had to check on Vroom first. Vroom stood up
and his six-foot-plus frame towered above us.
‘Guys, there are two things I cannot stand,’ he said and showed us two
fingers. ‘Racists. And Americans.’
Priyanka started laughing.
‘What is there to laugh?’ I said.
‘because there is a contradiction. Doesn’t like racists, but can’t stand
Americans,’ Priyanka said.
‘Why?’ Vroom said, ignoring Priyanka. ‘Why do some fat-ass, dim-witted
Americans get to act superior to us? Do you know why?’
‘Nobody answered.
Vroom continued, ‘I’ll tell you why. Not because they are smarter. Not
because they are better people. But because their country is rich and ours is
poor. That is the only damn reason. Because is rich and ours is poor. That is
the only damn reason. Because the losers who have run our country for the
last fifty years couldn’t do better than make India one of the poorest
countries on earth. Great job, thank you, dear great fucking leaders.’
‘Stop overreacting Vroom. Some stupid guy calls and…’ Radhika said.
‘Screw Americans,’ I said and gave him a bottle of water. ‘Look, you’ve
broken down the entire system.’ I pointed to the black call screens.
‘Someone kicked the Americans a bit too hard. No more calls for now,’
Priyanka said, rolling her eyes.
‘Let me take a look,’ I said and went under the table. I was more
worried about the wires tapping the emergency phone. However, they were
intact.
‘Shyam, wait,’ Esha said ‘w have a great excuse for not taking calls. Let
it be for a while.’
Everyone agreed with her. We decided to call systems after twenty
minutes.
‘Why was Bakshi here? I saw him come out of the men’s toilet,’ Priyanka
said.
‘To deliver a courier for Esha,’ I said. ‘And he said there is a team
meeting at 2:30 a.m. Oh man, I still have to Xerox the board meeting invite.’
I assembled Bakshi’s sheets again.
‘What courier,’ Esha said. ‘This?’
She lifted a brown packet that was lying near her computer.
‘Must be,’ Vroom said, ‘though which courier delivers stuff at this
time?’
Esha opened the packet. She took out two bundles of hundred rupee
notes. One bundle had a small yellow post-it note on it. She read the post-it
and her face went pale.
‘Wow, someone’s rich,’ Vroom said.
‘Not bad. What’s the money for?’ Radhika said.
‘It’s nothing. Just a friend returning money she borrowed from me,’
Esha said.
She dumped the packet in her drawer and took out her mobile phone.
Her face was pensive, as if she was debating whether or not to make a call. I
collected my sheets to go to the Xerox room.
‘Want to help?’ I called out to Vroom.
‘No thanks. People I worked with are becoming national TV reporters,
but look at me. Taking calls from losers and being asked to help with loser
jobs,’ Vroom said and looked away from me.
#15
I switched on the Xerox machine in the supplies room and put Bakshi’s
stack in the document feeder. I had just pressed the ‘start’ button on the
agenda document when the copier creaked and groaned to a halt. ‘Paper Jam:
Tray 2’ appeared in big, bold letters on the screen.
The copier in our supplies room is not a machine. It is a person. A
person with a psychotic soul and a grumpy attitude towards life. Whenever
you copy more than two sheets, there is paper jam. After that, the machine
teases you: it gives you systematic instructions on how to un-jam it—open
cover, remove tray, pull lever. Now if it knows this much, why doesn’t it fix
itself?
‘Damn,’ I mumbled to myself as I bent down to open the paper trays. I
turned a few levers, and pulled out whatever paper was in sight.
I stood up and rearranged the documents on the feeder tray. I pressed
‘start’ again, not realizing that my ID was resting on Bakshi’s original
document. as the machine re-started, it sucked in the ID along with the
paper. The ID pulled at my strap, which tightened around my neck.
‘Aaarg,’ I said as I chocked. The ID went inside the machine’s guts, and
the strap curled tighter around my neck. I screamed loudly and pulled at my
ID. However, the machine had more strength. I was sure it wanted to kill me—
and probably making a copy of my ID for my obituary while it was as it. I
started kicking the machine hard.
Vroom came running into the room. ‘What the…’ he appeared
nonplussed. He saw A4 sheets spread all over the room, a groaning Xerox
machine, and me lying down on top of the photocopiers, desperately tugging
at my strap.
‘Do something,‘ I said in a muffled voice.
‘Like what?’ he said and bent over to look at the machine. The screen
was flashing the poetic words ‘Paper Jam’. My ID strap ran right into the
machine.
Vroom looked around the supplies room and found a pair of scissors.
‘Should I?’ he said and smiled at me. ‘I really want the others to see
this.’
‘Shut…up…and…cut,’ I said.
Snap! In one snap, my breath came back.
‘Okay now?’ Vroom asked as he threw the scissors back in the supplies
tray.
I nodded as I rubbed my neck and took wheezing breaths. I rested my
head down on the warm, soothing glass of the photocopy machine. I must
have rested it too hard, or maybe my head is too heavy. I heard a crack.
‘Fuck,’ Vroom said, ‘you broke the glass.’
‘What?’ I said as I lifted my head.
‘Get off,’ Vroom said and pulled me off the machine. ‘What is with you
man?’ having a bad office supplies day?’
‘Who knows?’ I said, collecting Bakshi’s document. ‘I really am good for
nothing. Cannot even do these loser jobs. I almost died. Can you imagine the
headline—“Copied decapitates man, duplicates document”.’
Vroom laughed and put his arm around my shoulder.
‘Don’t take tension dude. And I apologize.’
‘For what,’ I said. Nobody has ever apologized to me in the past twentysix
years of my life.
‘I’m sorry I was rude and didn’t come and help you. First these rumors
about the call center closing down. Then Boontoo makes it to NDTV. And
Bakshi sends the document without copying us. Meanwhile, some psycho
caller screams curses at me. Just gets to you sometimes.’
‘What gets to you?’ I asked. I was trying t copy Bakshi’s document again,
but the Xerox machine was hurling abusive message on the screen every time
I pressed a button. Soon it self-detected a crack in the glass and switched
itself off. I think a committed suicide.
‘Life,’ Vroom said, sitting down on one of the stools in the supplies
room, ‘life gets to you. You think you are perfectly happy—you know, good
salary, nice friends, life is a party—but all of a sudden, in one little snap,
everything can crack, like this stupid glass pane of the Xerox machine.’
I did not fully understand Vroom’s glass pane theory of life, but his face
told me he was upset. I decided to soothe the man who had just saved my life.
‘Vroom, you know what your problem is?’
‘What?’
‘You don’t have real love in your life. You need to fall in love, be in love
and stay in love. That is the gap you are facing,’ I said firmly, as if I really
knew what I was talking about.
‘You think so?’ Vroom said. ‘I’ve had girlfriends. I’ll make another one
soon—you know that.’
‘Not those kind of girls. Someone you really care about. And I think we
all know who that is.’
‘Esha?’ he said.
I kept quiet.
‘Esha is not interested. I have asked her. She has her modeling and says
she has no time for a relationship. Besides, she has other issues with me,’
Vroom said.
‘What issues?’ I said.
‘She says I don’t know what love is. I care for cars and bikes more than
girls.’
I laughed. ‘You do.’
‘That is such an unfair comparison. It’s like asking women that they care
for more, nice shoes or men. There is no easy answer.’
‘Really? So we are benchmarked to footwear?’
‘Trust me, women can ignore men for sexy shoes. But come to the point
—Esha.’
‘Do you think you love her?’ I said.
‘Can’t say. But I’ve felt something for her over a year now.’
‘But you dated other girls last year.’
‘Those girls were never important. They were like TV channels you surf
while looking for the real program you want to see. You are with that Curly
Wurly chick, and you still have feelings for Priyanka,’ Vroom said.
The statement startled me.
‘Shefali is there to help me move on,’ I said.
‘Screw moving on. That chick can put you off women forever. Maybe
that will help you get over Priyanka,’ Vroom said.
‘Don’t change the topic. We’re talking about you. I think you should ask
Esha again for a real relationship. Do it man.’
Vroom looked at me for a few seconds. ‘Will you help me?’ he said.
‘Me? You’re the expert with girls,’ I said.
‘This one is different. The stakes are higher. Can you be around when I
talk to her? Just listen to our conversation. Maybe we can analyze it later.’
‘Okay, sure. So, let’s do it now.’
‘Now?’
‘Why not? We have free time. Afterwards calls will, begin and we’ll be
busy again. Worst case, management may fire us. Better act fast right?’ I said.
‘Okay. Where do we do it?’ Vroom said as he put his hand on his
forehead to think. ‘The dining room?’
The dinning room made sense. I could be nearby, but inconspicuous. 
#16
‘Everything okay? I heard noises,’ Esha said, as we returned from the
supplies room. She stretched back on her chair. Her top slid up and the navel
ring twinkled.
‘The Xerox machine died. Anyway, anyone for a snack?’ I said.
‘Yes, let’s go. I need a walk. Come, Priyanka,’ Esha said and tried to pull
Priyanka up by her upper arm.
‘No, I’ll stay here,’ Priyanka said and smiled. ‘Ganesh might call.’
A scoop of hot molten lead entered through my head and left my toes.
Try to move on, I reminded myself. At the same time, I had the urge to pick
up that landline and smash it to fifty pieces.
Radhika was about to get up when I stopped her.
‘Actually Radhika, can you stay back? If Bakshi walks by, at least he’ll
see some people on the desk,’ I said.
Radhika sat back puzzled as we left the room.
The dining area
The dinning area at Connexions is a cross between a restaurant and a
college hostel mess. There are three rows of long granite-covered tables, with
seating on both sides. The chairs are plush; they’re upholstered in black
leather in an attempt to give them a hip designer look. The tables have a
small vase every three feet. Management recently renovated the place when
some overpriced consulting l of MBAs) recommended that a bright dining room
would be good for employee motivation. A much cheaper option would have
just been to fire. Bakshi, if you ask me.
Vroom took a cheese sandwich and chips (we don’t serve Indian food—
again for motivation reasons) in his tray and sat at one of the tables. Esha just
tool soda water and sat opposite Vroom. I think slice of eats once every three
days. I took an unhealthy sized slice of chocolate cake. I shouldn’t have, but
justified it as a well-deserved reward for helping a friend.
I sat at the adjacent table, took out my phone, and started typing fake
SMS messages.
‘Why isn’t Shyam sitting with us?’ Esha said t Vroom, twisting on her
seat to look at me.
‘Private SMSing,’ Vroom said. Esha rolled her eyes and nodded.
‘Actually Esha, I wanted to tell you something,’ Vroom said, fingering
the chips on his plate. I had already finished half my cake. I was probably a
pig with a reverse eating disorder in my previous life.
‘Yeah/’ Esha said to Vroom, dragging the word as an eyebrow rose in
suspicion. The invisible female antennae were out and suggesting caution.
‘Talk about what?’
‘Esha,’ Vroom said, clearing his throat. ‘I’ve been thinking about you a
lot lately.’
‘Really?’ she said and looked sideways to see if I was eavesdropping. Of
course I was, but I made an extra effort to display a facial expression that
showed I was really focusing on my cake. She watched as I joyfully consumed
what was probably her weekly calorific consumption in a few seconds.
‘Yes really, Esha. I may have met a lot of girls, but no one is like you.’
She giggled and, taking a flower out from the vase, began plucking out
its petals.
‘Yes,’ Vroom continued, ‘and I think rather than fool around, could do
with a real relationship. So, I’m asking you again—will you go out with me?’
Esha was quiet for a few minutes. ‘What do you expect me to say?’
‘I don’t know. How about a yes?’
‘Really/ well unfortunately that word did not occur to me,’ Esha said,
her expression serious.
‘Why?’ Vroom said. I could tell he though it was over already. He had
told me once, if a girl hints she is not interested, it’s time to cut losses and
quit. Never try the persuasion game.
‘I’ve told you before. I have to focus on my modeling career. I can’t
afford the luxury of making a boyfriend,’ she said, her voice unusually cold.
‘What is with you, Esha? Don’t you want someone to support you…’
Vroom said.
‘that’s right, with three different girlfriends last year, I am sure you will
always be there for me,’ Esha said.
‘The other girls were just for fun. They meant nothing, they’re like
pizza or movies or something. They are channel surfing, you are more
serious,’ Vroom said.
‘So what serious channel am I? The BCC?’ Esha said.
‘I have known you for more than a year. We have spent hundreds of
nights together…’
I though Vroom’s last phrase came out odd, but Esha was too
preoccupied to notice.
‘Just drop it, Vroom,’ Esha said put the flowers back in the vase. Her
voice was breaking, though she was not crying yet.
‘Are you okay?’ Vroom said and extended his hand to hold hers. She
sensed the move and pulled her hand away nanoseconds before he reached it.
‘Not really,’ Esha said.
‘I thought we were friends. I just wanted to take it to the next level…’
Vroom said.
‘Please stop it,’ Esha said, and covered her eyes with her hands. ‘You
chose the worst time to talk about this.’
‘What’s wrong Esha? Can I help?’ Vroom said, his voice now held more
concern than the nervousness of romance.
She shook her head frantically.
I knew Vroom had failed miserably. This girl was not interested and was
in a strange mood tonight anyway. I finished my thousand-calorie chocolate
cake, and went to the counter to get water. By the time I returned, they had
left the dining room.
#17
I returned to the WASG bay with the taste of chocolate cake lingering in
my mouth. I sat down at my desk and began surfing irrelevant website.
Radhika was giving Priyanka recommendation on the best shops in Delhi for
bridal dresses. Esha and Vroom were silent. My guilt for eating the chocolate
cake combined with my guilt for not reporting the systems failure. When guilt
combines, it multiplies manifold. I finally called IT to fix our desk. They were
busy, but promised to come in ten minutes.
The spare landline’s ring startled us all.
‘Ganesh,’ Priyanka said as she scrambled to pick up the phone. I kept a
calm face while I selected the option to listen in on the call.
‘Mom,’ Priyanka said, ‘why aren’t you sleeping? Who gave you this
number?’
‘What sleeping? No one has slept a wink today,’ her mother said in an
excited voice. I had never met her. However, through Priyanka’s stories, I felt
I knew her intimately.
The tapped line had exceptional clarity. Her mother sounded elated,
which was unusual for a woman who (according to Priyanka) had spent most
of life in self-imposed, obsessive-compulsive depression.
Priyanka’s mother explained how Ganesh had just called her and given
her the emergency line number. Ganesh’s family in India had also not slept;
they had been calling Priyanka’s parents at least once an hour. Ganesh had
told Priyanka’s family that he was ‘on top of the world’. I guess the sad dude
really had no other life.
‘I am so happy today. Look how God sent such a perfect match right to
our door. And I used to worry about you so much,’ Priyanka’s mother said.
That’s great mom, but what’s up?’ Priyanka said. I’ll be home in a few
hours. How come you called her?’
‘Just like that. Can’t a mother call her daughter?’ Priyanka’s mom said.
‘Can’t a mother’ is one of her classic lines.
‘No mom, I just wondered. Anyway, Ganesh and I spoke a few times
today.’
‘And?’
‘And what?’
‘Did he tell you his plans?’
‘What plans/’
‘He is coming to India next month. Originally he’d planned the trip so he
could see girls. But now that he has made his choice, he wants to get married
on that trip,’ Priyanka’s mom said, her voice turning breathless with
excitement.
‘What?’ Priyanka said, ‘next month/’ and looked around a all of us with
a shocked expression. Everyone returned puzzled looks, as they did not know
what was going on. Of course, I also pretended to look confused.
‘Mom, no!’ Priyanka wailed. ‘How can I get married next month? That is
less than five weeks.’
‘Oh you don’t have to worry about that. I am there to organize
everything. You wait and see, I will work day and night to make it a grand
event.’
‘Mom I’m not worried about organizing a party. I have so be ready to get
married. I hardly know Ganesh,’ Priyanka said, entwining her fingers
nervously in the telephone wire.
‘Huh?’ Of course, you are ready for it. When the families have fixed the
match, bride and groom are happy, why delay? And the boy can’t come again
and again. He is in an important position after all.’
Yeah right, I thought. He was probably one of the thousands of Indian
geeks coding away in Microsoft. $But to his in-laws, he was Mr Bill Gates
himself.
‘Mom, please. I cannot do it next month. Sorry—but no,’ Priyanka said,
‘and I have to keep the phone down now.’
‘What do you mean no? This is too much. You have to disagree with me
always or what/’
‘Mom, how does this have anything to do with disagreeing with you?’ in
fact, how does it have anything to do with you? It is my life, and sorry, I can’t
marry anyone I have only known for five weeks.’
Priyanka’s mother stayed silent for a while. I thought she would
retaliate, but then I figured out: this silence was working more effectively
than words. She knows how to put an emotional stasher knife tight at
Priyanka’s neck.
‘Mom, are you there?’ Priyanka asked after ten seconds.
‘Yes, I am still here. Will be dead soon, but unfortunately still here.’
‘Mom c’mon now…’
‘Don’t even make me happy by mistake,’ Priyanka’s mother said. What
a killer line, I thought. I almost applauded.
Priyanka threw a hand up in the air in exasperation. She grabbed a
stress ball lying near Vroom’s computer across the table and squeezed it hard.
I tugged the headset closer to my ear as Priyanka’s voice turned softer.
‘Mom, please. Don’t do this.’
‘You know I prayed for one hour today…praying you stay happy…
forever,’ Priyanka’s mother said as she broke into tears. Whoever starts
crying first always has an advantage in an argument. This works for Priyanka’s
mother, who at least has obedient tear glands, if not an obedient daughter.
‘Mom, don’t create a scene. I’m at work. What do you want from me/ I
have agreed to the boy. Now why is everyone pushing me?’
‘Isn’t Ganesh nice? What is the problem?’ her mother said in a tragic
tone that could put any Bollywood hero’s mother to shame.
‘Mom, I didn’t say he isn’t nice or there is a problem. I just need time.
‘You aren’t distracted, are you? Are you still talking to that useless call
center chap, what is his name…Shyam.’
I jumped when I heard my name.
‘No mom. That is over. I have told you so many times I have agreed to
Ganesh right?’
‘So, why can’t you agree for next month—for everyone’s happiness?
Can’t a mother beg her daughter for this?’
There you go: ‘can’t a mother…’ number II for the night.
Priyanka closed her eyes to compose herself. She spoke slowly, ‘Can I
think about it?’
‘Of course. Think about it. But think for all of us. Not just yourself.’
‘Okay. I will. Just… just give me some time.’
Priyanka hung up the phone and kept still. The girls asked her for
details.
She looked around and threw the stress ball at her monitor.
‘Can you believe this? She wants me to get married next month. Next
month!’ Priyanka said and stood up. ‘They brought me up for twenty-five
years, and they can’t wait more than twenty-five days to get rid of me. What
is with these people—am I such a burden?’
Priyanka repeated her conversation to Esha and Radhika. Vroom
checked his computer to see if Bakshi had sent us any emails.
‘It doesn’t matter right? You have to marry him anyway. Why drag it
out?’ Radhika said to Priyanka.
‘Yes, you get to drive the Lexus sooner too,’ Vroom said, without
looking up from his screen. Screw Vroom. I gave him a firm glare out of the
corner of my eye.
‘What will I wear?’ Esha said. Her somber mood had lightened with the
new announcement. Give her a chance to dress up and she will ignore people
dying around her. ‘This is too short a notice,’ she continued, ‘ I need a new
dress for every ceremony.’
‘Get your designer friends to lend you a few dresses,’ Vroom said to
Esha, with a hint of sarcasm in his voice.
Esha’s face dropped again. Only I saw it, but her eyes became wet. She
took a tissue from her purse. She pretended to fix her lipstick and casually
wiped her tears.
‘I’m so not ready for this. In one month I’ll be someone’s wife. Gosh,
little kids will call me auntie,’ Priyanka said.
Everyone discussed the pros and cons of Priyanka getting married in
four weeks. Most of them felt getting married so quickly wasn’t such a big
deal once she had chosen the guy. Of course, most people don’t give a damn
about me as well.
In the midst of the discussion the systems guy returned to our desk.
‘What happened here?’ he said from under the table. ‘Looks like
someone ripped these wires apart.’
‘I don’t know,’ I said. ‘See if we can get some traffic again.’
Priyanka’s mother and her words—‘the useless call center boy’—
resounded in my mind. I remembered the time when Priyanka told me her
mother’s views on me. It was not long ago: it was one of our last dates at
Mocha Café.
#18
My Past Dates with
Priyanka—IV
Mocha Café, Greater Kailash I
Five months before this night
We promised to meet on one condition—we would not fight. No brain
games, no sarcastic comments and no judgmental remarks. She was late
again. I fiddled with the menu as I looked around me. Mocha’s décor had a
Middle Eastern twist, with hookahs, velvet cushions and colored glass lamps
everywhere. Many of the tables were occupied by couples, sitting with
intertwined fingers, obviously deeply in love. The girls laughed at whatever
the guys said. The guys ordered the most expensive items on the menu. Every
now and then their eyes needed to be happy was each other. The silly
delusion in the initial stage of a relationship: aren’t they amazing?
My life was nowhere near perfect, of course. For starters, my girlfriend,
if I could still call her that, was late. Plus, I could sense she was itching to
dump me. Priyanka and I had ended eight of our last ten calls with someone
hanging up the phone on the other.
I had not slept the entire day, which is not a big deal for most people,
but considering I work all night, it had no left me feeling too good. My job was
going nowhere, with Bakshi bent on sucking every last drop of my blood.
Maybe he was right—I just did not have the strategic vision or managerial
leadership or whatever crap things you are supposed to have to do well in
life. Maybe Priyanka’s mom was right too—her daughter was stuck with a
loser.
These thoughts enveloped me as she came in. She had just had a
haircut. Her waist-length hair was now just a few inches below her shoulders.
I liked her with long hair, but she never listened to me. I told you, I didn’t
have the leadership skills to influence anyone. Anyway, her hair still looked
nice. She wore a white linen top and a flowing lavender skirt with lost of
crinkly edges. She had on a thin silver necklace, with the world’s tiniest
diamond pendant handing from it. I started at my watch as a sign of protest.
‘Sorry, Shyam,’ she said as she put a giant brown bag on the table, ‘that
ass hairdresser took so long. I told him I had to leave early.’
‘No big deal. A haircut has to be more important than me,’ I said,
without any emotion in my voice.
‘I thought we said no sarcasm,’ she said, ‘and I did say sorry.’
‘That’s right. Once sorry for half an hour seems fair, in fact, go get a
two-hour facial done as well. You can come back and say sorry four times.’
‘Shyam, please. I know I’m late. We promised not to fight. Saturday is
the only day I get time for a haircut.’
‘I told you to keep your hair long,’ I said.
‘I did for a long time. But it’s sop hard to maintain it, Shyam. I’m sorry,
but you need to understand sometimes. I had the most boring hair in the
world and I could do nothing with it. And it took one hour to oil the damn
thing. And it feels so hot in the Delhi heat.’
‘Whatever,’ I said in a bored voice, looking at the menu. ‘What do you
want?’
‘I want my Shyam to be in a good moon,’ she said and held my hand. We
didn’t intertwine fingers though.
‘My’ Shyam. I guess I still count, I thought. Girls sure know how to sweet
talk.
‘Hmm…’ I said and let out a big sigh. If she was trying to make peace, I
guess I had to do my bit. ‘We can have their special Maggi noodles.’
‘Maggi? You’ve come all this way to eat Maggi?’ she said, and took the
menu from me. ‘And check this out: ninety bucks for Maggi?’ she said the last
phrase so loudly that the tables and a few waiters next to us heard us.
‘Priyanka, we earn now. We can afford it,’ I said.
‘Order chocolate brownies and ice cream,’ she said. ‘At least something
you don’t get at home.’
‘I thought you said you’ll have whatever I want,’ I said.
‘Yes, but Maggi?’ she said and made a quirky face. Her nostrils
contracted for a second. I had seen that face before, and I could not help but
smile. I saved myself time by ordering the brownie.
The waiter brought the chocolate brownie and placed it in front of
Priyanka. Half a liter of chocolate sauce dripping over a blob of vanilla ice
cream placed precariously over a huge slice of rich chocolate cake. It was a
heart attack served on a plate. Priyanka had two spoons and slid the dish
towards me.
‘Look at me, eating away like a cow,’ she said.
‘Did you have a heart to heart with your mom?’ I said.
Priyanka wiped her chocolate-lined lips with tissue. I felt like kissing her
right then. However, I hesitated. When you hesitate in love, you know
something is wrong.
‘Me and my mom,’ she said, ‘are incapable of having a rational, sane
conversation. I tried to talk to her—about you and my plans to study further.
It sounds like a simple conversation, right?’
‘What happened?’
‘We were crying in seven minutes. Can you believe it?’
‘With your mother, I can. What exactly did she say?’
‘You don’t want to know.’
‘But I have to know,’ I insisted.
‘She said she has never liked you. Because you are not settled, and
because since the day I started dating you I have changed and become an
unaffectionate and cold person.’
‘Unaffectionate? What the…?’ I shouted, my face turning red. ‘How the
hell have I changed you?
The second comment cut me into thin slices. Sure, I hated the ‘not
settled’ tag too, but there was some truth to that. How could she accuse me
of turning Priyanka into a cold person, though?
She did not say anything. Her face softened and I heard tiny sobs. It was
so unfair, I was the one being insulted: I should be the one getting to cry.
However, I guess only girls look nice crying on dates.
‘Listen Priyanka, your mom is a psycho…’ I said.
‘No she is not. It is not because of you, but I have changed. Maybe it is
because of my age—and she confuses it with my being with you. We used to be
so close, and now she doesn’t like anything I do,’ she said and broke down
into full-on-crying. Everyone in the café must have thought I had cheated on
my girlfriend and was dumping her or something. I got some ‘you-horriblemen’
looks from girls at other tables.
‘Calm down, Priyanka. What does she want? And tell me honestly, what
do you want?’ I said.
Priyanka shook her head and remained silent.
It dives me nuts. The effort it sometimes takes to make women speak up
is harder than interrogating terrorists.
‘Please, talk to me,’ I said, looking at the brownie. The ice cream had
melted to a gooey mess.
She finally spoke. ‘She wants me to show that I love her. She wants me
to make her happy and marry someone she chooses for me.’
‘And what do you want?’ I said.
‘I don’t know,’ she told the tablecloth.
What the hell? I thought. All I get for four years of togetherness is an ‘I
don’t know?
‘You want to dump me, don’t you? I am just not good enough for your
family.’
‘It isn’t like that Shyam. She married my dad who was just a government
employee only because he seemed like a decent human being. But her sisters
waited to marry better-qualified boys and they are richer today. Her concern
for me comes from there. She is my mother. It is not as if she does not know
what is good for me. I want someone doing well in his career as well.’
‘So your mother is not the only cause for the strain in our relationship.
It is you as well.’
‘A relationship never flounders for one reason alone. There are many
issues. You don’t take feedback. You are sarcastic. You don’t understand my
ambitions. Don’t I always tell you to focus on your career?’
‘Just get lost okay,’ I said.
My loud voice attracted the attention of the neighboring tables. All the
girls at Mocha were probably convinced I was the worst possible male
chauvinist pig ever.
Her tears were back. However, she noticed people watching us and
composed herself. A few wipes with a tissue and she was normal again.
‘Shyam, it is this attitude of yours. At home, my mother doesn’t
understand. Over here, you don’t. Why have you become like this? You have
changed Shyam, you are not the same happy person I first met,’ she, her
voice restrained out calm.
‘Nothing has happened to me. It is you who finds new faults in me
everyday. I have a bad boss and I am trying to manage as happily as possible.
What has happened to you? You used to eat at truck drivers’ dhabas. Now all
of a sudden you need an NRI cardiac surgeon to make ends meet?’
We started at each other for two seconds.
‘Okay, it’s my fault. That is what you want to prove, right? I am a
confused, selfish, mean person right?’ she said.
I looked at her. I couldn’t believe I had loved her and those flared
nostrils for four years. And now it was difficult to say four sentences without
disagreeing.
I sighed. ‘I thought there was to be no arguing, blaming and sarcasm.
But we have done it all.’
‘I care a lot for you,’ she said and held my hand.
‘Me too,’ I said, ‘but I think we need to take care of other things in our
life as well.’
We asked for the bill and made cursory conversation about the weather,
traffic and the décor of the café. We were talking a lot, but we weren’t
communicating at all.
‘Call me in the evening if you’re free,’ I said as I paid the bill and got up
to leave.
It had come to this: we had to tell each other to call. Previously, not a
waking hour passed without one of us SMS-ing or calling the other.
‘Okay, or I will SMS you,’ she said. An SMS seemed simpler than dealing
with another conversation.
We did a basic hug, without really touching. A kiss was out of the
question.
‘Sure,’ I said, ‘it’s always nice to get your message.’
Sarcasm. Man, will I never learn?
#19
Mocha Café and its colored Arabian lights faded away from my mind as it
returned to WASG’s tube light-lit interiors. I checked the time: it was close to
2:00 a.m. I got up to take a short walk. I did not know what was more
disgusting—thinking about Priyanka’s mother or hearing the girls obsess about
Priyanka’s marriage. I went to the corner of the room where Military Uncle
sat. We nodded to each other. I looked at his screen and saw pictures of
animals—chimps, rhinos, lions and deer.
‘Are those your customers/’ I said and laughed at my own non-funny
joke.
Military Uncle smiled back. He was in one of his rare good moods.
‘These are pictures I took at the zero. I scanned them to send to my
grandson.’
‘Cool. He likes animals?’ I said and beet over to take a closer look at the
chimp. It bore an uncanny resemblance to Bakshi.
‘Yes, I’m sending it by email to my son. But I’m having trouble as our
emails do not allow more than four megabyte attachments.’
I decided to help Uncle, if only to avoid going back to the bay until the
systems guy had fixed the phones.
‘Hmm… these are large files,’ I said, as I took over his mouse. ‘I could
try to zip them—thought that won’t compress images much. The other way is
to make the pictures low resolution. Otherwise, you can leave a few animals
out.’
Military Uncle wanted to keep them high resolution. We agreed to leave
out the deer and the hippos as those were not his grandson’s favorite animals.
‘Thanks so much, Shyam,’ Military Uncle said, as I successfully pressed
‘send’ on his email. I looked at his face: there was genuine gratitude. It was
hard to believe he had been booted out because he was too bossy with his
daughter-in-law—a piece of gossip Radhika had once passed on to me.
‘You’re welcome,’ I said. I noticed Vroom signal to me to come back.
Hoping that the topic of Priyanka’s wedding was over, I returned to the desk.
Bakshi has sent us a copy of the proposal,’ Vroom said.
I sat at my desk and opened my inbox. There was a message from
Bakshi.
The calls had not resumed; the systems guy had gone back to his
department again to get new wires.
‘Let’s see which whit e bozos he sucked up to. Who has he sent it to?’
Vroom’s voice was excited.
I opened the mail to see who had been the original recipients. It was the
who’s who of Western Computers and Appliances in Boston: the sales
manager, the IT manager, the operations head and several others. Bakshi had
sent it to the entire directory of people in our client base. I have to say, he is
better at being a mass-suck-up than a gangbang porn star.
‘He has copied everyone. Senior management in Boston in the “to”
field, and then India senior management in the “cc” field,’ I said.
‘And yet somehow he forgot to copy us. Bakshi the great,’ Vroom said.
I read out the contents of his short mail:
‘Dear All,
Attached please find the much-awaited user manual of the customer
service website that changed the parameters of customer service at Western
Appliances. I just wrapped this up today. I would love to discus this more
when I’m in Boston…’
I let out a silence whistle.
‘Boston? How is that ass going to Boston,’ Vroom said.
‘Bakshi’s going to Boston,’ Vroom said. ‘Any of you ladies want to tag
along?’
‘What?’ Esha said. ‘What is he going to Boston for?’
‘To talk about our website. Must have swung a trip for himself,’ I said.
‘What the hell is going on here anyway? On one hand we are downsizing
to save costs, on the other hand there is cash to send idiots on trips to the
US?’ Vroom said and threw his stress ball on the table. It hit the pen stand and
the contents fell out.
‘Careful,’ Esha said, sounding irritated, as a few pens rolled towards
her. She had her mobile phone in her hand, probably still trying to call
someone.
‘Madness. That is what this Connexions is. Boston!’ Priyanka said and
shook her head. She was surfing the Internet. I wondered which sites she was
looking at—wedding dresses, life in the US, or the Lexus official website.
I was about to close Bakshi’s message when vroom stopped me.
‘Open the document,’ Vroom said, ‘just open the file he sent,
‘It’s the same file we sent him. The user manual,’ I said.
‘Did you open it?’
‘No, what is the need…’
‘Just open it,’ he said so loudly that Esha looked at us. I wondered
whom she was calling this late, but Vroom’s voice was battering into me.
I opened the file, which was our user manual.
‘Here, it is the same,’ I said, and scrolled down. As I reached the bottom
of the first page, my jaw grew lax, partly in horror and partly in reflex
preparation to voice some major curse words.
Western Computers Troubleshooting Website
Project Details and User Manual.
Developed by Connexions, Delhi
Subhash Bakshi
Manager, Connexions
‘Like fuck it is the same,’ Vroom said and threw the pens he had
collected back on the table. One landed on Esha’s lap, who by this time had
tried to connect to a number at least twenty times. She threw an angry look
at Vroom and hurled the pen back at him. He ignored her as his eyes were on
my screen.
‘It says it is by fucking Subhash Bakshi,’ Vroom said., tapping his finger
hard on my monitor. ‘Check this out. Mr Moron, who can’t tell a computer
from a piano, has done this website and this manual. Like crap he has.’
Vroom banged his fists on the table. In a mini-fit, he violently swept the
table with his hands. All the pens fell on the floor.
‘What is wrong with you?’ Esha said and pulled her chair away to avoid
to shower of pens. Desperately shaking the phone to get a connection, she got
up and went to the conference room.
‘He passed off our work as his, Shyam. Do you realize that/’ he said and
shook my shoulder hard.
I was numb as I started at the first page of our, or rather Bakshi’s,
manual. This time Bakshi had bypassed himself in stealing credit. My head felt
dizzy and I fought to breathe.
‘This is so crap. Six months of work on this manual alone,’ I said and
closed the file. ‘I never thought he would stoop this low.’
‘And?’ Vroom said.
‘And what? I don’t really know what to do. I’m in shock. Plus, right now
there is this fear he may downsize us…’ I said.
‘Downsize us?’ Vroom said and stood up. ‘We worked on it for six
months man. And all you can say is we can’t do anything as he may downsize
us? This fucking loser Bakshi is turning you into a loser. Mr Shyam, you are
turning into a mousepad, people are rolling over you everyday. Priyanka tell
him t say something. Go to Bakshi’s office and hold his damn collar.’
Priyanka looked up at us, and for the second time that night, our eyes
met bang on. She had that look; that same gaze that had made me feel small
before. Like what was the point of even shouting at me.
She shook her head and gave a wry smile. I knew that wry smile by
heart, too. Like she had known this was coming all along. I had the urge to go
shake her by the collar. It is freaking easy to give those looks when you have a
Lexus waiting for you, I wanted to say. But I didn’t say anything. Bakshi’s
move had hurt me—it wasn’t just the six months of efforts, but also that the
prospects for my promotion were gone. And that meant—proof!—Priyanka was
going too. But right now the people see you as weak if you express hurt. They
always want to see you strong, meaning in a raging temper. Maybe I do not
have it in me. That is why I am not a team leader. That is why no girls
distribute sweets in the office for me.
‘Are you there, My Shyam?’ Vroom said. ‘Let’s email all the people this
was sent to and tell them what is going on.’
‘Just cool down Vroom. There is no need to act like a hero,’ I snapped.
‘Oh really? So, what should we act like? Losers? Tell us Shyam, you
should be the expert on that,’ Vroom said.
A surge of anger chocked me. ‘Just shut up and sit down,’ I said. ‘What
do you want to do? Send another mail to the whites? And tell them there’s infighting
going on here? And whom are they going to believe: somebody who is
going to Boston to meet them or some frustrated agent who claim he did all
the work? Get real Mr Vroom. You’ll get fired and noting else. Bakshi is
management—he manages, yes, he does. But only his own even notice
Radhika. She was standing next to me with a bottle of water in her hand.
‘Thanks,’ I said and took a few noisy sips.
‘Feeling better?’ Radhika said.
I raised my hand to stop her from saying more. ‘I don’t want to talk
about this anymore. It is between us and Bakshi. And I don’t want some
random people, whose life is one big party, to give their opinion on it. Yes,
my boss sucks. Most bosses suck. It isn’t such a big deal,’ I said and sat down. I
glared at Vroom. He sat down as well.
Vroom opened a notepad and drew a 2x2 matrix.
‘What the fuck is that/’ I said.
‘I think I’ve finally figured Bakshi out. Let me explain with the help of a
diagram,’ Vroom said.
‘Don’t mess with me. I don’t want any diagrams,’ I said.
‘Just hear me,’ Vroom said as he labeled the matrix.
On the horizontal axis he wrote ‘good’ and ‘evil’ next to each box. On
the vertical axis, he wrote ‘smart’ and ‘stupid.’
‘Okay, here is my theory about people like Bakshi,’ Vroom said and
pointed with his pen to the matrix. ‘There are four kinds of bosses in this
world based on two dimensions: a) how smart or stupid they are, and b)
whether they are good or evil. Only with extreme good luck do you get a boss
who is smart and a good human being. However, Bakshi is the most dangerous
but common category. He is stupid, as we all know. But more than that—he is
evil,’ Vroom said, tapping his pen in the relevant quadrant of the matrix.
‘Stupid-evil,’ I echoed.
‘Yes, we understand him. He is scary one. He is like a blind snake: you
feel sorry for it, but it still has a poisonous bite. You can see it—he is stupid,
hence the call center is so mismanaged. But he is also evil, so he will make
sure all of us go down instead of him.’
I shook my head.
‘Forget it. Destiny has put an asshole in my path. What can I say,’ I said
and smirked.
Radhika took the bottle from my desk. ‘Sorry to interrupt your
discussion guys, but I hope you weren’t talking about me when you said
people whose life is a party. My life is not a party, my friend. It really isn’t—‘
‘—It wasn’t you, Radhika. Shyam most clearly meant me.’ Priyanka
interrupted Radhika.
‘Oh forget it,’ I said and stood up. I moved from the desk just to get
away from these nagging people. As I felt, I could hear Vroom’s words: ‘If I
could just once have the opportunity to fuck this Bakshi’s happiness, I’d
consider myself the luckiest person on earth.’
#20
I walked away from the WASG desk. My mind was still messed up. I felt
like cutting Bakshi into little bits and feeding those bits to every street dog in
Delhi. I approached the conference room. The door was shut. I knocked and
waited for a few seconds. Everything seemed quiet inside.
‘Esha? I said and turned the knob to open the door.
Esha was sitting one of the conference room chairs. Her right leg was
bent and resting on another chair. She was examining the wound on her shin.
She held a blood-tipped box cutter in her hand. I noticed a used bandaid
on the table. There was fresh blood coming out of the wound on her shin.
‘Are you okay?’ I said, moving close to her.
Esha turned to look at me with a black expression.
‘Oh hi Shyam,’ she said in a calm tone.
‘What are you doing here? Everyone’s looking for you.’
‘Why? Why would anyone look for me?’
‘No particular reason. What are you doing here anyway? And your
wound is bleeding, do you want some lotion or a bandage/’ I said and looked
away. The sight of blood nauseates me. I don’t know how doctors show up to
work everyday.
‘No Shyam, I like it like this. With lotion, it may stop hurting,’ Esha said.
‘What?’ I said. ‘Isn’t that the idea? You want the pain to end, right?’
‘No, Esha smiled sadly. She pointed to the wound with the box cutter.
‘This pain takes my mind away from the real pain. Do you know what real pain
is, Shyam?’
I really had no idea what this girl was saying. But I knew if she didn’t
cover the wound soon, I’d throw up my recently consumed chocolate cake.
‘Listen, I’ll get the first-aid kit from the supplies room.’
‘You didn’t answer my question. What is the real pain, Shyam/’
‘I don’t know…what is it?’ I said, shifting anxiously as I saw fresh drops
of blood trickle down her smooth leg.
‘Real pain is mental pain,’ Esha said.
‘Right,’ I said, trying to sound intelligent. I sat down on a chair next to
her.
‘Ever felt mental pain, Shyam?’
‘I don’t know if I have. I’m a shallow guy, you see. I don’t feel a lot of
things,’ I said.
‘Everyone feels pain, because everyone has a dark side to their life.’
‘Dark side?’
‘Yes, dark side—something you don’t like about yourself, something that
makes you angry or something that you fear, all this makes up our dark side.
Do you have a dark side, Shyam/’
‘Oh let’s not go there. I have so many—like half a dozen dark sides. I am
like dark-sided hexagon,’ I said.
‘Ever felt guilt, Shyam? Real hard, painful guilt?’ she said as her voice
became weak.
‘What happened, Esha/’ I said, as I finally found a position that allowed
me to look at her face but avoid a view of her wound.
‘Can you promise not to judge me if I tell you something?’
‘Of course,’ I said, as it took me a second to figure out what ‘slept’
meant. It didn’t mean ‘zzzs.’
‘Yes, my agent said this man was connected. I just had to sleep with him
once to get a break in a major fashion show. Nobody forced me. I choose to do
it. But ever since, I feel this awful guilt. Every single moment. I thought it
would pass, but it hasn’t. and that pain is so bad, this wound in my leg feels
like a tickle,’ she said and took the box cutter to her shin. She started
scrapping skin around the wound.
‘Stop it Esha, what are you doing/’ I said and snatched the box cutter
from her. ‘Are you insane? You’ll get tetanus or gangrene or whatever other
horrible-things they show on TV in those vaccination ads.’
‘This is tame. I’ll tell you what is dangerous. Your own fucked up brain,
the delusional voice in you that says you have it in you to become a model.
You know what this man said afterwards/’
‘Which man?’ I said as I shoved the box cutter to the other side of the
table.
‘The guy I slept with—a forty-year-old designer. He told my agent later I
was too short to be a ramp model,’ Esha said, her voice rising as anger
mingled with sadness. ‘Like the bastard didn’t know that when he slept with
me.’ She began crying. I don’t know what is worse—a shouting girl or a crying
one. I’m awful at handling either. I placed my hands on Esha’s shoulders,
ready for a hug in case she needed it.
‘And that son of a bitch sends some cash as compensation afterwards,’
she said, now sobbing. ‘And my agent tells me, this is part of life. Sure it is
part of life—part of Esha the failed model’s fucked-up life. Give me my box
cutter back, Shyam,’ she said, spreading a palm.
‘No, I won’t. Listen, now I am not really sure what to do in this
situation, but just take it easy,’ I said. It was true; nobody would ever demand
to have sex with me. Therefore, feeling-guilty-after-demanded-sex was
completely unfamiliar territory.
‘I hate myself, Shyam. I just hate myself. And I hate my face, and the
stupid mirror that shows me this face. I hate myself for believing people who
told me I could be a model. Can I get my face altered?’
I did not know of any plastic surgeons who specialized in turning pretty
girls ugly, so I kept quiet. She stopped crying after ninety seconds, around the
time any girl would stop crying if you ignored her. She took a tissue from her
bag and wiped her eyes,
‘Shall we go? They must be waiting,’ I said. She held my hand to stand
up.
‘Thanks for listening to me,’ Esha said. Only women think there is a
reason to thank people if they listen to them.
#21
To my disgust, Priyanka’s wedding was still the topic of discussion when
Esha and I returned to the bay.
Esha sat down quietly.
‘Now where were you?’ Priyanka asked Esha.
‘Here only. Wanted to make a private call,’ Esha said.
‘I’m taking mother-in-law tips from Radhika,’ Priyanka said. I’m so not
looking forward to that part. She seems nice now, but who knows how she will
turn out.’
‘C’mon, you are getting so much more in return. Ganesh is such a nice
guy,’ Radhika said.
‘Anyway I’d take three mothers-in-law for a Lexus. Bring it on man’
Vroom said.
Radhika and Priyanka started laughing.
‘I’ll miss you Vroom,’ Priyanka said, still laughing, ‘I really will.’
‘Who else will you miss?’ Vroom said and all of us fell silent.
Priyanka shifted on her seat: Vroom had caught her on the spot. She did
not want to say my name, I knew it.
‘Oh I’ll miss all of you,’ she said, diplomacy queen that she can be when
she wants to. She thinks she can outsmart the world with her boring replies.
‘Whatever, Vroom said.
‘Anyway, don’t wish for three mothers-in-law, Vroom. It can be like
asking for three Bakshis. Well, at least it can be for women, Radhika said.
‘So your mother-in-law is evil?’ Vroom said.
‘I never said she is bad. But she did say those things to Anuj. What will
he think?’
‘Nothing. He won’t think anything. He knows how lucky he is to have
you,’ Priyanka said firmly.
‘It is hard sometimes. She isn’t my mom, after all.’
‘Oh, don’t go there. I can get along with anyone else’s mom better than
my own. My mom’s neurosis has made me mother-in-law proof,’ Priyanka
said, and everyone on the desk laughed. I did not, as there is nothing funny
about Priyanka’s mom to me. Emotional manipulators like her should be put in
jail and made to watch sappy TV serials all day.
‘Anuj should be okay, right? Tell me guys: he won’t hate me?’ Radhika
said.
‘No,’ Priyanka got up and went to Radhika. ‘He loves you and he will be
fine.’
‘You want to check if he is okay?’ Vroom said. ‘I have an idea.’
‘What?’ Radhika said.
I looked at Vroom. What the hell did he have to say about Anuj and
Radhika?
‘Let’s play radio jockey,’ Vroom said. ‘it’s really fun.’
‘What is radio jockey?’ Radhika was baffled.
‘Well. I call Anuj and pretend I cam calling from a radio show. Then I tell
him he has won a prize, a large bouquet of roses and a box of Swiss
chocolates that he can send to anyone he loves, anywhere in India, with a
loving message. So then, we all get to hear what romantic lines he says to
you.’
‘C’mon, it will never work,’ Priyanka said. ‘You can’t sound like an RJ.’
‘Trust me. I am a call center agent. I can make a convincing RJ.’ Vroom
said.
I was curious to see how Vroom would do his RJ act.
‘Okay,’ Vroom said as he got ready, ‘It’s show time, folks. Take line five
everyone. And no noise: breathe away from the mouthpiece, okay?’
Radhika gave him the number as we took line five. Vroom dialed Anuj’s
mobile phone.
We glued the earpiece to our ears. The telephone rang five times.
‘He’s sleeping,’ Priyanka whispered.
‘Shhh,’ Vroom went, as we heard someone pick up.
‘Hello?’ Anuj said in a sleepy voice.
‘Hello there, my friend, is this 98101-46301?’ Vroom said in an insanely
cheerful, radio jockey voice.
‘Yes, who is it?’ Anuj said.
‘It is your lucky call for tonight. This is RJ Max calling from Radio City
98.5 FM, and you my friend have just won a prize.’
‘Radio City? Are you trying to sell me something?’ Anuj said. I guess
being a salesperson himself, he was skeptical.
‘No my friend, I am not selling anything—no credit cards, no insurance
policies and no phone plans. I am just going to offer you a small prize from
our sponsor Interflora and you can request a song if you want to. Man, people
doubt me so much these days,’ Vroom said.
‘Sorry, I was just not sure,’ Anuj said.
‘Max is the name. What’s yours?’ Vroom said.
‘Anuj,’
‘Nice talking to you Anuj. Where are you right now?’
‘Kolkata.’
‘Oh, the land of sweets, excellent. Anyway, Anuj, you get to send a
dozen red roses with your message to anyone in India. This service is brought
to you by Interflora, one of the world’s largest flower delivery companies.’
Vroom was like a pro, I must admit.
‘And I don’t have to pay anything? Thanks Interflora,’ Anuj said with
suitable gratitude.
All of us had out mouths shut right and the headset mouthpiece covered
with our hands.
‘No my friend, no payment at all. So are you ready with your special
person’s name and address?’
‘Yes sure. I’d like to send it to my girlfriend Payal.’
I think the earth shook beneath us. I looked at Vroom’s face, his jaw
had dropped wide open. He waved a hand in confusion.
‘Payal?’ Vroom said, his voice dropping to more normal levels, less
exuberant than that of a hyperactive RJ.
‘Yes, she is my girlfriend. She lives in Delhi. She is modern type of girl,
so please make the bouquet trendy…’ Anuj said.
Radhika could not stay silent any longer.
‘Payal? What did you just say, Anuj? Your girlfriend Payal?’ Radhika said.
‘Who is that?...Radhika…?’
‘Yes, Radhika. Your fucking wife Radhika.’
‘What is going on here? Who is this Max guy, hey Max?’ Anuj said.
I think the Max guy just died. Vroom put his hand on his head,
wondering what to say next.
‘You talk to me, you asshole,’ Radhika said, probably cursing for the
first time since she got married. ‘What message were you going to send this
Payal?’
‘Radhika, honey. Listen this is a prank. Max? Max?
‘There is no Max. it is Vroom here,’ Vroom said in a black voice.
‘You bastar—‘ Anuj began before Radhika –stood up and cut the line. She
set back down on her chair, stunned. A few seconds later, she broke into
tears.
Vroom looked at Radhika. ‘damn, Radhika I am so sorry,’ he said.
Radhika did not answer. She just cried and cried. In between, she lifted
the half-knit scarf to wipe her tears. Something told me Radhika would never
finish the scarf.
Esha held Radhika’s hand tight. Maybe the tear bug passed through
hands because Esha started crying as well. Priyanka went and brought back
water. Radhika poured out a glassful of tears, and drank the glass of water.
‘Take it easy. It’s probably a misunderstanding,’ Priyanka said. She
looked at Esha, puzzled about why Esha was so upset over Payal, I guess
Esha’s ‘real pain’ was back.
Radhika rifled through her bag looking for her headache pills. She only
found an empty blister pack. She mouthed some curses and threw it aside.
‘Radhika/’ Priyanka said.
‘Just leave me alone for a few minutes,’ Radhika said.
‘Girls, I really need to talk,’ Esha said, a she wiped her tears.
‘What’s up?’ Priyanka said as she looked at Esha. They exchanged
glances: Esha used the female telepathic network to ask Priyanka to come to
the toilet. Priyanka tapped Radhika’s shoulder and the girls stood up.
‘Now where are you girls going?’ Vroom said. ‘I caused this situation.
Can’t you talk here?’
‘We have our private stuff to discuss,’ Priyanka said firmly to Vroom and
left the desk.
‘What’s up? What’s the deal with Esha?’ Vroom said to me after the girls
were out of sight.
‘Nothing,’ I said.
‘C’mon tell me, she must have told you in the conference room.’
‘I can’t tell you,’ I said and looked at my screen. I tried to change the
topic. ‘Do you think Bakshi experts us to prepare for his team meeting?’
‘I think Esha is sad because she regards saying no to me,’ Vroom said.
I smirked
‘If not that, then what is it?’ Vroom said, looking at me with a puzzled
expression. I shrugged my shoulders.
‘Fine. I’ll use our earlier technique. I am going to the toilet to find out,’
Vroom said.
‘No Vroom, no,’ I said. I tried to grab his shirt, but he pulled away and
went to the men’s room.
I did not chase after him. I did not care if he found out. I figured he
ought to know what his live interest was up to anyway. I called systems and
told them the calls had not resumed yet. They promised to come to my desk
with the new cable within ‘five minutes maximum’. I guess systems guys are
busy. Computers are supposed to help men—but enough computers need help
from men as well.
With no one at the desk and systems down, I decided to take a walk
around the room. I passed by Military Uncle’s raised his head. I looked at his
face: his wrinkles seemed more pronounced, making him look older.
‘My son replied to the mail I sent,’ he said. ‘I think the file was too big.’
‘Really? What did he say? I said.
Military Uncle shook his head and put his head back on the desk. The
message on his screen caught my eye. It was an email from his son.
Dad... you have cluttered my life enough, now stop
cluttering my mailbox. I do not know what came over me that I
allowed communication between you and my son. I don’t want
your shadow on him. Please stay away and do not send him any
more emails. For literally or otherwise, we don’t want your
attachments.
‘It’s nothing,’ Uncle said, as he closed all the windows on his screen. ‘I
should get back to work. What happened? Your systems are down again?’
‘A lot is down tonight, not just the systems,’ I said and returned to my
seat.
 #2 2
‘Did you know?’ Vroom whispered to me as he returned from the men’s
toilet.
‘What?’ I said.
‘Esha’s big bad story.’
‘I’d rather not discuss it.. it’s her private matter.’
‘No wonder she won’t go out with me. She needs to romp her way to
the ramp doesn’t she?’ Bitch.’
‘Mind your language,’ I said, ‘and where are the girls?’
‘Coming back soon. Your chick was consoling Radhika when I left.’
‘Priyanka is not my chick Vroom. Will you just shut up?’ I said.
‘Okay, I will shut up. That is what a good call center agent does right?
Crap happens around him and he just smiles and says how can I help you/
Like, someone just slept with the one girl I care for. But it is okay right? Pass
me the next dumb customer.’
‘The girls are coming,’ I said as I saw them return. ‘Pretend you know
nothing about Esha.’
The desk was silent as the girls took their seats. Vroom was about to say
something, but I signaled him to be quiet. The systems guy finally showed up
with new kick-proof wires and re-installed our systems. I was relieved as calls
began to trickle in. sorting Americans’ oven and fridge problems was easier
then solving our life’s problems.
I looked at Priyanka once; she was busy with a caller. ‘My chick,’ I
smirked to myself at Vroom’s comment. She was no longer my chick. She was
going to marry a rich, successful guy—someone who had no competition from
a loser like me. Certainly not after Bakshi backstabbed me with his website, I
thought. But had I given up? Did I still feel for her? I shook my head at the
irrelevant questions. How did it matter if I still felt for her? I did not deserve
her, and I was not going to get her. That was reality, and as is often the case
with me, reality sucks,
Esha was still quite subdued after returning from the toilet. Priyanka
was trying to cheer her up.
‘Get a flowing lehnga for the engagement. But what will you wear for
the wedding? A sari?’ Priyanka asked Esha between calls.
‘My navel rig will show,’ Esha said.
I am constantly amazed at the ability of women to calm down. All they
need to do is talk, hug and cry it out for ten minutes—and then they can face
any of life’s crap. Esha’s ‘real pain’ was obviously much better, or she was at
least distracted from it, given she could discuss her dress plans for Priyanka’s
big day.
‘Don’t do anything elaborate,’ Priyanka said, ‘I’m going to tell my
mother I want a simple sari. Of course, she will freak out. Hey Radhika, are
you okay?’ Priyanka said, as she noticed Radhika massaging her forehead.
‘I’ll be fine. I am just one of migraine pills,’ Radhika said as she picked
up a call. ‘Western Appliances, Regina speaking. How may I help you?’
The landline telephone’s ring caught everyone’s attention.
This is my call. Guys I know system is live, but can I take this call?’
Priyanka said.
‘Sure. Call flow is so light anyways,’ Vroom said as the landline
continued to ring.
Priyanka’s hand reached for the telephone. I casualty switched the
option on my screen to listen in to the conversation.
‘By the way, dark blue mice is also a good colour,’ Vroom said as
Priyanka lifted the receiver.
‘What?’ Priyanka said.
‘I saw the Lexus website, dark blue mica is their best colour,’ Vroom
said.
I threw Vroom a disgusted glance.
‘At least that is what I think,’ Vroom’s voice dropped as he intercepted
my look.
‘Hello, my center of attention,’ Ganesh’s beaming voice came over
Priyanka and my phones.
‘Hi Ganesh,’ Priyanka said sedately.
‘What’s up, Priya? You sound serious,’ Ganesh said.
Priyanka hates it when people shorten her name to Priya. This moron
did not know that.
‘Nothing. Just having a rough day...sorry night. And please call me
Priyanka, she said.
‘Well, I am having a rocking day here. Everyone in office is so excited
for me. They keep asking me “so when is the date?”, “Where is the
honeymoon?”’
‘Yeah Ganesh, about the date,’ Priyanka said, ‘my mom just called.’
‘She did. Oh no. I thought I’d give you the good news myself.’
‘What good news?’
‘That I am coming to India next month. We should get married then
only. What say, honeymoon straight from there? People said the Bahamas is
amazing. But I’ve always wanted to go to Paris. Because what could be more
romantic than Paris.’
‘Ganesh,’ Priyanka said, her voice frantic.
‘What?’
‘Can I say something?’
‘Sure. But first tell me, Paris or Bahamas?’
‘Ganesh.’
‘Please tell me where you’d rather go.’
‘Paris. Now can I say something?’ Priyanka said.
Esha and Radhika raised their eyebrows when they heard the word
Paris. It was not difficult to guess that honeymoon planning was in progress.
‘Sure. What do you want to say?’ Ganesh said.
‘Don’t you think it is a little rushed?’
‘What?’
‘Our marriage. We have only talked to each other for a week. I know,
we spoke quite a bit, but still.’
‘You’ve said yes to me right?’ Ganesh said.
‘Yes, but…’
‘Then why wait? I don’t get much leave here. And considering I now
spend my every living moment thinking about you, I’d rather get you here at
the earliest.’
‘But, this is marriage Ganesh. Not just a vacation. W have to give each
other time to get ready for this,’ Priyanka said and twirled a strand of hair
with her finger. I used to love playing with her hair when we were together.
‘But,’ Ganesh said, ‘you spoke to your mother, right? You heard how
happy she is about us getting married next month. My family is excited as
well. Marriage is a family occasion too, right?’
‘I know. Listen, maybe I am just having a rough night. Let me sleep over
it.’
‘Sure. Take your time. But did you think of a color?’
‘For what? The car/’
‘Yeah, I am going to pay the deposit tomorrow. So it is there when you
arrive—assuming you agree to next month, of course.’
‘I can’t say. Wait, I heard dark blue mica is nice.’
‘Really? I kind of like black,’ Ganesh said.
‘Well then take black. Don’t let me…’ Priyanka said.
‘No, dark blue mica it is. I like that colour. I’ll tell the dealer it is my
wife’s choice.
The words ‘my wife’ sizzled my inside the way they fry French fries at
McDonald’s. I closed my eyes for a few seconds. I could not bear to hear
another man talk like this to Priyanka.
‘Hey Ganesh, it is 2:25 a.m. here. I have to get ready for a 2:30 meeting
with the boss. Can we talk later?’ Priyanka said.
‘Sure. I might leave work early today. Maybe see some new tiles for the
pool. But I’ll call you when I get home okay?’
‘Pool?’ Priyanka said, as she took the bait.
‘Yes, we have a small swimming pool in our house.
‘Our house? You mean you have a private pool?’
‘Of Course. You know how to swim?’
‘I have never stepped inside a pool in my life,’ Priyanka said,.
‘Well, I can teach you. I am sure there are many interesting possibilities
in the pool.’
The French fries were burnt charcoal black from being over friend.
‘Bye Ganesh,’ Priyanka smiled and shook her head. ‘You guys are all the
same.’
She hung up the phone.
‘What’s up,’ Esha said as she filed her nails.
‘Nothing, same stuff. First tell me, you okay?’ Priyanka said.
‘I am fine please keep me distracted. I heard Paris.’
‘Yes, honeymoon destination. And of course, more pressure to get
married next month. I don’t want to, but I just might have to give in.’
‘Well, if it means seeing Paris sooner rather than later…’ Esha said and
looked over at us. ‘Right guys?’
‘Sure,’ Vroom said. ‘What do you think Shyam/’
Stupid ass, I hate Vroom.
‘Me?’ I said as everyone continued to look at me. Esha kept staring at
me for five seconds non-stop. I did not want to come across as sulking for
childish, my new tag for the night), so I responded.
‘Sure, might as well get it done. Then go to Paris or Bahamas or
whatever.’
Damn. I kicked myself as the words left my mouth. Priyanka heard me
and looked at me. Her nose twitched as she thought hard.
‘What did you just say Shyam?’ Priyanka said slowly, looking straight at
me, her nostrils flaring big-time.
‘Nothing,’ I said, avoiding eye contact. ‘I just said get married and go to
Paris sooner.’
‘No, you also said Bahamas. How did you know Ganesh mentioned
Bahamas?’ Priyanka said.
I kept quite.
‘Answer me, Shyam. Ganesh also suggested Bahamas, but I didn’t tell
you guys. How did you know he’d said that?’
‘I don’t know anything. I just randomly said it,’ I said, trying to be
convincing, but my shaking voice was giving me away.
‘Were you listening to my conversation? Shyam, have you played around
with the phone?’ Priyanka said and got up. She lifted the landline phone and
pulled it away from the table. The wires followed her. She looked down under
the table and tugged at the wires again. A little wire tensed up all the way
back to my seat. Damn, busted, I thought.
‘Shyam,’ Priyanka screamed at the top of her voice and banged the
landline instrument on the table.
‘Yes,’ I said, as calmly as possible.
‘What is going on here? I cannot believe you could sink so low. This is
the height of indecency,’ she said.
At least I had achieved the heights in something. I thought.
Radhika and Esha looked at me. I threw up my hands, pretending to be
ignorant of the situation.
Vroom stood and went up to Priyanka. He put his arm around her
shoulder, ‘C’mon Priyanka, take it east. We are all having a rough night here.’
‘Shut up. This is insane,’ she said and turned to me. ‘How could you tap
into my personal calls? I can complain about this and get you fired.’
‘Then do it,’ I said, ‘what are you waiting for? Get me fired. Do
whatever?’
Vroom looked at Priyanka and then at me. Realizing he could not do too
much to help, he returned to his seat.
Esha pulled Priyanka’s hand, making her sit down again.
‘What the…he…’ Priyanka said, anger and impending tears showing in
her voice. ‘Can’t once expect just a little decent from their colleagues?’
I guess I was just a colleague now. An indecent colleague at that.
‘Say something,’ Priyanka said to me.
I stayed silent and disconnected the tapped wire. I showed her the
unhooked cable and threw it on the table.
Our eyes met. Even though we were silent, our eyes communicated.
My eyes said to her: Why are you humiliating me?
Her eyes said to me: Why are you doing this Shyam?
I think eye-talk is more effective than word-talk. Every now and then,
human beings should shut up and let their eyes speak. But Priyanka was in no
mood to be silent.
‘Why Shyam why? Why do you do such childish, immature things? I
thought we were going to make this amicable. We agreed to some terms and
conditions, didn’t we?’
I did not want to discuss our terms and conditions in public. I wanted
her to shut up and for me to scream instead. However, I was in the wrong,
like the car driver who hits a bicycle. I had no choice but to stay quiet. I had
to pay for my ‘childishness’.
’We said we could continue to work together. And that even if we have
ended our relationship, we do not have to end our friendship. But this?’ she
said and lifted the wire to the table. Then she threw it down again.
‘Sorry,’ I said, or rather whispered.
‘What/’ she said.
‘Sorry,’ I said, this time loud and clear. I hate it when she does this to
humiliate me. Fuck it, if you have heard an apology—just accept it.
‘Do me a huge favour. Stay out of my life pleas. Will you?’ Priyanka said,
her voice heavy with the sarcasm she had picked up from me.
I looked up at her and nodded. I felt like putting her and Ganesh in their
dark blue mica Lexus, wrapping it with the landline wire and drowning it in
Ganesh’s new pool.
Vroom sniggered, even as he continued clicking his mouse. A smile
rippled over Esha and Radhika as well.
‘What’s so funny?’ Priyanka said, her face still red.
‘It’s okay, Priyanka. C’mon, can’t you take it in a bit of good humor?’
Vroom said.
‘Your humor,’ Priyanka said and paused, ‘has a tumor. It isn’t funny to
me at all.’
‘It’s 2:30 guys,’ Esha said and clapped her hands, ‘time to got o Bakshi’s
office.’
Priyanka and I gave each other one final glare before we got up to
leave.
‘Is Military Uncle required?’ Esha said.
‘No. just the voice agents,’ I said. I looked at Military Uncle at the end
of the room. I could see he was busy at the chat helpline.
‘Let’s go Radhika,’ Vroom said.
‘Do you think he loves her? Or is it just sex? Some good, wild sex that
they share?’ Radhika said.
‘You okay Radhika?’ I said.
‘Yes, I am fine. I am surprised that I am, actually. I think I must be in
shock. Or maybe nobody has taught me an appropriate reaction for this
situation. My husband is cheating on me. What am I supposed to do? Scream?
Cry? What?’
‘Nothing for now. Let’s just attend Bakshi’s meeting,’ Vroom said as we
turned to go to Bakshi’s room.
My brain was still fumbling at Priyanka’s words—‘we had terms and
conditions’. Like our break-up was a business contract. Every moment of our
last date replayed itself as I walked to Bakshi’s office. We had gone to Pizza
Hut, and pizzas have never tasted as good ever since.
 # 23
My Past Dates with
Priyanka—V
Pizza Hut, Sahara Mall, Gurgaon
Four months before this night
She came on time that day. After all, she was coming with a purpose.
This was not a date—we were meeting to formally break up. Actually, there
was nothing left in our relationship to break anymore. Still, I had agreed, if
only to see her face as she told me. She also wanted to discuss how we were
to interact with each other and move forward. Discuss, interact, move
forward—when you start using words like that, you know the relationship is
dead.
We chose Pizza Hut only because it was, well, convenient. For breakups,
location takes priority over ambience. She had come to shop in Sahara
Mall, where half of Delhi descends whenever there is a public holiday.
‘Hi,’ she said and looked at her watch. ‘Wow! Look, I have actually
come on time today. How are you?’ she held her shirt collar and shook it for
ventilation. ‘I can’t believe it is so hot in July.’
Priyanka cannot tolerate awkward silences; she will say anything to fill
in the gaps. Cut the bullshit, I wanted to say, but did not.
‘It’s Delhi. What else do you expect?’ I said.
‘I think most people who come to mails just come for the airconditioning—‘
‘Can we do this quickly?’ I said, interrupting her. Consumer motives of
mall visitors did not interest me.
‘Huh?’ she said, startled by my tone.
The waiter came and took our order. I ordered two separate small
cheese ‘n mushroom pizzas. I did not want to share a large pizza with her,
even though, on a per square inch of pizza basis, the large one worked out
way cheaper.
‘I am not good at this break-up stuff, so let’s not drag this out,’ I said.
‘We’ve met for a purpose. So now what? Is there a break-up line that I’m
supposed to say?’
She stared at me for two seconds. I avoided looking at her nose. Her
nose, I had always felt, belonged to me.
‘Well I just thought we could do it in a pleasant manner. We can still be
friends, right?’ she said.
What is with women wanting to be friends forever? Why can’t they
make a clear decision between a boyfriend and no-friends?
‘I don’t think so. Both of us have enough friends.’
‘See, this is what I don’t like about you. That tone of voice…’ she said.
‘I thought we decided not to discuss each other’s flaws today. I have
come here to break up, not to make a friend or get an in-depth analysis of my
behavior.’
She kept silent until the pizzas arrived on our table. I started eating a
slice.
‘Perhaps you forget that we work together. That makes it a little more
complicated,’ Priyanka said.
‘Like how?’
‘Like if there is tension between us, it will make it difficult to focus on
work—for us and for the others,’ she said.
‘So what do you suggest? I have broken up already, now should I resign
as well?’ I said.
‘I didn’t say that. Anyway, I am going to be in this job only nine more
months. By next year I would have saved enough to fund my B.Ed. Therefore
the situation will automatically correct itself. But if we can agree to certain
terms and conditions—like if we can remain friendly in the interim…’
‘I can’t force myself to be friendly,’ I interrupted her, ‘my approach to
relationship is different. Sorry if it is not practical enough for you. But I can’t
fake it.’
‘I’m not telling you to fake it,’ she said.
‘Good. Because you are past the stage of telling me what to do. Now, let
us just get this over with. What are we supposed to say? I now pronounce
ourselves broken up? Then we say, I do, I do?’
I pushed my plate away. I had completely lost my appetite. I felt like
tossing the pizza like a Frisbee to the end of the room.
‘What, say something,’ I said, after she had remained silent for ten
seconds.
‘I don’t know what to say,’ she said, her voice cracking.
‘Really? No words of advice, no last minute preaching, no moral high
ground in these final moments for your good-for-nothing unsettled boyfriends?
C’mon Priyanka, don’t lose your chance to slamming the loser.’
She collected her bag and stood up. She took out a hundred-rupee note
and put it on the table–her contribution for the pizza.
‘Okay, she leaves in silence again. Once again I get to be the prick,’ I
mumbled, loud enough for her to hear.
‘Shyam,’ she said, slinging her bag on to her shoulder.
‘Yes?’ I said.
‘You know how you always say you are not good at anything? I don’t
think that’s true. Because there is something you are quite good at,’ she said.
‘What?’ I said. Perhaps she wanted to give me some last minute praise
to make me feel better, I thought.
‘You are damn good at hurting people. Keep it up.’
With that, my ex-girlfriend turned around and left.
#24
We reached Bakshi’s office at 2:30 AM. The size of a one-bedroom flat,
it is probably the largest unproductive office in the world. His desk, on which
he had a swank flat screen OPC, is at one corner. Behind the desk is a
bookshelf full of heavy management books of a scary thickness. Some of them
are so heavy you can use them as assault weapons. The thought of slamming
one hard on Bakshi’s head had often crossed my mind during previous team
meetings. Apart from blonde threesomes, I think hitting your boss is the
ultimate Indian male fantasy.
At another corner of the room is a conference table and six chairs. In
the center of the table is a speakerphone for multiparty calls with other
offices.
Bakshi was not in his office when we reached his room. ‘Where the hell
is her?’ Vroom said.
‘Maybe he’s in the toilet?’ I said.
‘Executive toilet, it is a different feeling,’ Vroom said as I nodded in
agreement.
We sat around Bakshi’s conference table. All of us had brought
notebooks to the meeting. We never really used them, but it always seems
necessary to sit in meetings with an open notebook.
‘Where is he?’ Priyanka said.
‘I don’t know. Who cares,’ Vroom said and stood up. ‘Hey Shyam, want
tot check out Bakshi’s computer/’ he walked over to Bakshi’s desk.
‘What?’ I said. ‘Are you crazy? He will come any minute. What can you
see so fast anyway?’
‘Just for fun. Do you want to know what website Bakshi visits?’ Vroom
said and learned over so he could reach Bakshi’s keyboard. He opened up
Internet Explorer and pressed Ctrl+H to pull out the history of visited
websites.
‘Have you gone nuts?’ you’ll get in trouble,’ I said.
‘Come back Vroom,’ Esha said.
‘Okay, I’ve just fired a printout,’ Vroom said and sprinted across the
room to Bakshi’s printer. He fetched the printout and leaped back to the
conference table.
‘Are you stupid?’ I said.
‘Okay guys check this out,’ Vroom said as he held the A4 sheet in front
of him. ‘Timesofindia.com, rediff.com, and then we have, Harvard business
review website, Boston weather website, Boston places to see, Boston real
estate—‘
‘—What with him and Boston?’ Esha said.
‘He is going there on a business trip soon,’ Radhika reminded her.
‘And what other website?’ I said.
‘There is more. Aha, here is what I was looking for: awesomeindia.com—
the best porn site for Indian girls, adultfriendfinder.com—a sex personals site,
cabaretlounge.com—a strip club in Boston, porninspector.com… hello, the list
goes on this department.’
‘What’s with him and Boston?’ I repeated Esha’s words.
‘Who knows?’ Vroom said and laughed. ‘hey check this out: the official
website for Viagra, visited six hours ago.’
‘I’ll try and ask him about Boston,’ Priyanka said.
We heard Bakshi’s footsteps and Vroom quickly folded the sheet. We
turned quiet and opened our notebooks to fresh blank pages.
Bakshi took fast steps as he entered his office.
‘Sorry team. I had to visit the computers bay team leaders for some
pertinent managerial affairs. Si, how is everyone doing tonight?’ Bakshi said as
he took the last empty seat at his conference table.
No one responded. I nodded my head to show I was doing fine, but
Bakshi was not looking at me.
‘Team, I have called you today to tell you about a few changes that may
happen at Connexions. We need to right size people.’
‘So, people are getting fired. It wasn’t a rumor,’ Vroom said.
Radhika’s face turned white. Priyanka and Esha had a shocked
expression.
‘We never want to fire people, Mr Victor. But we have to right size
sometime.’
‘Why? Why are we firing people when clearly there are other things we
can do,’ vroom said.
‘We have carefully, evaluated all the plausible and feasible alternatives,
I am afraid, ‘Bakshi said and took out a pen. Everyone moved back nervously.
The last thing we needed was another Bakshi diagram.
‘Cost-cutting is the only alternative,’ Bakshi said and began to draw
something. However, the pen did not work. He tried to shake it into action, a
pointless thing to do with a ball pen. The pen refused to cooperate, perhaps
sick of Bakshi’s abuse.
I was going to offer y own pen but Esha, who was sitting at my side,
sensed the movement and quickly pulled at my elbow to stop me. Bakshi
continued to lecture us. He spoke non-stop for six minutes (or ninety-six
breaths). He went into various management philosophies, schools of thought,
corporate governance methods and other deeply complicated stuff that I know
nothing about, his point was that we should make the company more
efficient. He just did not have an efficient way to say it.
Vroom had promised me he would not mention the website to Bakshi
tonight, at least until the lay-offs were over. However, this did not stop him
from taking on Bakshi.
‘Sir, but cost-cutting is useless if we have no sales growth. We need
more clients, not non-stop cuts until there is no company left,’ Vroom said,
after Bakshi had finished his speech. I guess somewhere within him was a diehard
optimist who really thought Bakshi would listen to him.
‘We have though of every alternative,’ Bakshi said. ‘A sales force is too
expensive.’
‘Sir, we can create a sales force. We have thousands of agents. I am
sure some of them are good at sales. We talk to customers every day, so we
kn0ow what they want…’
‘But our clients are in the US, we have to sell there.’
‘So what? Why don’t we send some agents to the US to try and increase
our clients base. Why not guys? Vroom said and looked at us, as if we would
furiously nod our heads in approval. I was the only one listening, but
remained quiet.
Radhika was doodling on her pad, drawing a pattern that looked like
this:
Priyanka was making a table of numbers on her notepad. I think she was
making a calendar to figure out the day she was getting married. I felt like
ripping her notebook to shreds. Esha was digging her pen’s nib deep into her
notepad so that it came out at the other end.
‘Send agents to the US? Move them to Boston?’ Bakshi said and laughed.
‘Well a few of them, at least on trial basis. Some of them are really
smart. Who knows, they may get that one client that could save a hundred
jobs. Right Shyam?’ Vroom said
‘Huh?’ I said startled to hear my name.
‘Mr Victor, as a feedback-oriented manager I appreciate your inputs.
However, I do not think it is such a good idea,’ Bakshi said.
‘Why not?’ Vroom demanded with the innocence of a primary school
kid.
‘Because if it was such a good idea, someone would have thought of it
before. Why didn’t it strike me for instance?’ Bakshi said.
‘Huh?’ Vroom said, completely flabbergasted. I had heard it all before so
it did not move me. I was aware of every red, white, and black blood cell in
Bakshi’s body.
‘What’s the plan sir, when do we find out who gets fir…I mean rightsized?’
I said.
’Soon. We are finalizing the list, but we let you know by this morning or
early tomorrow night,’ Bakshi said, his forehead showing relief as I had not
challenged him.
‘How many people will lose their job, Sir?’ what percentage?’ Radhika
said, her first words in the meeting.
‘Thirty to forty is the plan as of now,’ Bakshi said in a practiced, calm
voice as if he was announcing the temperature outside.
‘That’s hundreds of people<’ Vroom said. As if it was such a difficult
calculation.
‘Such is corporate life, my friend,’ Bakshi said and got up, indicating
that the meeting was over. ‘You know what they say. It is a jungle out there.’
I don’t know who said that, but when I looked at Bakshi, I realized there are
buffoons in that jungle as well.
The girls collected their notebooks primly and stood up. Vroom sat
there for a few more seconds. He crushed the printout of websites visited by
Bakshi and put it in his pocket.
‘Thank you, Sir,’ Esha said.
‘You’re welcome. As you know, I am an ever-approachable manager.
Here or Boston, you can reach me anytime.’
We were at the door when Priyanka asked a question.
‘Sir, are you going to Boston soon/’
Bakshi was back at his desk. He had picked up the telephone but paused
when he heard Priyanka’s question. ‘Oh yes, I need to tell you about that. Not
that it’s very important. I am transferring to Boston soon. Maybe in a month
or so.’
‘Transferring to Boston?’ Vroom, Radhika, Esha, Priyanka and I all spoke
together.
‘Yes. You see I do not like to blow my own trumpet. But looks like they
recognized my contribution in the value-addition cycle of the company,’
Bakshi said, a smug smile sliming across his shiny face. I though of toppling the
entire bookshelf on his head.
‘But details will come later. Anyway, if you do not mind, I need to make
a call. I’ll keep you posted later if we have more news.’
Bakshi signaled us to shut the door as we left. As I closed the door, I felt
like somehow had slapped my face. In slow motion, we walked away from his
office.
#25
We returned to WASG after our meeting with Bakshi. Calls flashed on
the screen, but no one attended to them. I sat at my seat and opened my
email. I could not read anything as my mind was having a systems overload.
I looked at the time, it was 2.45 a.m.
Vroom sat at his desk and mumbled inaudible courses. He opened the
internal web page of Connexions on his computer. it had the map of the US on
it. He held up a pen and tapped at a point on the US east coast.
‘This, this is Boston,’ he said and clenched his fist tight around the pen.
‘This is where or boss will be while we are on the road looking for jobs.’
Everyone stayed quiet.
‘Can I ask why everyone is so bloody quiet?’ Vroom said.
‘I think we should start picking up some calls,’ I said started fumbling
with the controls on the telephone.
‘Like fuck we should,’ Vroom said and jabbed his pen hard on the
monitor. A loud ping startled everyone on the desk. Shattered glass made a
nine-inch wide, spider-web pattern on Vroom’s monitor. The rest of his
screen worked as if nothing had happened.
‘What happened,’ the girls said and came around to Vroom’s computer.
‘Damn it,’ Vroom said and threw his pen hard on the ground. It broke
into two pieces. Some people break into tears when they are upset. Some
break whatever is around them.
‘Oh no. the monitor is totally gone,’ Esha said. She put her hand on
Vroom’s shoulder, ‘Are you okay?’
‘Don’t you dare touch me, you slut,’ Vroom said and pushed her hand
away.
‘What?’ Esha said. ‘What did you just said?’
‘Nothing. Just leave me alone, al right? Go pray for your jobs or
whatever. Bloody bitch on her way to becoming a hooker,’ Vroom said and
moved his chair away from Esha.
For a few seconds the girls stood there, stunned. Then, slowly, they
walked back to their seats.
‘What’s wrong with him?’ Priyanka asked Esha in a whisper, which was
audible to us.
‘I told you he proposed again. Maybe he’s not taking my rejection so
well,’ Esha said to Priyanka.
‘Oh really?’ Vroom shouted and stood up. ‘You think this is about the
proposal? Like I don not know about your escapades. Everyone here knows it—
Shyam, Radhika and Priyanka. You thought I would not find out? I wish I’d
known before I proposed to a certified slut who’ll bang for bucks. I feel sick.’
Esha looked at all of us, shocked. Tears appeared in her eyes. She
started shaking, and Radhika helped her sit down. It is way more elegant to
cry sitting down than standing up.
Priyanka went up to Vroom’s seat. She stared at him, her face red. Slap!
She deposited a hard slap across Vroom’s face.
‘Learn how to talk to women you say one more nasty thing and I’ll screw
your happiness, understand?’ Priyanka said.
Vroom stared at Priyanka, his hand over his cheek. He was too stunned
to retaliate. I inserted myself between the two of them. Guys, can we have
some peace here,’ I said. ‘Things are already quite messed up. Please let’s sit
down and do some work.’
‘I can’t work. I don’t know if I’ll still have a job in a few hours,’
Priyanka said and moved back to her seat. She continued to flare at Vroom.
‘At least sit down,’ I said.
‘I want him to apologize to Esha. The idiot has to watch what he is
saying,’ Priyanka said.
Esha continued to cry as Radhika tried to console her.
‘What do you care about a job? You are getting married Women have it
easy,’ Vroom said.
What? Don’t you start that with me now,’ Priyanka said. She had
reached her seat but refused to sit down. ‘You think this is easy?’ she pointed
a finger to Esha and Radhika.
Vroom kept quiet and looked down.
‘Radhika found out her husband is cheating on her. This when she works
for him and his family day and night. And Esha can’t get a fair break unless
she sleeps past creepy men. But they are not breaking monitors and shouting
curses, Vroom. Just because we don’t make a noise doesn’t mean it is easy,’
she said, shouting loud enough so you could call it noise.
‘Can we not talk for two minutes. Do not take calls. But at least keep
quiet,’ I pleaded.
Esha stopped crying as Radhika gave her a glass of water. Priyanka sat
down and opened her handmade calendar. Vroom became quiet as he looked
at the shattered bits of glass on his desk.
The silence gave me a chance to reflect on Bakshi’s meeting. If I lost my
job, what would I do? Become an agent again? I could probably forget about
being a team leader.
‘I’m sorry,’ Vroom said.
‘What?’ Esha said.
‘I’m sorry, Esha,’ Vroom said, clearing his throat. ‘I said horrible and
hurtful things. I was disturbed myself. Please forgive me.’
‘It’s okay Vroom. It only hurts because there is a bit of truth in it,’ Esha
said with a wry smile.
‘I meant to say those horrible things to myself. Because,’ Vroom said
and banged two fists simultaneously on the table, ‘because the real hooker is
me, not you.’
‘What?’ I said.
‘Yes, this salary has hooked me. Every night I come here and let people
fuck me,’ Vroom said and picked up the telephone headset. ‘The Americans
fuck me with this, in my ears hundreds of times a night. Bakshi fucks me with
his management theories, backstabbing and threats to fire us. And the funny
thing is, I let them do it. For money, for security—I let it happen. Come fuck
me some more,’ Vroom said and threw the headset on the table.
‘Do you want water?’ Radhika said and handed him a glass of water.
Vroom took the glass and drank the water in one gulp. I wondered if he
would throw the empty glass on the floor and shatter it to pieces. Luckily, he
just banged it on the table.
‘Thanks,’ Vroom said. ‘I needed that. In fact, I need a break. Otherwise
I’ll go mad. I can’t take this right now.’
‘I need a break too,’ Priyanka said. ‘It’s all right Vroom. Only a few
more hours left for the shift to get over.’
‘No. I want a break now. I want to go for a drive. C’mon people, let’s all
go for a drive. I’ll get the Qualis,’ Vroom said and stood up.
‘Now? It is close to 3 a.m.,’ I said.
‘Yes, now. Who gives a damn about the calls? You may not even have a
job. Get up.’
‘Actually, if someone is going, can you please get some pills for me from
the 24-hours chemist/’ Radhika said.
‘No, all of us are going,’ Vroom said. ‘Get up Shyam. If you come
everyone will come.’
‘I’m game,’ Esha said.
‘Okay, I’ll come too. Just for a bit of fresh air,’ Priyanka said.
I looked at them. Everyone wanted to get out of his or her miseries, if
only for a few moments. I wanted to get away from Bakshi, Ganesh and
Connexions.
‘Okay, we can go. But we have to be back soon,’ I said.
‘Where are we going?’ Esha said, ‘I heard the new lounge bar Bed is
close by.’
‘No way, we’re just going for a drive…’ I said, but Vroom interrupted
me.
‘Great idea. We are going to Bed—damn cool place.’
‘I need a real bed to sleep,’ Radhika said and stretched her arms.
All of us got up. We decided to leave individually to prevent suspicions.
‘Get up, Military Uncle,’ Vroom said, as he went to his desk.
‘Huh?’ Uncle said getting up. Normally he would have scoffed at Vroom,
but I guess he was in too much pain over his son’s email to give a conscious
reaction.
‘We’re all going for a drive. The others will tell you everything. I’ll get
the Qualis,’ Vroom said and switched off Uncle’s monitor.
#26
At 3:00 A.M. share we were outside the main entrance of Connexions. A
white Qualis cam up and halted near us.
‘Get in,’ Vroom said, reaching over to open the doors.
‘It’s so cold. What took you so long,’ Esha said, getting into the front.
‘You try shifting a sound-asleep driver to another Qualis,’ Vroom said.
Radhika, Priyanka and I took the middle row; Military Uncle preferred to
sit by himself at the back. He looked slightly dazed. May be we all did.
Vroom drove prove past the executive parking area as we left
Connexions. We saw Bakshi’s white Mitsubishi Lancer.
‘Bakshi’s got a flash car,’ Esha said.
‘Company paid, or course,’ Priyanka said.
Vroom inched the Qualis forward and stopped close to the lancer. He
switched on the Qualis headlights. Bakshi’s car shone bright.
‘Can I ask a question? What’s the punishment for running people over?
Vroom said.
‘Excuse me?’ I said.
‘What is we ran this Qualis over Bakshi? We could do it when he comes
to pick up his car in the morning. How many years of jail are we talking?’
Vroom said.
It was a silly conversation, but Priyanka led him on anyway.
‘Depends on how the court sees it. If they see it as an accident and not
as homicide or murder, about to years,’ she said.
Vroom restarted the car and turned towards the exit gates.
‘Two years is not a lot. Can we divide it among the six of us? Four
months each?’ Vroom said.
‘I don’t know. Ask a lawyer,’ Priyanka shrugged.
‘Four months is like nothing to get rid of Bakshi from this earth,’ Esha
blew a strand of hair that had fallen against her lips.
‘Just sixteen weekends of sacrifice. Weekdays are like jail anyway,’
Vroom said. ‘What say we do it?’
By now we had left the call center and were now on the highway. Apart
from a few trucks, the roads were empty India has a billion people, but at
night, ninety-nine percent of them are fast asleep. This land then belongs to a
chosen few: truck drivers, later shift workers, doctors, hostel staff and call
center agents. We, the nocturnal, rule the roads and the country. Vroom
accelerated the Qualis to eighty kilometers and hour.
‘I doubt you can split the punishment. ‘The driver gets the full deal,’
Priyanka said, still on the stupid Bakshi-homicide topic, ‘plus if they know it’s
premeditated, you are talking ten years plus.’
‘Hmmm. Now ten years is a totally different equation. What you say
Shyam, still not too bad to get rid of Bakshi?’
‘Okay, enough of this stupidity,’ I said. ‘I though you were taking us out
of for a drink.’
‘I’m just…’ Vroom said, raising one hand from the steering wheel.
‘Shut up and drive. I need a drink,’ I said.
‘Chemist first please. Can we please stop at a chemist,’ Radhika said,
giving herself a head massage.
We dropped the topic of killing Bakshi. Though if the law allowed me on
e free murder in my life, I am quite clear who will top the list. No wait, I am
forgetting my ex-girlfriend’s mom here. I really wouldn’t know whom to kill
first, that’s the truth. Perhaps the law would see me as a special case and
allow me two murders.
Vroom took a sharp right turn on to a road that led to a 24-hours
chemist.
Radhika was quiet as she waited. I guess Payal occupied half her mind;
the other half had migraine.
‘There it is,’ Esha said, as we sighted a neon red cross.
‘Trust me. I know this area,’ Vroom said and accelerated the Qualis to a
hundred. ‘Man, roads and girls are so much more fun at night.’
‘That’s sick,’ Priyanka said.
‘Sorry, couldn’t help it,’ Vroom said and grinned.
Vroom parked the Qualis near the chemist. A sleepy boy, no more than
seventeen, manned the medicine shop. A few medical entrance exam guides
lay on the counter in front of him. A fly swatter served the function of a
bookmark. He looked bored and grateful to see us, more for the company,
probably, than the business.
Vroom and Radhika got out of the Qualis. I stepped out to stretch my
legs as well.
Radhika walked quickly upto the boy.
‘What do you want, Radhika? Saridon?’ Vroom said as we reached the
counter.
‘No,’ she shook her head. Turning to the boy, she said. ‘Three strips of
Fluoxetine, and five strips each of Sertraline and Paroxetine. Make it fast
please.’ She began to tap on the counter anxiously. Her reed bangles jingled a
little.
The boy gaped at Radhika. Then he turned around and started rifling
through the shelves.
Vroom and I moved a few steps away of escape the smell of medicine.
Vroom lit a cigarette and we shared a few puffs.
The boy returned with a stack of tablets and placed them on the
counter. Radhika reached out to grab them, but he put his right hand on top
of the pile of medicines and slid them away from her. ‘This is pretty strong
stuff, madam. You have a prescription?’ he asked.
‘It’s three in the morning,’ Radhika said in an irritated voice. ‘I ran out
of pills at work. Where the hell do you except me to find a prescription?’
‘Sorry madam. Just that sometimes these young kids come here to pick
up strange medicines before going to discos…’
‘Look at me, Radhika said, pointing to her face, ‘do I look like a
teenager in a mood to party?’
No, Radhika did not look like a teenager out to party to me—she looked
ill, with dark circles under her eyes. I wished the boy would give her the
medicines soon.
‘But these are still a lot of strong medicines, madam. What do you need
these for? I mean, what is wrong with you?’ the boy said.
‘Fuck you,’ Radhika said and banged her fist hard on the glass counter.
The glass shook but survived the impact. However two of Radhika’s red
bangles broke into a million pieces. Shattered bits of bright glass scattered
along the counter.
The noise scared the boy; he jumped back two steps. Vroom crushed his
cigarette and we joined them at the counter.
‘Excuse me, madam,’ the boy said.
‘Fuck you. You want to know what is wrong with me? You little punk,
you want to know what is wrong with me?’
‘What’s up Radhika, everything okay?’ Vroom said.
‘This dumbass wants to know what is wrong with me,’ Radhika said,
pointing her fingers at the boy. ‘Who the hell is he? What does he know about
me?’
’Calm down Radhika,’ I said, but she probably did not even hear me.
That is the story of my life; half the things I say go unnoticed.
‘What does he know about wrong and right? Everything is wrong with
me you moron—my husband is banging some bitch while I slog my guts out.
Happy now?’ Radhika said, her face more red than her broken bangles. She
held her head for a few seconds. Then she removed her hands from her head
and grabbed the medicines. The boy at the counter did not protest this time.
‘Water. Can I have some water?’ Radhika said.
The boy ran inside his shop returned with a glass of water.
Radhika tore a few pills out of her new stack. One, two, three—I think
she popped in three of them. Some migraine cure this was, I thought.
‘Four hundred sixty three rupees, madam,’ the boy said, his voice
trembling with fear.
‘I am alive because of this stuff. I need it to survive, not to party,’
Radhika said.
She paid for the medicines and walked back to the Qualis. Vroom and I
followed a few steps behind her.
‘What medicine is that?’ I said.
‘What the hell do I know? I am no doctor,’ Vroom said.
‘You sure she has a prescription for those/’ I said.
‘Ask her, if you have the guts,’ Vroom said.
‘No way. Let’s get to the lounge bar soon.’
‘Everything okay?’ Esha said as we got into the Qualis. ‘We heard
arguments.’
‘Nothing. As Bakshi would say, we just had some communication issues.
But now, let’s put them to Bed,’ Vroom said and turned the Qualis around.
Radhika put the medicines in her bag. Her face was calmer as the three
pills started to kick in.
Vroom pushed the Qualis to one hundred and ten, the maximum it
would go without the engine crying for mercy.
‘Slow down Vroom,’ Esha said.
‘Don’t use the words slow and Vroom in one sentence, Vroom said.
‘Dialogue,’ I said, ‘should we clap/’
 A truck stuffed with bags of hay loped past us like an inelegant
elephant. Our headlights made the gunny bags glow in the dark.
‘See, even the truck was going faster than us. I am a safe driver,’ Vroom
said.
‘Sorry guys,’ Radhika said, her voice becoming more normal as the drugs
took effect. ‘I apologize for creating a scene there.’
‘What did you buy Radhika? Why did the chemist make a fuss?’ I said,
unable to control my curiosity.
‘Anti-depressants. Chemists ask questions, as they’re prescription
drugs. But most of the time they don’t care.’
‘Wow! Vroom said. ‘You mean happy drugs like Prozac and stuff.’
‘Yes, Flueoxetine is Prozac. Except it is the Indian version, so a lot
cheaper.’
‘Like all of us,’ Vroom said and laughed at his own joke.
‘But it’s dangerous to take it without medical supervision,’ Priyanka
said. ‘Isn’t it addictive?’
‘It’s legal addiction. I can’t live without it and, yes, it’s is really bad for
you. But it is still better than having to face my life,’ Radhika said.
‘Leave it Radhika—they will harm you,’ Military Uncle spoke for the first
time on our drive.
‘I had cut down, Military Uncle. But sometimes one needs a bigger dose.
Can everyone please switch to another topic? How far is this Bed?’
‘just two kilometers from here. Ninety seconds if I am driving, a lot
more his comment, as I preferred for him to keep his eyes on the road. Some
inebriated truckies drove past as Vroom dodged them.
‘I heard the Bed is really snooty,’ Priyanka said. ‘I’m not dressed at all.’
She adjusted her salwar kameez. I noticed the border of glittering stone-work
on her dark green chiffon dupatta.
‘You look fine,’ Esha reassured her, ‘the chiffon look is really in. I
should be worried. I look so grungy.’
‘Don’t worry Esha. Anyone with a navel rings to never denied entry in a
disco,’ Vroom said.
‘Well, if you girls are in doubt, they definitely won’t let in a boring
housewife like me,’ Radhika said.
‘Don’t worry. As long as we’re ready to spend cash, we will be
welcome. Plus, the DJ at Bed is my classmate from school,’ Vroom said.
‘All you school classmates have such funky jobs,’ I said.
‘Well, that is the problem. They all have rich dads. I have to work hard
to match their lifestyle. If only my rich dad didn’t have to leave us,’ Vroom
said. ‘Anyway guys, welcome to Bed. And courtesy your humble driver, it is
just 3:23 a.m. He flashed the headlights at a sign. It said ‘Bed Lounge and
Barr: Your Personal Space’.
‘Oh no, didn’t realize we’re there already,’ Esha said. She fished out a
mirror from her purse and examined her lips. How did women manage before
mirror were invented?
‘How is my hair? It is awful as usual?’ Priyanka said to Radhika.
I looked at her long curly hair. Priyanka always said how she had the
‘most boring fair in the world’, and how could’ do nothing with it’. I felt the
urge to run my fingers through it just as I had done a hundreds times before.
But I couldn’t, as someone called Ganesh would be doing it for me in a few
weeks’ time. The oil for the Mc Donald’s French fries started simmering again
in my gut. What is the oil they use at McDonald’s anyway? It burns like hell.
‘Your hair is perfect. Anyway, it’ll be dark inside. Let’s go,’ Radhika
said. ‘C’mon Military Uncle, we’re going inside.’
#27
We followed Vroom to a huge black door, the entrance of Bed. The door
was painted so that it merged with the wall. An ultra beefy bounder and a
malnourished woman stood besides it.
‘Are you a member, sir?’ the malnourished woman addressed Vroom.
She was the hostess (or door-bitch), according to Priyanka) and wore a black
dress. She was about five feet four inches, but looked way taller because of
her thin frame and heels the size of a coke bottle.
‘So, we’ve just come for a quick drink,’ Vroom said and took out his
credit card. ‘Here, you can open the tab on this.’
‘I’m sorry sir, tonight is for members only,’ she said. The beefy bouncer
looked at us with a black, daft glare. Like Bakshi, he belonged to the nonhuman
species of mankind.
‘How do you become a member?’ I said.
‘You have to fill a form and pay the annual membership fee of fifty
thousand,’ the hostess said, as calmly as if she’d asked us for small change.
‘What? Fifty grand for this place in the middle of nowhere?’ Priyanka
said and pointed her finger to the door. She had draped her dupatta in
reverse, in an attempt to look hip.
‘I suggest you go somewhere else then,’ the hostess said. She looked at
Priyanka scornfully. A fully-clad female is a no-no at disco.
‘Don’t you look at me like that,’ Priyanka said.
‘Hey cool it, Priyanka, Vroom said and turned to the bouncer. ‘What’s
the deal, dude. Is DJ Jas inside? I know him.’
‘Huh…what…’ the bouncer said with a dumb, nervous expression. It was
the most challenging question anyone had asked him in months.
‘You know Jas?’ the hostess said, her voice warmer now.
‘School buddy of seven years. Tell him Vroom is here,’ Vroom said.
‘Cool. Why didn’t you tell me that before, Vroom?’ the hostess said and
gave Vroom a flirtatious smile. She bent over to release the velvet ropes. The
skeletal structure of her upper torso was visible. If she broke a bone, she
wouldn’t need an x-ray.
‘Can we go in now/’ Esha asked the hostess with a bored expression.
‘Yes. Though Vroom, next time, please tell you friends to dress up for
Bed,’ the hostess said and glanced meaningfully at Priyanka and Radhika.
‘I could wring her tiny neck, just like that. One twist and it will snap
like a chicken bone,’ Priyanka said.
As we were in, the bouncer frisked Vroom and me. I finally understood
the purpose of his existence. After us, he went towards Priyanka.
‘What?’ I said to the bouncer.
‘I need to check this lady,’ he said. ‘She acts like she could cause
trouble.’ He towered over Priyanka, who just froze.
And then, I don’t know how, but the words came to me.
‘You’re not touching her, you understood,’ I said.
The bouncer was startled. He turned to me. He had biceps the size of
my thighs, and deep inside I shuddered to think how much it would hurt if he
delivered a punch across my face.
‘What’s up now?’ the hostess came towards us.
‘Nothing, just teach your Tarzan out here how to behave with women,’ I
said and pulled at Priyanka’s hand. In a second we were inside Bed.
We chose a corner bed, which had two hookahs next to it.
‘Why is the hostess so mean?’ Esha said, as she hoisted herself onto the
bed. She took two cushions to rest her elbows. ‘Did you hear her?’ “Go
somewhere else”. Is that how you treat customers?’
‘It’s their job. They’re paid to be mean. It gives the place attitude,’
Vroom said carelessly as he lit up a hookah. I looked at the hot, smoldering
coals and thought of Ganesh. I don’t know why, I though it would be fun to
drop some down his pants.
‘I want a job that pays me to be mean. All they tell us in the call center
is “be nice, be polite, be helpful”—being mean is so much more fun,’ Radhika
said and reclined along a long cushion. For someone who had just had a really
rough night she looked nice; although I’m not sure anymore can look ugly in
ultraviolet-candlelight anyway. I wondered how a moron called Anuj could
leave her.
Only Esha and Radhika got to lie down. The rest of us sat cross-legged
on the bed.
Vroom went to say hi to DJ Jas, who was playing some incomprehensible
French-African-Indian fusion music. He returned with twelve kamikaze shots.
Military Uncle declined, and we didn’t protest as it meant more alcohol for us.
Vroom took Uncle’s extra shots and drank them in quick succession.
We had barely finished our kamikazes when another thin woman (a Bed
specialty) came up to us with another six drinks.
‘Long Island ice Teas,’ she said, ‘courtesy DJ Jas.’
‘Nice. You have your friends in the right places,’ Radhika said as she
started gulping her Long Island like it was a glass of water. When you don’t get
to drink on a regular basis, you go crazy at the chance.
‘These Long Island are very stiff,’ I said after a few sips, I could feel my
head spin. ‘Easy guys,’ I said, ‘our shift isn’t over. We said one quick drink, so
let’s go back soon.’
‘Cool it man. Just one last drink,’ Vroom said as he ordered another set
of cocktails.
‘I am getting high,’ Priyanka said. ‘I’m going to miss this. I am going to
miss you guys.’
‘Yeah right. We’ll see when you move to Seattle. Here guys, try this—it
is apple flavour,’ Vroom said as he took a big drag from the hookah. He passed
it around, and everyone (except Military Uncle, whose expression was growing
more resigned by the minute) took turns smoking it. DJ Jas’s music was
mellow, which went well with the long drags we were taking from the hookah.
There were two flat LCD screens in front of our bed, one tuned to MTV,
and the other to CNN. A Bollywood item number was being played on MTV, as
part of its ‘Youth Special’ program. A girl stripped off successive items of her
clothing as the song progressed. The breaking news on CNN was that the US
considering going to war with Iraq again. I noticed Vroom staring at thee TV
showing CNN.
‘Americans are sick,’ Vroom said, as he pointed to a US politician who
had spoken out in support of the war. ‘Look at him. He would make the whole
word if he could have his way.’
‘No, not the whole world. I don’t think they’d blow up China,’ Priyanka
said, sounding high. ‘They need the cheap labor.’
‘Then I guess they won’t blow up Gurgaon either. They need the call
centers,’ Radhika said.
‘So we are safe,’ Esha said, ‘that’s’ good. Welcome to Gurgaon, the
safest city on earth.’
The girls started laughing. Even Military Uncle smiled.
‘It’s not funny girls. Our government doesn’t realize this, but Americans
are using us. We are sacrificing an entire generation to service their call
centers,’ Vroom said. Convincing me that one day he could be a politician.
Nobody responded.
‘Don’t you agree/’ Vroom said.
‘Can you please stop this trip…’ I began. As usual, I was put on mute.
‘C’mon Vroom. Call centers are useful to us too,’ Esha said. ‘You know
how hard it is to make fifteen grand a month outside. And here we are, sitting
in an air-conditioned office, talking on the phone, collecting our pay and
going home. And it is the same for hundreds and thousands of young people.
What’s wrong with that?’
‘An air-conditioned sweatshop is still a sweatshop. In fact, it is worse,
because nobody sees the sweat. Nobody sees you brain getting rammed,’
Vroom said.
‘Then why don’t you quit? Why are you still here?’ I said. I hate it when
he ruins my high with his high ground.
‘Because I need the money. My friends have a lifestyle that I have to
keep up with. Money lets me come to places like this,’ Vroom said.
‘It’s just Bakshi. You are worked up about him and now you are blaming
it on the call center,’ I said.
‘Screw Bakshi, he is not the only bad boss around. C’mon, the whole
world is being run by a bad, stupid-evil boss,’ he said, pointing to CNN. ‘Look
at them, scared out of their guys, ready to bomb everyone. Meanwhile, all we
do it talk on the phone all night. White the world snores away,’ Vroom said.
‘Stop complaining about working at night. Doctors do it, hotel people do
it, airplane pilots do it, factory workers—hell, even that does bitch works at
night,’ Priyanka said.
‘There is nothing wrong with working at night. And I agree the money is
good. But the difference is, we don’t have jobs that make up work to our
potential. Look at our country, we are still so behind these Americans. Even
when we know we are no less than them,’ Vroom said, gesturing wildly at the
TV screen.
‘So? What other kinds of jobs can there be,’ Esha said with a hairclip in
her mouth. She had begun the ritual of untying and retying her hair.
‘So like, there is so much to do. We should be building roads, power
plants, airports, phone networks and metro trains in every city like madness.
And if the government moves its rear—end and does that, the young people in
this country will find jobs there. Hell, I would work days and nights for that—
as long as I know that what I am doing is helping build something for my
country, for its future. But the government doesn’t believe in doing any real
work, so they allow these BPOs to e opened and think they have taken care of
the youth. Just a this stupid MTV thinks showing a demanded chick do a dance
in her underwear will make the program a youth special. Do you think they
really care?’
‘Who?’ I said. ‘The government or MTV?’ I got up and signaled for the
check (in bars you always ask for the ‘check’—never the ‘bill’). It was 3:50
a.m., and I had enough of Vroom’s lecture. I wanted tog get back to the call
center soon.
Vroom paid for the bill with his credit card and we promised to split the
costs later.
‘Both. Both of them don’t give a fuck,’ Vroom said as we left Bed.
The door bitch and the bouncer gave us a puzzled looks we walked out.
#28
Vroom drove us out of Bed and we were soon back on the highway.
Every now and then the Qualis swayed to the left or right of the road.
‘Careful,’ Esha said, ‘you okay Vroom?’
‘I’m fine. Man, I love driving,’ Vroom said dreamily.
‘I can drive if you…’ I said.
‘I said I’m fine,’ Vroom said in a firm voice. A few minutes later, we
passed by Sahara Mail, the biggest shopping mall in Gurgaon. Abruptly, Vroom
brought the Qualis to a halt.
‘I feel nauseous,’ Vroom said I think we were all feeling a little nauseous
after Vroom’s erratic driving.
‘Whatever you do, don’t throw up in the Qualis. The driver will kill
you,’ Esha said.
Vroom rested his head on the steering wheel. The horn blew loud
enough to wake up the street dogs.
‘Let’s take a walk Vroom,’ I said and tapped his shoulder. We got out of
the Qualis.
I made Vroom walk around the perimeter of the Sahara mall. We passed
by several advertising hoardings showing all kinds of people: a couple all
smiles because they had just bought a toothbrush; a group of friends giggling
over their mobile phones; a family happily feeding their kid junk food; a
young graduate jumping with joy, clutching a credit card; a girl holding seven
shopping bags and beaming. All the ads had one thing is common. Everyone
looked incredibly happy.
‘What the hell are they so happy about?’ Vroom said. ‘Look at that
toothbrush couple. My mom and dad, they are never that happy.’
‘Just take deep breaths and walk in a straight line Vroom. You’re
drunk,’ I said.
‘I’m fine,’ he said, ‘but mom and dad…Shyam, why do they hate each
other so much?’
‘Grown ups man, they are way more complicated than we are. Don’t
even try figuring them out,’ I said.
Vroom stopped walking and straightened up. He told me to pause as
well, and continued: ‘Think about this. The people who gave birth to me can’t
stop hating each other enough. What does that tell you about me? Half my
genes must be fighting with the other half. No wonder I am so fucking messed
up.’
‘We are all messed up man, let’s go,’ I said and prodded his shoulders.
He walked faster to get a few steps ahead of me.
At the corner of Sahara Mall we passed by a Pizza Hut. It was closed.
Vroom went up and stood in front of it. I wondered if he had really gone
crazy; was he expecting pizza at this time?
We stood near the entrance. On our right, there was a thirty-foot wide
metal hoarding of a cola company. A top Bollywood actress held a drink bottle
and looked at us with inviting eyes. Like a fizzy drink was all it took to seduce
her into bed.
 Vroom walked close to the actress’s face.
‘What’s up dude/’ I said.
‘You see her?’ Vroom said, pointing to the actress.
I nodded.
‘There she is, looking at us like she is our best friend. Do you think she
cares for us?’
‘I don’t know. She is a youth icon man,’ I shrugged my shoulders.
‘Yes, youth icon. This airhead chick is supposed to be out role model.
Like she knows a fuck about life and gives a fuck about us. All she cares about
is cash. She doesn’t care about you or me. She just wants you to buy this
black piss,’ Vroom said, pointing to the cola bottle.
‘Black piss?’ I said and smiled. I sat down on some steps nearby.
‘Do you know how much sugar there is in one of these drinks?’ Vroom
said.
I shook my head.
‘Eight spoons of sugar in every bottle—and nothing else. And yet, they
convince us this is important. It isn’t.
Vroom looked around and noticed a pile of bricks. He lifted one and
threw it hard at the cola hoarding. Bang! It hit the actress’s cheek, creating a
dimple you would almost think was natural. She still kept smiling.
‘Careful, for fuck’s sake. Let’s go back. Someone will see us and get us
arrested.’
‘Like I care. Nobody cares,’ Vroom said and staggered towards me. I
looked at his lanky outline in the streetlights. ‘The government doesn’t care
for anybody,’ he continued. ‘Even that “youth special” channel, they don’t
care either. They say youth because they want the damn Pizza Huts and
Cokes and Pepsis of the world to come and give pizza and coke, we will be
happy. Like young people don’t have a fucking brain. Tell us what crap to
have and we’ll have it.’
Vroom sat down in front of the Pizza Hut steps. ‘Shyam,’ he said. ‘I’m
going to throw up.’
‘Oh no,’ I said and moved three feet way from him.
‘Unnh…’ Vroom said as he threw up. Puke spread around like a 12”-thin
crust pizza with gross toppings outside the entrance.
‘’Feeling better/’ I said as I carefully helped him up. Vroom nodded his
head.
He stood up and jerked his shoulders free from me. He lifted another
brick. He hurled it high, and with one wide swing smashed it into the Pizza
hut restaurant. Crash! A window shattered, and bits of glass fell down like a
beautiful ice fountain. An alarm began to ring.
‘Damn, Vroom have you gone mad?’ let’s get the hell out of here,’ I
said.
Vroom was startled by the alarm as well, and his body sprang to
attention.
‘Fuck, let’s run,’ Vroom said and we sprinted towards the Qualis.
‘I thought you liked pizza,’ I said when we reached the Qualis.
‘I like pizza. Damn well I do. I like jeans, mobiles and pizzas. I earn, I
eat, I buy shit and I die. That is all the fuck there is to Vroom. It is all, bullshit
man,’ Vroom said, panting and holding his stomach. He didn’t look too good,
but at least the run seemed to have sobered him down.
‘Seriously dude, can I drive now?’ I said, as Vroom opened the front
door of the Qualis. He was talking noisy, heavy breaths.
‘No way man,’ Vroom said and pushed me away.
The car jerked ahead as Vroom turned on the ignition while in gear.
‘Are you okay/’ Esha said.
Vroom nodded and raised his hand in apology. He waited for a few
seconds, and then started the engine carefully. He promised to drive slow and
soon we were on the road again.
‘You liked Bed?’ Vroom said, more to change the topic from his
inebriated state.
‘Great place,’ Esha said, ‘just the kind of high I needed. Hey Vroom,
have you kept any music in the Qualis?’
‘Of course. Let me see,’ Vroom said and shuffled through the glove box.
He took out a tape and held it up. ‘Musafir lounge?’ he said.
‘Cool,’ Esha and Radhika said.
‘NO,’ Priyanka and I said at the same time.
‘C’mon guys. You two not only hate each other, you hate the same
things too?’ Vroom said and smiled. He put the tape in and turned on the
music. A song called Rabba started playing.
We sat in the same order as before. Except this time I sat next to
Priyanka. With every beat of the song, I could feel her body along my entire
right side, like soft electric sparks. I had the urge to grab her hand again, but
restrained myself. I opened the window for some fresh air.
‘Don’t open the window,’ Esha said, ‘it is so cold.’
‘Just for a minute,’ I said and let the breeze in.
I focused on the lyrics of the song. The singer spoke of why no beloved
should ever enter his life. That if one did, she should damn well stay and
never leave. Somehow the lyrics were too close to heart. However, I was
more worried about the next song. It was Mahi Ve—which would bring back
memories of the 32nd Milestone parking lot.
I saw Priyanka’s face change from the corner of my eye. She looked
nervous in anticipation too. Yes, this was going to be hard.
‘I love this song,’ Vroom declared, as the song I was dreading filled the
Qualis.
The lyric hit my ears and I pressed the rewind-and-play button in the
privacy of my head. Every moment of 32nd Milestone replayed itself. I
remembered how Priyanka sat on my lap, stubbed my toe and hit her head on
the roof. I recalled every little second of her careful, slow and yet amazing
lovemaking. I missed her breath on my stubble, her eyes when they looked
into mine, the pleasurable pain when she bit my ears. What is it about music
that it makes you remember things you prefer to forget? I wished I had got
promoted. I wished Priyanka had never left me. I wished my world were a
happier place.
I turned my face to look outside. The breeze felt cold, particularly along
two lines on my cheeks. I touched my face. Damn, I couldn’t believe I was
crying.
‘Can we please close the window now? It’s ruining my hair,’ Esha said.
I slid the window shut. I tried to keep my eyes shut as well, but I
couldn’t as tears wanted to come out. I didn’t know I was such an
embarrassing wuss.
I looked at Priyanka. Maybe it was my imagination, but her eyes seemed
wet too. She turned towards me and then quickly looked away. I couldn’t
bear to meet her eyes right now. And I certainly could not look at that nose.
Vroom pulled out two tissues from the tissue box in front and swung his
arm back to hand them over to us.
‘What?’ I said.
‘There is rear–view mirror. I can see,’ he said.
‘We all can see,’ Radhika and Esha said together and burst out laughing.
‘You keep driving alright,’ I said. I took the tissue, and on the pretext of
wiping my nose, wiped my eyes. Priyanka took one and swabbed her eyes as
well.
Esha reached behind from her seat and rubbed Priyanka’s arm.
‘You guys are funny. Remind me again how you met in college?’ Vroom
said.
‘Forget it,’ I said.
‘C’mon Shyam, just ell. You guys never told me,’ Radhika said.
‘At the campus fair,’ Priyanka said I spoke at the same time.
I looked at her. We gave each other a formal smile.
‘You tell,’ Priyanka said.
‘No, it’s okay. You say is better,’ I said.
Priyanka sat up straight to tell a story we had told a hundred times, but
never got tired of repeating.
‘We met at the campus fair in second year. Both of us had stalls. Mine
was on female empowerment. It showed slides of problems faced by rural
women in India. Shyam had a video games counter. However, nobody was
coming to visit either of us—everyone just wanted to go to the food stalls.’
‘Then?’ Esha said, her eyes focused on Priyanka.
Then Shyam and I made a deal that we would visit each other’s stalls six
times a day. Shyam would come and see slides on hardworking farm, women
and female education programs. I would go and play Doom II on the
Playstation at his stall. By the end of the fair I was so good, I could beat him,’
Priyanka said.
‘No way,’ I said. ‘I can take you on at Doom II any day.’
‘Well, anyway—so over three days we visited each other’s stalls three
dozen times. And by the end of it, we felt…’ Priyanka said and paused.
‘What?’ Radhika said.
‘We felt that both the stalls belonged to us. And that as long as we were
together, we didn’t need anyone else to visit,’ Priyanka said and her voice
choked up.
My throat already had a lump the size of an orange, and I just nodded to
keep a straight expression.
We kept silent. I was hoping Priyanka would cry big time now.
‘Well, things change. Life goes on—move on to better things. It is like
playstation to X-box,’ Vroom said.
I hate Vroom. Just when Priyanka was all mellow, Vroom’s wise words
brought her back to reality. She composed herself and changed the topic.
‘How far are we?’ Priyanka said.
I looked at my watch.
‘Damn Vroom, it is past 4 a.m. How much further?’
‘Around five kilometers from the call center. I am driving slower now.
You want me to drive faster?’
‘No,’ all of us cried.
‘We’re going to get late. Bakshi will flip out,’ I said.
‘I can take a shortcut,’ Vroom said.
‘Shortcut/’ I said.
‘Next left there is an un-tarred road. It was made for construction
projects. It cuts through some fields—saves us about two kilometers.’
‘Is the road lit up?’ Esha said.
‘No, but we have headlights. I’ve used that way before. Let’s take it,’
Vroom said.
Vroom took a sharp left after a kilometer.
‘Ouch,’ Esha said, ‘you didn’t tell us this road will be so bumpy.’
‘Just a few minutes,’ Vroom said. ‘actually the ground is wet today from
the rains yesterday. That is why the ride is not smooth.’
We plunged on into the darkness, even as the headlights tried hard to
show us the way. We passed fields and construction sites filled with materials
like cement, bricks and iron rods. In a few places, there were deep holes, at
builders constructed the foundation for super-high rise apartments. I think
the whole of Delhi had decided to move to Gurgaon, and people were growing
homes along with the crops.
‘There, just one final cut and we are back on the highway,’ Vroom said
taking a sharp right.
Suddenly the Qualis skidded. The vehicle rattled and slid down an
inclined path.
‘Careful,’ everyone shouted and held on to anything that they could
find around them. The Qualis went off the road into a slushy downhill patch.
Vroom desperately tried to control the steering but the wheels couldn’t grip
the ground. Like a drunk tramp, the Qualis staggered down and into the site
of a high-rise construction project.
#29
The slope ended but the Qualis still kept rolling forward. It slowed down
as it slid onto a mesh of iron construction rods. Vroom braked hard, and the
Qualis halted on the rods with a metallic clang, bounced twice and came to a
stop.
‘Damn,’ Vroom said.
Everyone sat in shocked silence.
‘Don’t worry guys,’ vroom said and started the ignition. The Qualis
shook with wild vibrations.
‘Shut…the…ignition…Vroom…’ I said. I looked under the Qualis. There
was a floor of iron below us that was trembling violently.
Vroom’s hands trembled too as he turned the engine off. I think my
remaining alcohol in his body had evaporated in seconds.
‘Where are we?’ Esha said and opened the window. She looked out and
screamed, ‘Oh no!’
‘What?’ I said and looked out again. This time I looked around more
carefully. What I saw was scary: we had landed in the foundation hole of a
building, which had a frame of exposed metal rods covering it. The foundation
was a pit, probably fifty-feet deep and had a frame of reinforced cement
concrete rods above it. The rods were parallel to the Qualis and jutting out at
the other end—and they were all that supported us. Every time we moved,
the Qualis bounced, as the rods acted as springs. I could see fear in
everyone’s face, including Military Uncle’s.
‘We’re hanging above a hole, supported only by toothpicks. We’re
screwed,’ Radhika said, summing up the situation for all of us.
‘What are we going to do?’ Esha said. The contagious panic in her voice
made everyone nervous.
‘Whatever you do, don’t move,’ Vroom said.
A few minutes passed. The heavy breathing of six people was the only
sound.
‘Should we call for help? The police? Fire brigade? Call center?’ Esha
said as she took out her mobile phone from her bag.
Vroom nodded. His face had the nakedness of fear.
‘Damn, no reception,’ Esha said. ‘Does anyone else have a mobile that
works?’
Priyanka and Radhika’s cell phones did not work as well. Military Uncle
didn’t have a mobile. Vroom took out his phone.
‘No network,’ he said.
I took out my phone from my pocket and gave it to Esha.
‘Your phone is also not working, Shyam,’ Esha said and placed it on the
dashboard.
‘So we can’t reach anyone in this world?’ Radhika said.
A rod snapped under us. The Qualis tilted a few degrees to the right.
Radhika fell towards me; Vroom held the steering wheel tight to keep his
balance. He froze in the driver’s seat, unable to think of what else to do.
Another rod snapped, and then another like feeble twigs under us. The Qualis
tilted around thirty degrees and came to a halt.
All of us were too scared to scream.
‘Dows anyone have any ideas?’ Vroom said.
I closed my eyes for a second. I visualized my death. My life could end,
just like this in oblivion. I wondered when and how people wound find us. May
be labors tomorrow or even after a couple of days.
‘Six irresponsible agents found dead, alcohol in body’ would be the
headline.
‘Try to open the door, Vroom,’ Military Uncle said.
Vroom opened his door. The Qualis wobbled and Vroom shut it
immediately.
‘Can’t, Vroom said. ‘Messes up the balance. And what’s the point? We
can’t step out, we would fall right through.’
I turned around to look out from rear window. I noticed bushes a few
feet behind us.
‘Move towards the left. No weight on the right. We have to stay
balanced until someone spots us in the morning,’ Vroom said.
I checked my watch. It was only 4:14 a.m. Morning was three hours
away. A lifetime. And people could show up even later.
‘Otherwise?’ Esha said.
‘Otherwise we die,’ Vroom said.
We stayed quiet for a minute.
‘Everyone dies on day,’ I said, just to break the silence.
‘Maybe it is simpler this way. Just end life rather than deal with it,’
Vroom said.
I nodded. I was nervous and I was glad Vroom was making small talk.
‘My main question is– what if no one finds us even after we die. What
happens then?’ Vroom said.
‘The vultures will find us. They always do. I saw it on Discovery
Channel,’ I said.
‘See, that makes me uncomfortable. I don’t like the idea of sharp beaks
rearing my muscles, cracking my bones and ripping me to shreds. Plus, my
body will be smelling like hell. I’d rather be burnt in a dignified manner and
go up in that one last ultimate puff of smoke.’
‘Can you guys stop this nonsense? At least be silent,’ Esha said and
folded her arms.
Vroom smiled at her. Then he turned to me. “I don’t thinking Esha will
smell too much. Her Calvin Klein perfume will keep her carcass fresh for
days.’
Beneath us, there were two sharp ‘pings’ as two more rods snapped.
‘Oh no,’ Priyanka said we heard another ping right below her. A flicker
of light appeared at the dashboard.
Everyone sprang to attention as my cell phone began vibrating.
‘That’s my phone,’ I said.
The phone started ringing. Everyone’s mouth hung open.
‘How did this ring without a network?’ Esha said, her voice nervous.
‘Who is it,’ Radhika said.
‘Pick it up,’ I said with my hand stretched out, unable to reach the
dashboard and unwilling to move too much.
Esha lifted the phone. She looked at the screen and gasped.
‘Who is it?’ I said.
‘Do you know someone called…God? It says…Good calling,’ Esha said.
#30
Esha’s fingers trembled. She pressed the button to take the call on
speaker mode.
‘Hi everyone. Sorry to call so late,’ a cheerful voice came from the
phone.
‘Err. Who is it?’ Esha said.
‘It’s God,’ the voice said.
‘God? God as in…’ Radhika said as all of us looked at the brightly-lit
phone in fright.
‘As in God. I noticed an unusual situation here, so I thought I would just
check on you guys.’
‘Who is this? Is this a joke/’ Vroom asked in a stronger voice.
‘Why? Am I being funny? I just said I am God,’ the voice said.
I narrowed my eyes. Apart from the fact that God using a cell phone was
unusual, I never thought my life was important enough for God to call me.
‘God doesn’t normally call. Prove that you are God. Otherwise, can you
please get us some help,’ Vroom said.
‘How do I prove I am God? Do I make this cell phone float? Or do I create
rain and lightning on demand? Or do you prefer magic tickets? Special effects
maybe?’ God said.
‘Well, I don’t know. But yeah, something like that,’ Vroom said.
‘So, to impress you I have to break the same laws of physics that I
made? I’m not into that these days. And I have plenty of believers. I thought I
could help, but I can hand up. See you then…’ God said.
‘No, no wait. Do help us…G…God,’ Esha said and turned slightly so she so
could hold the cell phone between all of us.
Radhika put a finger on her lips to signal Vroom to be quiet. ‘Okay, I’ll
stay,’ God said in a cheerful voice. ‘Tell me, how is it going?’
‘Help us get out. A few more rods break and we are going to die,’ I said.
‘Not that, how is it going otherwise? How is life?’ God said.
 I am really bad at tough, open-ended questions like that. I hate to
admit the extent to which my life is screwed up.
‘but right now we’re trapped…’ I said and God interrupted me.
‘Don’t worry. The Qualis isn’t going anywhere. Just relax.’
I let out a deep sigh. Everyone was silent.
‘So back to the question, how is life going? You want to go first,
Radhika?’ God said.
‘You are God. Obviously you must already know everything. Life is
miserable,’ Radhika said.
‘Actually, I do know,’ God said. ‘I just want to find out how you feel
about it.’
‘I’ll tell you hoe we feel. Life suc…sorry,’ Vroom said, and checked
himself, ‘It’s awful. Like what did we do wrong? Why is our life in the pits—
literally and figuratively? That pretty much sums it up for all of us I think.’
Everyone made concurring sounds. God sighed.
‘Let me ask you a question. How many phone calls do you take every
day?’ God said.
‘A hundred, on busy days two hundred,’ Vroom said.
‘Okay. Now do you know which is the most important call in the world?’
‘No,’ Vroom said. Everyone else shook their heads.
‘The inner call,’ God said.
‘The inner call?’ everyone said in unison.
‘Yes, the little voice inside that wants to take to you. But you can only
hear it when you are at peace and then too it is hard to hard to hear it.
Because in modern life, the networks are too busy. The voice tells you what
you really want. Do you know what I am talking about?’
‘Sort of,’ Priyanka said, her eyes darting away from the phone.
‘That voice is mine, God said.
‘Really?’ Esha said, her mouth wide open.
‘Yes. And the voice is easy to ignore—because you are distracted or busy
or just too comfortable in life. Go on, ignore it—until you get tangled in your
own web of comfort. And then you reach a point like today, where life brings
you to a dead end, and there is nothing ahead but a dark hole.’
‘You’re making sense. I didn’t get it all, but you are making sense,’ I
conceded, more to myself.
‘I know that voice. But it isn’t subtle in me. Sometimes it shouts and
bites me,’ Vroom said.
‘And what does the voice say, Vroom?’ God said.
‘That I should not have taken up a job just for money. Call centers pay
more, but only because the exchange rate is in the favor of Americans. They
toss their loose change at us. It seems like a lot in rupees. But jobs that pay
less could be better. There could be jobs that define me, make me learn of
help my country. I justified it by saying money is progress. But it is not true.
Progress is building something lasting for the future,’ Vroom said, something
as if there was a lump in his throat. He pressed his face into his hands.
Esha put her hand on Vroom’s shoulder.
‘C’mon guys. This is getting way too sentimental. You can do a lot
better than this. You are all capable people,’ God said.
It was the first time someone was using the word ‘capable’ to describe
me.
‘We can?’ I said.
‘Of course. Listen, I will make a deal with you. I will save your life
tonight, but in return, you give me something. You close your eyes for three
minutes. Think about what you really want and what you need to change in
your life to get it. Then, once you get out of here, act on those changes. You
do this, and I will help you get out of this pit. Deal?’
‘Deal,’ I said. Like you won’t do a deal that saves you from death.
Everyone nodded.
We closed our eyes and took a few deep breaths.
Man, I tell you, closing your eyes for three minutes and not thinking
about the world is the hardest thing to do. I tried to concentrate, but all I
could see was commotion. Priyanka, Bakshi, my promotion and Ganesh—my
mind kept jumping from one topic to another.
‘So, tell me,’ God said after three minutes.
We opened our eyes. Everyone’s face was a lot calmer.
‘Ready?’ God said.
Everyone nodded their heads.
‘Let’s go around the Qualis one by one. Vroom, you first,’ God said.
‘I want to have a life with meaning, even if it means a life without Bed
or daily trips to Pizza-Hut. I need to quit this call center. Sorry, but calling is
not my calling,’ Vroom said.
I thought his last line was quite clever, but it wasn’t the right time to
appreciate verbal tricks.
Priyanka spoke after Vroom. My ears become extra alert.
‘I want my mother to be happy. But I cannot kill myself for it. My
mother needs to realize a family is a great support to have, but ultimately,
she is responsible for her own happiness. My focus should be on my own life
and what I want,’ Priyanka said. I wished she had said my name somewhere in
her answer, but o such luck. I think ninety percent of Priyanka. And then he
spoke the most I have heard him speak ever.
‘I want to be with my son and my grandson. I miss them every moment.
Two years ago, I used to live with them. But my daughter-in-law did things I
didn’t like—she went for parties, got a job when I wanted her to stay at
home…. If fought with them and moved out. But I was wrong. It Is their life,
and I have no right to judge them by my outdated values. And I need to get rid
of my inflated ego and go to the US to see them and talk it out.’
Radhika’s turn came next. She fought back her tears as she spoke. ‘I
want be myself again, just like I was before marriage, when I was with my
parents. I want to divorce Anuj. I don’t want to ever look at my mother-inlaw’s
face again. To do this, I have to accept that I made a wrong decision
when I married Anuj.’
Esha spoke after Radhika. ‘I want my parents to love me again. I do not
want to become a dumb model. I am sure I can find a better use for my looks,
if they are worth anything. Any career that makes you compromise on your
morals, or judges you because you are not an inch taller is not worth it.’
People now turned to look at me, as I was the only one left to speak.
‘Me? Can I pass?’ I said.
Everyone gave me an even harder state. Sometimes you have no choice
but to share you weird thoughts with the world.
‘Okay. This will sound stupid, but I want to take a shot at my own
business. I had this idea, if Vroom and I collaborate, we can set up a small
web design company. That is all. But it may never work, because most of the
things I do never work, but then…’
‘What else, Shyam/’ God said, interrupting me.
‘Uh, nothing,’ I said.
‘Shyam, you are not done. You know that,’ God said.
I guess you can’t outsmart God. I just had to come to the point. I looked
around and spoke again.
‘And I want to be worthy of someone like Priyanka one day, I do not
deserve her as of today, and I accept that…’
‘Shyam, I never said…’ Priyanka said.
‘Please, let me finish Priyanka. It is about time people stop trampling all
over me,’ I said.
Priyanka looked at me and became silent. I could see she was in mild
shock at my firmness.
I continued. ‘But one day I’d like to be worthy of someone like her—
someone intelligent, witty, sensitive and fun, someone who can seamlessly
merge friendship with love. And yes, one day I want to be successful too.’
We had all finished our turns. God stayed silent.
‘God? Say something, now that we’ve poured out our deepest secrets to
you,’ Esha said.
‘I don’t really have to say anything. I am just amazed—and pleased—at
how well you have done. Knowing what you want is already a great start.
Ready to follow it through/’ God said.
Everyone nodded except me.
‘Ready, Shyam?’ God said.
 I gave a small nod.
‘Shyam, can I say something personal before your friends,’ God said,
‘because it is important for everyone as well.’
‘Sure,’ I said. Yeah, use me as Exhibit I for ‘how not to live your life’. At
least I am of some use.
‘You want to be successful right?’ God said.
‘Yes,’ I said.
‘There are four things a person needs for success. I will tell you the two
obvious ones first. One, a medium amount of intelligence, and two, a bit of
imagination. Agreed?’
‘Agreed,’ everyone said.
‘And all of you have those qualities,’ God said.
‘What’s that?’ I said.
‘Self-confidence. The third thing you need for success is selfconfidence.
But Shyam has lost it. He is hundred percent convicted he is good
for nothing.’
I hung my head.
‘You know how you became convicted?’ God said.
‘How?’ I said.
‘Because of Bakshi. A bad boss is like a disease of the soul. If you have
one for long enough, you get convicted something is wrong with you. Even
though you know Bakshi is the real loser, you start doubting yourself. And
that is when your confidence goes.’
God’s words shook my insides like the vibrating Qualis had a few
minutes ago.
‘God, I want to get my confident back,’ I said.
‘Good. Don’t be scared and you will get it back. And then thee won’t be
any stopping you,’ God said.
I felt the blood rush to my ears. My heart was beating hard and I wanted
to be back at the call center. At the same time, anger surged in me as I
thought of Bakshi. I wanted to get even with the man who had killed a part of
me, who had put everyone’s job on the line, who had ruined the call center.
‘What’s the fourth ingredient for success?’ Vroom said.
The fourth ingredient is the most painful one. And it is something all of
you still need to learn. Because it is often the most important thing,’ God
said.
‘What/’ I said.
‘Failure,’ God said.
‘What? I thought you were talking about success,’ Vroom said.
‘Yes, but to be really successful, you must face failure. You have to
experience it, feel it, taste it, softer it. Only then can you shine,’ God said.
‘Why?’ Priyanka said. Obviously she was focused on my personality
dissection as well. I tell you, Ganesh may have the Lexus, but she will never
find as interesting a psycho case as me.
‘For once you taste failure, you have no fear. You can take risks more
easily. Then you don’t want to snuggle in your comfort zone anymore—you
are ready to fly. And success is about flying, not snuggling,’ God said.
‘Point, ‘ Priyanka said.
‘So, here is a secret. Never be afraid of failure. If it has come your way,
it means I want to give you a real shot at being successful later,’ God said.
‘Cool,’ Priyanka said.
‘Thank you,’ God said.
‘If only you had given India as much as America,’ Vroom said.
‘Why, you don’t like India/’ God said.
‘Of course not. Just because India is poor doesn’t mean you stop loving
it. It is mine. But still, America has a lot,’ Vroom said.
‘Well, don’t be so high on America. Americans may have many things,
but they are not the happiest people on earth by any stretch. Any country
obsessed with war can’t be happy,’ God said.
‘True,’ Radhika said.
‘And many of them have serious issues in the head. Issues only call
center agents know about. And you can use them to save your call center
tonight,’ God said.
‘The messed up heads of Americans will save our call center? Vroom,
Radhika and I spoke together.
‘Yes. Think about their weak spots, and then you can win,’ God said.
‘Like what/ they are fat, loud, thick and divorce all the time?’ Esha said.
‘There are more. I will give you a hint. What’s behind all this war
sentiment?’ God said.
‘Fear. It is obvious, they are the most scared and paranoid people on
earth,’ I said.
‘We’ll scare them into calling us. Yes, that will get us back our call
volumes,’ Vroom said, his voice excited.
‘Now you are thinking. In fact, you can figure out a way to get even with
Bakshi too. Not completely fair and square, but by now you deserve to bend a
few rules in the game,’ God said, and I though I heard a chuckle.
Everyone smiled.
‘Really, we can teach Bakshi a lesson/’ I said.
‘sure, remember Bakshi is not your boss, the ultimate boss is me. And I
am with you. So what you afraid of?’ God said.
‘Excuse me, but you are not there with us always. Or how did we end
up here?’ Radhika said.
God sighed before speaking again. ‘I think you need to understand how
my system works. You see, I have a contract with all human beings. You do
your best, and every now and then, I will come behind to give you a bonus
push. But is has to begin with you. For otherwise I can’t distinguish who needs
my help most.’
‘Point,’ Vroom said.
‘So, if I listen to my inner call and promise to do my best, will you be
there for me?’ I said.
‘Absolutely. But, I have to go now. Someone else needs no reach me,’
God said.
‘Wait! Hel us get us out of this pit first,’ Esha said.
‘Oh yes, of course. I have to help you out of this pit,’ God said. ‘Okay,
Vroom, you are balancing on a few rods now. There are two tricks to get out
from such a situation.’
‘What’s that/’
‘One, remember the reverse gear. And two, make friends with the rods
—do not fight them. Use the rod as rail tracks and the rods will guise you out.
Shake things around, and you will fall right through.’
Vroom stuck his neck out of the window. ‘But these steel construction
rods are as thin s my fingers. How do we bunch them up?’
‘Tie then,’ God said.
‘How?’ Vroom said.
‘Do I need to tell you everything?’ God said.
‘Dupatta. Use my dupatta,’ Priyanka said.
‘Here, I have this half kn9itted scarf in my handbag too,’ Radhika said.
‘I think you can take from here. Bye now. Remember, I am inside you
when you need me,’ God said.
‘Huh?’ Vroom said and looked at the phone.
‘Bye God,’ the girls said one after the other.
‘Bye everyone,’ God said and disconnected the call. I waved the phone
goodbye in reflex. Silence fell on us.
‘What. Was. That?’ Priyanka said.
‘I don’t know. Can I have the dupattas please,’ Vroom said. ‘Military
Uncle, can you open the rear door and tie up the rods under the wheel. Tear
up the dupatta if you want to.’
Priyanka flinched for a second at the last line, but that was the last we
saw of her dupatta and Radhika’s half-scarf. Vroom and Military Uncle tied up
the rods right under the wheel for the Qualis to do its ten-foot journey to
reach firm ground. Several times they bent over deep and had to look right
into the pit. I was glad I was not the one doing it—I would have died just from
the view.
‘Okay people,’ Vroom sat back on the seat, wiping his hands, ‘hold
tight.’
Vroom started the ignition. The Qualis vibrated, as the rods below us
started quivering again.
‘Vrr...oom…I am…sl…ipp..ing,’ Esha said, trying to grip the handle of the
glove box.
In a nanosecond, Vroom put the Qualis in reverse and drove back. All of
us ducked down, partially so Vroom could see, but mostly in feat.
The Qualis shook as if It was rumbling down a hill. However, we did not
fall. My upper and lower jaws chattered so hard that I thought a couple of
teeth would break loose.
In six second, it was all over. We were out of the pit and on the slushy
mud road again.
‘It’s done. I think I am alive,’ Vroom said with a grin of relief. He turned
around. ‘Did anyone survive?’
#31
Everyone released their breaths together. The girls broke into hugs, and
Vroom reached out and backslapped me so hard I thought I would die of a
broken spinal cord.
Vroom took a U-turn and drove back slowly in first gear until we
reached the highway.
‘We made it,’ Esha said and wiped her tears. Priyanka folded her hands
and prayed a few times.
‘I thought we would die,’ Radhika said.
‘What was that call?’ Esha said.
‘Something very strange—van we make a pact to not talk about it?’ I
said. Everyone nodded, as if I had said exactly what was on their mind. It was
true. The call felt so personal, I did not want to discus it anymore.
‘Whatever it was, we are okay now. And we shall be in office soon,’
Priyanka said.
‘It’s still only 4:40. We are just two kilometers away,’ Vroom said. He
soon regained his confidence and began driving at sixty an hour.
‘I’m just lucky to be alive, I don’t care when we reach,’ Esha said.
‘I do want to reach soon and find out about the layoffs. However, I’m
quitting in any case,’ Vroom said.
‘Yes, enough’s enough,’ Vroom said.
‘I don’t know long-term—maybe get back to journalism. But as an
immediate short-term goal, I’m going to try and save the call center,’ Vroom
said.
‘With you?’ Vroom said, looking back at me.
‘I’m quitting too,’ I said.
‘Really?’ Priyanka’s eyes popped open. She looked at me as if a sevenyear-old
had just announced his decision to climb Mt. Everest.
‘Yes, I came close to death in that pit. I could have died there, with
having tried nothing in life. I am tired of soft, comfortable options. It is time
to face the real world, even if it is harder and painful. I’d rather fly and
crash, than just snuggle and sleep.’
Everyone nodded. I was shocked; people were really listening to me for
the first time.
‘Plus, I have made one more promise to myself,’ I said.
‘What?’ Vroom and Priyanka said together.
‘That I am not going to work for an idiot anymore, anywhere. Even if it
means less money. I cold skip a meal a day and sleep hungry, but, hell, I can’t
spend my life working for a moron.’
‘Not bad,’ Vroom said, ‘looks like our team leader-in-waiting just
became wiser.’
‘I don’t know if it is wise or note, but at least I have made a choice. We
will see what happens. For now, I have a short-term goal too.’
‘Like what,’ Vroom said, as he drove with utmost concentration, ‘don’t
tell me it is call documentation and all.’
‘No. I have to take care of Bakshi too. Since we have nothing to lose,
let’s teach him a lesson,’ I said.
Vroom screeched the Qualis to a halt and we all fell forward.
‘Now what?’ I said.
‘Wait. I just had an Eureka moment. I have an idea for fixing Bakshi and
the call center,’ Vroom said.
‘What?’
‘Aha, I like it,’ Vroom said and smiled to himself.
‘What, damn it,’ I said.
He leaned back and whispered something in my ear.
‘No way, I mean how/’ I said.
‘Yes way, I mean how?’ I said.
‘Yes way, I’ll tell you how when we get back. Let’s meet in the WASG
conference room,’ he said and pressed the accelerator hard as we made the
final stretch to reach the call center. We entered the Connexions main gate at
4:45 a.m. We passed Bakshi’s car again.
‘Want to bump it. Should we give it a nasty dent?’ I said to Vroom.
‘The thought crossed my mind,’ Vroom said and let out a sigh, ‘but I
love all automobiles too much to hurt them. This Lancer is already suffering
under Bakshi. Don’t worry, we will deal with him inside.
Vroom took the Qualis to the parking lot. Our driver was sleeping in
another vehicle, so we quietly parked the Qualis next to him. We wanted to
give him a few more hours of rest before he saw his mud-coated vehicle.
‘People, let’s go, 4:46,’ Vroom said and jumped out of the car.
At our desk, I saw an A4-sized sheet stuck on my monitor with big bold
letters scrawled on it.
‘Check this out,’ I said . It was Bakshi’s writing.
WHERE IS EVERYONE? PLEASE CALL/REPORT TO MY OFFICE
ASAP. WHERE ARE MY BOARD MEETING AGENDA COPIES?
WHAT HAPPENED TO THE XEROX MACHINE? AGENT
VICTOR’S MONITOR?
Vroom looked at the notice and laughed. ‘Whatever. He’ll get hi
answers. But first, he will answer us. Guys, conference room first,’ vroom
said.
We went inside the conference room and Vroom bolted the door.
‘Guys, sorry to sound like the MBA types, but I think in the next few
hours we have a three-point agenda. One, to save this call center. And two, to
teach Bakshi a lesson. Agreed?’
‘What’s the third point?’ Radhika said.
‘That’s between me and Shyam. It’s private. Okay, listen…’
And that is where Vroom revealed his plan to a) save the call center and
b) take care of Bakshi. All of us jumped in our seats when we first heard it.
Slowly, Vroom convinced us. Between laughter and intense concentration,
everyone pooled in to refine the plan further. We concluded our meeting at
5:100 a.m. and came out of the WASG conference room.
‘All set?’ Vroom said.
‘Of course,’ all of us said in unison.
‘Good. Step 1: Getting Bakshi out of his office,’ Vroom said. ‘Esha, you
ready?’
‘Yes,’ Esha said and winked at us.
She picked up the phone, dialed Bakshi’s number and took on the voice
of an older woman.
‘Sir, this is Elina calling from the main bay. Sir, there is a call for you
from Boston I think,’ Esha said. In a dumb-but-conscientious secretarial tone.
‘No sir, I can’t seem to transfer it… Sir, I tried that, but the line does
not go through… Sir, I am a new assistant here, so I still do not know how the
phones work… Sir, sorry but can you come down sir… Yes sir,’ Esha said and
hung up the phone.
‘Worked?’ I said.
‘Total sucker for anything Boston. He is coming right now. But he’ll only
be out for a few minutes, so let’s rush.’
#32
As expected, Bakshi’s office was empty when we got there. Vroom went
straight to Bakshi’s computer and opened his email.
Radhika, Priyanka and I sat as Bakshi’s conference table.
‘Hurry,’ Radhika said and kept one eye on the door.
‘Just one more minute,’ Vroom said as he furiously typed on Bakshi’s
keyboard.
I know what we were doing was wrong, but somehow doing this wrong
thing was not associated with ‘real, hard, painful guilt,’ as Esha had put it. In
fact, it felt good. Once he had finished, Vroom printed several copies on
Bakshi’s printer.
‘Five copies,’ he said, ‘one for each of us. Fold it and keep is safe.’
I folded my copy and put in my shirt pocket.
Bakshi arrived twenty seconds later.
‘Can’t believe we have such outdated telephone systems,’ Bakshi was
talking to himself as he came into his office. He noticed us at the conference
table.
‘There you guys are. Where were all of you? And what happened to the
Xerox machine and agent Victor’s monitor?’ Bakshi said. He wrapped his arms
around like middle and looked at each of us in quick succession.
‘Sit down for a second, will you Bakshi?’ Vroom said, patting a chair
next to him.
‘What/’ Bakshi said, shocked at Vroom referring to him by his name. You
should learn how to address seniors…’
‘Whatever Bakshi,’ Vroom said and put his feet up on Bakshi’s meeting
table.
‘Agent Victor, what did you say and what exactly do you think you are
doing/’ Bakshi said, still standing.
‘Ahh’ Vroom said, ‘this is so much more comfortable. Why don’t people
always sit like this?’ Vroom crossed his legs on the table.
‘I can’t believe you are misbehaving in times when I have to recommend
rightsizing…’ Bakshi said as Vroom interrupted him again.
‘You are mega fucked Bakshi..’ Vroom interrupted him.
‘Excuse me/ what did you just say Agent Victor?’
‘So you are not only dumb, but deaf too. Didn’t you hear him?’ Esha
said, trying hard to suppress a smile.
‘What the hell is going on here?’ Bakshi said and looked at me blankly
like I was a renowned interpreter of nonsense.
Vroom pushed a printout towards Bakshi.
‘What’s this?’ Bakshi said.
‘Read it. They taught you how to read in the MBA course, right?’ Vroom
said.
The email read as follows:
From: Subhash Bakshi
To: Esha Singh
Sent: 5.04 am
Subject: Just one night
Dear Esha,
Don’t be upset. My offer is simple-just spend one night with
me. You make ma happy –I’ll save your you from the rightsizing.
My pleasure for you security–I think it is a fair deal.
And who knows, you might enjoy it too. Let me know your
decision soon.
Your admirer.
Bakshi.
Bakshi’s face turned white. His mouth opened five inches wide as he reread
the email several times.
‘What is this? What the hell is this?’ Bakshi said, his hands trembling as
much as his voice. His mouth was still open and vibrated like it was battery
operated.
‘You tell us. It is a mail from your inbox, dumb ass,’ Vroom said.
But I never wrote it,’ Bakshi said, unable to hide a hint of desperation in
voice, ‘I never wrote it.’
‘Really?’ Vroom said as he lit a cigarette. ‘Now how can you prove you
didn’t write it? Can you prove it to people in the Boston office that you didn’t
write it?’
‘What are you talking about? How is the connected to Boston?’ Bakshi
said, his face sprouting droplets of sweat through the oilfields.
‘Let’s see. What is we forward Boston a copy of this mail? The same
people who you copied on the website manual? I am sure they love employees
who do, well, fair deals,’ I said.
‘I never wrote it,’ Bakshi said, unable to think of better lines.
‘Or we could send a copy to the police,’ Vroom said as he blew a huge
puff of smoke on Bakshi’s face, ‘and to some of my reporter friends. You want
to be in the papers tomorrow Bakshi? Here is your chance,’ Vroom took out
his phone, ‘Oh wait, maybe I can even get you on TV.’
‘TV?’ Bakshi said.
‘Yes, imagine the headline: ‘Call center boss asks girls for sexual favors
in exchange for job’. NDTV could live on that for a week. Damn, I know I could
be a good journalist,’ Vroom said and laughed.
‘But what did it do?’ Bakshi said and ran to his desk. He opened his
email and checked the ‘Sent Items’ folder.
‘Who wrote this?’ Bakshi said and ran to his desk. He opened his email
and check the ‘Sent Items” folder.
‘Who wrote this?’ Bakshi said as he saw the same mail on his screen.
‘You didn’t?’ Priyanka said, as if in genuine confusion.
‘Mr Bakshi, I held you in such high esteem. Today my faith in my rolemodel
is shattered,’ Esha sand and put her hands to her face. She was good—I
think she should try for an acting career.
‘No, I swear I did not,’ Bakshi said, as he scrambled with his mouse and
keyboard.
‘Then who wrote it? Santa Claus? The tooth fairy?’ Vroom shouted and
stood up. ‘You explain this to the police, the journalists and over the video
conference to Boston exces.’
‘hah! Look I have deleted it,’ Bakshi said with a smug smile is he
released his computer mouse.
‘C’mon Bakshi,’ Vroom said with a sigh, ‘it’s still in your ‘Deleted Items
folder.’
‘Oh,’ Bakshi said and jerked his mouse. A few clicks later he said,
‘There, it is gone. No more email.’
Vroom smiled, ‘One more tip for you Bakshi. Go to your Deleted Items,
selected the tools menu and choose the “recover deleted items” option. The
mail will be there,’ Vroom said.
Bakshi’s face panicked again as tried to follow Vroom’s complex
instructions. He desperately clicked his mouse.
‘Oh, stop it Bakshi. The mail is in my inbox as well. And Vroom has many
printouts,’ Esha said.
‘Huh?’ Bakshi said as he looked like a scared rabbit. ‘You’ll never get
away with this. Esha you know I didn’t do it. You wear right skirts and tops
but I only look at them from a distance. Even those jeans that show your waist
I only saw…’
‘Stop right there, you sicko,’ Esha said.
‘You can’t get away with this,’ Bakshi said.
‘We have five witnesses Bakshi, they will support Esha’s testimony,’ I
said.
‘Oh, an we have some other evidence as well. In Esha’s drawer there is
a packet with cash, it has your fingerprints on I, in case you want to get tot
hat level,’ Vroom said.
Bakshi’s fingers trembled as if he was getting ready to ply drums.
‘We also have a printout of your visits to pornographic websites,’
Radhika said.
‘You know it is not me Esha, I will finally get proved innocent,’ Bakshi
said, his voice sounding like a hapless beggar’s. His eyes looked ready to leak.
‘Maybe. But the amazing publicity will be enough to screw your career.
Goodbye Boston,’ I said and waved my hand to indicate farewell. Everyone
else raided their hand and waved goodbye as well.
Bakshi looked at us in horror and sat down. His white face had now
turned red, or rather purple—even though it was still as shiny as ever. I could
see a twitching nerve on the side of his forehead. I felt an urge to make him
suffer more. I stood up to pick a thick management book from his bookshelf.
I went up to Bakshi and stood next to him.
‘Why are you doing this to me? I will be leaving you forever to go to
Boston,’ Bakshi said.
‘Boston?’ I said. ‘You do not deserve a posting to Bhatinda. You do not
even deserve a job. In fact, one could argue you do not even deserve to live.
You are not just a bad boss, you are a parasite: to us, to this company, to this
country. Damn you.’
I banged the management book on his hard head. God, it felt head was
hollow, as the impact made a big noise. God, it felt good. Few people in this
world get to hit their boss, but those who do will tell you it is better than sex.
‘What do you want? What is it you want? You wan to destroy me,’ Bakshi
said, rubbing his head. ‘I have a family with two kids. With great difficulty my
career is going fine. My wife wants to leave me anyway. Don’t destroy me. I
am human too.’
I disagreed with Bakshi’s last phrase. I didn’t think he was human at all.
‘Destroying you is a good, fun option,’ Vroom said, ‘but we have more
worthwhile goals for now. I want to do a deal with you. We bury this issue and
in return you do some things for us.’
‘What kind of things?’ Bakshi said.
‘One. I want to have control of the call center for the next two hours. I
need to get on the mass speaker.’
The one management is used to talk to everyone. Why do you want it?
Will you talk about this email?’ Bakshi said.
‘No, you moron. It is so save jobs at the call center. Now, do I have the
speaker?’
‘Yes. What else?’
‘I want you to write out a resignation letter for Shyam and me. Layoffs
or not, we are quitting Connexions.’
‘You guys are quitting right now?’ the girls said.
‘Yes. Shyam and I will start a small website design business. Right,
Shyam?’ Vroom said.
‘Yes,’ I said. Wow! I thought.
‘Good. And this time, no idiot will take credit for our websites,’ Vroom
said and slapped Bakshi’s face. Bakshi’s face turned sixty degrees from the
impact. He held his cheeks but remained silent, apart from a tiny dry sob. His
facial expression had a combination of ninety percent pain and ten percent
shame
‘May I?’ I said.
‘Be my guest,’ Vroom said.
Slap! I gave a slap on Bakshi’s face. The face turned sixty degrees in the
other direction. It was my most fun career moment. The shiny face turned
hot.
‘So you will do the resignation letter, okay?’ Vroom said.
‘Okay,’ Bakshi said, rubbing his cheek. ‘But Esha will delete the email
right?’
‘Wait. We are not done. Our business will require start-up capital.
Therefore, we need a severance package of six months’ salary. Understood?’
Vroom said.
‘I cannot do six months. It is unprecedented for agents,’ Bakshi said.
‘NDTV or Times of India, you pick,’ Vroom said as he took out his phone.
‘Six months is possible. Good managers break precedents,’ Bakshi said. I
guess no number of slaps could break his jargon.
‘Nice. Last thing. I want you to retract the right-sizing proposal. Arrange
a call with Boston. Ask them to postpone the layoffs to try a new sales-driven
recovery plan for Connexions.
‘I can’t do that,’ Bakshi said.
Vroom lifted his mobile phone and put it in front of Bakshi’s face.
‘I’ll make sure all of India knows you by tomorrow,’ Vroom said. ‘Listen,
you idiot. I don’t care about this job, but there are agents with kids, families
and responsibilities in life. You can’t just fire them. They are people, not
resources. Now, which news channel is your favorite?’
‘Give me half an hour. I’ll set up a call with Boston,’ Bakshi said.
‘Good we’ll bury the email. But you get the hell out of the call center,
this city, and this country as fast as you can. We need a new boss. We need a
normal, decent, inspiring human being and not a slimy, blood-sucking goofball
with fancy degrees.’
Bakshi nodded as he continuously wiped the sweat from his face.
‘Good. Anything else?; you had some questions about my monitor?’
Vroom said.
‘Monitor? What monitor?’ Bakshi said.
#33
Bakshi gave Vroom the key to the speaker room. Soon, Bakshi was on his
phone, calling Boston to arrange management meetings. I have never seen
him work so efficiently.
Vroom went to the broadcast room and switched on the mikes. I went to
the main computers bay to check for sound quality.
‘Hello, everyone. May I have your attention please? This is Vroom, from
the strategic group.’
Vroom’s voice echoed through Connexions. Every agent looked up at the
speakers as they continued to talk tot heir customers.
‘Sorry, to bother you, but we have an emergency. This is about the
layoffs. Can you please disconnect all your calls,’ the speaker said.
Everyone heard the word layoffs and a thousand calls ended at the same
time. New calls flashed, but no one picked them up. Vroom continued:
‘Idiots have managed this place, because of which we have to suffer
tonight. For their mistakes, more than a third of you will lose your jobs. It
does not seem fair to me. Does it seem fair to you?’
No response came back.
‘C’mon guys, I want to hear you. Do I have your support to save your
jobs band this call center?’
All the agents looked at each other, still in partial disbelief. Many of
them said a weak ‘yes’.
‘Louder guys, all together. Do I have your support?’ Vroom said.
‘Yes!’ a collective scream rocked Connexions.
I was standing at the corner hall of the main bay. Every agent glued his
or her eyes to the fire-drill speaker. Vroom continued, this time in a firmer
voice.
‘Thank you. My friends, I am angry. Because every day, I see some of
the world’s strongest and smartest people in my country. I see all this
potential, yet it is all getting wasted. An entire generation up all night,
providing crutches for the white morons to run their lives. And then big
companies come and convince us with their advertising to vale crap we don’t
need, do jobs we hate so that we can but stuff—junk food, colored fizzy
water, dumbass credit cards and overpriced shoes. They call it youth culture.
Is this what they think youth is about? Two generations ago, the youth got this
country free. Now that was something meaningful. But what happened after
that? We have just been reduced to a high-spending demographic. The only
youth power they care about is our spending power,’ Vroom said, and even I
was amazed at the attention every agent gave him.
Vroom continued: ‘Meanwhile bad bosses and stupid Americans suck the
life blood out of our country’s most productive generation. But tonight we will
show them. And for that I need your support. Tell me are you ready to work
hard for the next two hours?’
‘Yes!’ a collective vice cam back. The whole call center vibrated as
Vroom paused to take a breath.
‘Good, then listen. The call center will survive if our call traffic goes up.
My plan is to scare the Americans into calling us regularly. Tell them that
terrorists have hit America with a new computer virus that will take their
country down. The only was they can be safe is if they keep calling us to
report there status. We do it like this, pull out every customer number you
have and call them. I will send you a call script on email. The mail will come
to you in five minutes. Until then, get those numbers out,’ Vroom said.
Noise levels rose in the main bay as hundreds of localized conversation
took place simultaneously. There was a frenzy as people took printouts of all
customer numbers in their database. Nobody was sure if the plan would work,
but people were willing to try anything to avoid layoffs.
Vroom and I came to our bay. He typed furiously on his computer and
tapped my shoulder after a few minutes.
‘Check your email,’ Vroom said and pointed to my screen.
I opened my inbox. Vroom had sent the mail to everyone in the call
center.
Subject: Operation Yankee Fear
Dear All.
Operating Yankee Fear’s single aim is to increase the
incoming call traffic
In the Connexions call center, capitalizing on Americans being the biggest
cowards on the planet. This will prevent the planned mass-layoffs and help
us buy more time to fix things around the place, including a marketing
efforts to get new clients.
Operation Yankee Fear cannot succeed without your 100% cooperation. So,
please read the instructions below carefully and relentlessly focus on
making calls for the next two hours. When you call each customer, the key
message you have to deliver is as follows:
1. Start by saying you are sorry to disturb them on Thanksgiving Day.
2. State that ‘evil forces’ of the world have unleashed a computer virus
that threatens to pervade every computer in America. This way the evil
forces will monitor every American and eventually destroy the American
economy. Tel them that, according to your information, the virus has
hit their computer.
3. If asked what the ‘evil forces’ are, give vague explanation like ‘forces
that want to harm the US’ or ‘organizations that threaten freedom and
liberty’ etc. Remember, the more vague you are, the greater the
amount of fear you can create. Try to inject genuine panic into your
voice.
4. To check whether the virus has hit them or not, make them do an
MSWord test. Tell them to open an empty MSWord file, and type in
=rand (200, 99) and press enter. If a lot of text pops comes out, that
means there is a virus. (Don’t worry: the text will pop out-it is a bug in
MSWord). Once that happens, your customers might start shaking in
fear.
5. Tell them you can save them from this virus as a) you are from India,
and all Indians are good at computers b) India has faced terrorism for
years and c) they are valued clients and you believe in customer
service.
6. However, if they want our help, they must keep calling the Connexions
call center every six hours. Even if nothing happens, they should just
call to say things are okay. (The shorter the calls, the better for us
anyway).
7. Once calls rise, I will speak to Boston about the sudden rise in traffic
and recommend we postpone the layoffs for two months.
After that, we can implement a revival strategy.
Cheers,
Varun @ WASG
Vroom grinned and winked at me as I finished reading the email.
‘What’s with the MSWord trick?’ I said.
I opened an empty Word document and typed in =rand (200,99).
As soon as I pressed Enter, two hundred pages of text popped out. It was
spooky, and went something like this:
The quick brown fox jumps over the lazy dog. The quick brown fox jumps
over the lazy dog. The quick brown fox jumps over the lazy dog. The quick
brown fox jumps over the lazy dog. The quick brown fox jumps over the lazy
dog. The quick brown fox jumps over the lazy dog. The quick brown fox
jumps over the lazy dog. The quick brown fox jumps over the lazy dog. The
quick brown fox jumps over the lazy dog. The quick brown fox jumps over
the lazy dog. The quick brown fox jumps over the lazy dog. The quick brown
fox jumps …………
‘This is unbelievable. What is this?’ I said.
‘I told you. It’s bug in MSWord. Nothing is perfect. Now just wait and
watch the fun,’ Vroom said.
Vroom’s email reached a thousand mailboxes and agents read it
immediately.
Team leader further assisted agents in clarifying doubts. With in
minutes, agents were doing a job they knew only too well: calling people to
deliver a message as fast as possible. I left my bay and passed by the main
bay. I picked up random sentences from the telephone conversations.
‘Hello Mr William, sorry to disturb you on Thanksgiving. I am from
Western Computers with an urgent situation. America is under a virus attack,’
one agent said.
‘Yes sir, your computer as per our records is affected…’ said another.
‘Don’t freak out sir. But, yes, it looks like the evil forces have targeted
you,’ an eighteen-year-old agent said. ‘But we can save you.’
‘Just keep calling us. Every four to six hours,’ said one, as she ended
the call.
The more aggressive agents went a step further: ‘And I want you to tell
all your friends and relatives. Yes, they can call us too.’
Some customers panicked, and agents had to reassure them: ‘No
problem. We will save this country. The evil forces will never succeed.’
A thousand agents, four minutes to a call—we could do thirty thousand
calls in two hours. If they called us every six hours, we would have over a
hundred thousand calls a day. Even if this lasted a week, we would hit our
targets to cover the next two months. Hopefully, with a new manager and
extra sales effort, Connexions could recover. And for now, no one would lose
his or her job.
Vroom cam looking for me in the main bay. We went back to the WASG.
Vroom signaled me into the conference room.
‘The response is amazing. We have just called for thirty minutes, and
call traffic is up five times already.’ Vroom said.
‘Rocking man,’ I said. ‘You make me feel confident about our web
design company. But let’s go back to the desk, why have you called me here?’
‘We have to discuss the third private agenda.’
‘What’s that?’ I said.
‘The third agenda is for you. Don’t you want Priyanka back?’
 #3 4
‘No. Priyanka and I are over,’ I said.
‘Be honest dude. You spoke to God and everything.’
I looked down. Vroom waited until I said something.
‘It doesn’t matter if I want to or not. Look at my competition. How am I
going to succeed against Mr Perfect Match Ganesh?’
‘See, that is the problem. We all think Ganesh is Mr Perfect. But nobody
is perfect.’
‘Yeah right. A house with a pool, a car that costs more than ten years’
of my salary, freaking working for the world’s top company—I don’t see much
imperfection in that.’
‘Everyone has a flaw, dude. The trick is to find a flaw in Ganesh.’
‘Well how are we ever going to do that? And even if we find a flaw in
him, what is the point? He is so good, Priyanka will still go for him,’ I said.
‘At least Priyanka will know she isn’t making the perfect trade-off,’
Vroom said.
I remained silent for two minutes. ‘Yes, but how do we find Ganesh’s
flaw now?’ I said and looked at my watch. It was 5:30 a.m.
‘There must be a way,’ Vroom said.
‘The shift is over in ninety minutes, and then Priyanka goes home. What
are you planning to do? Hire some instant detectives in Seattle?’ I said, my
voice irritated.
‘Don’t give up Shyam,’ Vroom said and patted my shoulder.
‘I am trying to forget Priyanka. But if you search within me, there is still
pain. Don’t make it worse, Vroom.’
‘Wow, what drama. Search within me, there is pain, Vroom said and
laughed.
‘Sorry for my lame lines. Let’s go back to the bay,’ I said.
‘Hey wait a minute. You just said search.’
‘Yes, search within me, there is still pain. Pretty cheesy, I know. Why?’
I said.
‘Search. That is what we can do. Google will be our detective. Let’s do a
search on his name and see what comes out. There could be some surprises.’
‘What? You want to do a search for Ganesh?’
‘Yes, but we need his full name. Let’s find out his college at well. I
think he did his masters in computers from the US,’ he said and grabbed my
shirt. ‘C’mon, let’s go.’
‘Where?’ I said, even as I let myself get dragged.
‘To the WASG bay,’ Vroom said.
Priyanka was busy on the phone, scaring Americans out of their wits. I
think she can put on that voice of authority when she wants, and it is
impossible not to believe her. It comes from her mother I think. Vroom spoke
to her after she had ended a call.
‘Hey Priyanka, quick question. My cousin also did a Masters in
computers from the US. Which college did Ganesh go to?’
‘Huh? Wisconsin I think,’ she said.
‘Really. Let me email my cousin and ask him if it is the same one. What
is Ganesh’s full name by the way?’
‘Gupta. Ganesh Gupta,’ Priyanka said as she prepared to make another
call.
‘Oooh Mrs Priyanka Gupta,’ Esha said in a mock high-society voice and
laughed. Priyanka pocked her with her elbow. Priyanka’s new name sent
ripples of pain down my rib cage.
‘Cool. Keep calling,’ Vroom said and went back to his seat.
As Vroom’s monitor was broken, he took control of my computer. He
searched for the following terms on google.com:
ganesh gupta drunk Wisconsin
ganesh gupta fines Wisconsin
ganesh gupta girlfriend
Several links popped out, but there was nothing we could make much
sense or use of. We hit upon Ganesh’s list of classmates, and found out that
he was in the Dean’s list in Boston.
‘Damn, what a boring guy. Let me try some more,’ Vroom said and did
some more searches.
ganesh gupta fail
ganesh gupta party
Nothing interesting came out.
‘Forget it man. He was probably the head boy in school,’ I said.
‘You bet, one of those teacher’s per types,’ Vroom said, letting out a
frustrated breath. ‘I give up. I am sure if I type something like this. Lots will
pop out, achiever that he is.’
ganesh gupta Microsoft award
More links popped out. We clicked through a few, and then we hit on
one with his picture. It was Ganesh’s online album.
‘Damn, it is him, with his buddies,’ Vroom whispered and clicked on the
link. ‘Let’s check out how ugly his friends are.’
The link opened to a webpage titled ‘Microsoft Award Party photos.’
The party was at Ganesh’s house. Ganesh had won some sidey developer
award at Microsoft. A couple of his friends had come to his house to
celebrate.
‘Do slideshow,’ I said as Vroom selected the option. We looked up once
to confirm the girls were busy with their calls.
As the picture came on the screen, we saw a garden party full of Indian
people. On the tables, there was enough food to feed a small town. I saw
Ganesh’s house and the over-hyped personal pool. It was no more than an
oversized bathtub, if you ask me, even though Ganesh had made it sound like
Olympic champions trained in it.
‘Hey, I think we found something. Check out our man,’ Vroom said. He
pointed to one of the photos in which Ganesh held a beer glass.
‘What is the big deal?’ I said. It was hardly scandalous to hold a glass of
beer. Priyanka herself could knock down ten of them if they were free.
‘Check out Ganesh’s head,’ Vroom said.
‘What/’ I said. I looked closer, and then I saw it.
‘Oh no,’ I said, and covered my mouth to keep my voice down.
In the picture, Ganesh had a bald spot in the middle of his head. It was
the size of the a Happy meal burger and had caught the camera’s flashlight.
‘Unbelie…’ I said.
‘Shhh!’ Vroom said. ‘Did you see that. He has perfect hair in the statue
of Liberty picture.’
‘Are all his photos in this album like this?’ I said.
‘Yes sir,’ Vroom said and flicked through the slideshow. One boring
picture after another followed—mainly people with mouths and plates stuffed
with food. Every picture had one thing in common: whatever there was
Ganesh, there was a shiny spot.
Vroom pushed his computer mouse away. He reclined back on his chair
with a proud expression, ‘As I said sir, no one is perfect. Apart from Google,
of course.’
I looked at the screen and Vroom’s face in amazement.
‘So, now what?’ I said.
‘Now we invite the ladies for a viewing,’ Vroom said and grinned.
‘No. this is not right…’ I said, but it was too late.
‘Esha, Radhika, Priyanka. Want to see some more Ganesh pictures?
Come here fast,’ Vroom said.
The girls stopped their phone calls and looked at us. Esha and Radhika
stood up.
‘Where, where? Show us,’ Esha said.
‘What are you talking about?’ Priyanka said and came over to our side.
‘The power of the internet. We found an online album. Come see what
your new house is like,’ Vroom said. He kept quiet about the shiny spot so
that the girls discover it for themselves. I saw the mixture of excitement and
curiosity in Priyanka’s face.
‘Nice pad,’ Esha said, as she notice the barbeque behind the pool, ‘but
where is Ganesh. Let me guess,’ she said and brought her finger to the
monitor. Here, this one no. but wait, he is a baldie. Is he the elder brother?’
Priyanka and Radhika looked closer.
‘No, that is Ganesh,’ Priyanka said as her mouth opened as wide as the
bald spot. I could sense that the wind had been knocked out of her lungs.
‘But I didn’t notice the bald spot in the photo you showed us Priyanka…’
Esha said. Radhika squeezed Esha’s arm. Esha stopped talking and raised her
eyebrows.
Priyanka came closed to the computer and began flipping through the
images. She did not realize it, but her hair was falling on my shoulders as she
bent over. It felt nice.
However, Priyanka was not feeling nice. She brought out the statue of
liberty picture and we looked at it again. Ganesh had perfect hair.
‘Maybe the guy in the online album is Ganesh’s elder brother,’ Radhika
said.
‘No. Ganesh does not have a brother. He only has one sister. Priyanka
said, her face distraught.
There was silence for a few seconds.
‘Well doesn’t really matter much, eh? What’s a bit of smooth skin
between the true over of two souls,’ Vroom said. I clamped my jaws shut to
prevent a laugh escaping. ‘Let’s go back people, enough of fun. Don’t forget
the calls,’ Vroom sad.
Priyanka retraced her steps in slow motion. She went back to her seat
and took out her mobile phone. She dialed a long number, probably long
distance. This call was going to be fun, and I wished I could have tapped it.
‘Hello Ganesh,’ Priyanka said in a direct voice. ‘Listen, I cannot talk for
long. I just want to check on something…yes, jus one question…actually I was
just surfing the Internet…’ Priyanka said and got up from her seat. She moved
to the corner of the room and I could not hear her thereafter.
I made a few calls and terrorized a few more Americans. Priyanka
returned after ten minutes and tossed her cell phone on the desk.
Esha jiggled her eyebrows up and down, as if to ask ‘What’s up?’
‘It is him in the online pictures,’ Priyanka said. ‘He didn’t have much to
say. He said his mother asked him to slightly touch up the hair in the Status of
Liberty snap as that would help in the arranged marriage market.’
‘Oh no,’ Esha said.
‘He apologized several times. He said he was against tampering with the
picture but had to agree when his mother insisted.’
‘Can’t he think for himself?’ Esha said.
‘Oh God, what am I going to do?’ Priyanka said.
‘Did the apologies seem genuine?’ Radhika said.
‘Yes. I think so. He said he understood how I must feel. He said he was
ready to apologize in front of my family as well.’
‘Well, then it is okay. What different does it make? You don’t really
care about him being bald, do you?’ Radhika said.
‘Yeah, besides practically all men become bald in a few years anyway.
It’s not like you can do something about it then,’ Esha said.
‘That’s true,’ Priyanka said, in a mellow voice. I could see her relenting,
and I turned to Vroom.
‘Yeah, doesn’t matter. Just make sure he wears a cap at the wedding.
Unless you want to touch up all the wedding pictures,’ Vroom said and
chuckled. Esha and I looked down to suppress out grins.
‘Shut up, Vroom,’ Radhika said.
‘Sorry, I am being mean. Honestly, it is no big deal Priyanka. No one is
perfect, we all know that right? So, let’s get back to the calls,’ Vroom said.
#35
For the next half hour we focused on one activity—making calls to save
Connexions.
At 6:30 a.m., I went up the main bay. Team leaders huddled around me
as they gave me the news. The incoming calls had shot up already even
though we had expected the big boost six hours later. Despite turkey dinners.
Americans were scared out of their wits. Some had called us several times an
hour.
Vroom and I went to Bakshi’s office with some senior team leaders.
Bakshi had arranged an urgent video conference call with the Boston office.
Bakshi supported us as we presented the new call data, insights into the call
traffic, and potential new sources of revenue. After a twenty-minute video
discussion, Boston agreed to a two-month reprieve to the layoffs. They also
agreed to evaluate the possibility of sending top team leaders on a short-term
sales assignment to Boston. However, the team leaders would have to present
a clear plan over the next for weeks.
‘How did we do it man? I never thought it would work,’ I asked Vroom as
we came out of Bakshi’s office.
‘Promise Americans lots of future dollars, and they listen to you. Only a
two-month reprieve, but that’s enough for now,’ Vroom said.
Reassured that Connexions was safe, I returned to my desk. Vroom went
outside to clean the Qualis before the driver woke up. I had told Vroom I
wanted to slip away—no goodbyes, no hugs and no promises to meet,
especially in front of Priyanka Vroom agreed and said he would be ready with
his bike outside at 6:50 a.m.
The girls stopped their calls at 6:45 a.m. as our shift got over. Everyone
began to log out so they could be in time for the Qualis, which would be ready
at the gate at 7:0 a.m.
‘I’m so excited. Radhika is moving into my place,’ Esha said as she
switched off her monitor. She opened her handbag and started re-arranging
the contents.
‘Really?’ I said.
‘Yes, I am,’ Radhika said. ‘And Military Uncle is going to recommend a
lawyer friend. I need a good, tough divorce lawyer.’
‘Won’t you try to work it out?’ Priyanka said as she collected the sweet
boxes and placed them back in the bag.
‘We’ll see. I am in no mood to compromise. And I am not going back to
hi house now for sure. Today, my mother-in-law will make her own
breakfast.’
‘And after that, I’m taking her to Chandigarh for the weekend,’ Esha
said and smiled.
Everyone was busy making plans. I excused myself on the pretext of
going to the water cooler for a drink so I could leave the office from there.
#36
At 6:47 a.m. I reached the water cooler. I bent towards the tap to take
a last drink at the call center.
As I finished, I stood up to find Priyanka behind me.
‘Hi,’ she said. ‘Leaving?’
‘Oh, hi. Yes, I am going back on Vroom’s bike…’ I said and wiped my
mouth.
‘I’ll miss you,’ she said, interrupting me.
‘Huh? Where? In the Qualis?’ I said.
‘No Shyam, I’ll miss you in general. I’m sorry about the way things
turned out.’
‘Don’t be sorry,’ I said, shaking my fingers dry. ‘It is more my fault. I
understand that. I acted like a loser…’
‘Shyam, you know how Vroom said just because India is poor doesn’t
mean you stop loving it/’ Priyanka said.
‘What?’ I blinked at the change of topic. ‘Oh yes. And I agree, it is our
country after all…’
‘Yes, we love India because it is ours. But, do you know the other
reason why we don’t stop loving it?’
‘Why?’
‘You don’t because it isn’t completely India’s fault that we are behind.
Yes, some of our past leader could have done things differently, but now we
have the potential and we know it. And as Vroom says, one day we will show
them.’
‘Point Good Point,’ I said. I found it strange that she should talk
nationalism this early in the morning. Not to mention during what was
possibly our last time together.
I nodded and started walking away from her. ‘Anyway, I think Vroom
will be waiting…’ I said.
‘Wait, I am not done,’ she said.
‘What?’ I said and stopped to look at her.
‘I applied the same logic to something else,’ she said. ‘I thought, this is
the same as my Shyam, who may not be successful now, but it doesn’t mean
the doesn’t have the potential. And it sure as hell doesn’t mean I stop loving
him.’
I stood there dumbstruck. This was unexpected. I fumbled for words,
and finally spoke shakily:
‘You know what Priyanka? You say these good lines…that even though
all night I tried to hate you, it’s impossible. But I know I should hate you and
then I should move on. Because I can’t offer you what Mr Microsoft can…’ I
was speaking hastily out of nervousness and shock.
‘Ganesh,’ she interrupted me.
‘What?’ I said.
‘Ganesh is his name. Not Mr Microsoft,’ she said.
‘Yes, whatever,’ I kept talking,, without pausing to breathe. ‘I can’t
offer you what Ganesh can. No way I could ever buy a Lexus. Maybe a Maruti
800 one day, but that’s about it…’
She smiled.
‘Really? 800? With or without AC?’ she said.
‘Shut up, I am trying to say something deep and you find a funny,’ I
said.
She laughed again, though gently. I wiped a tear from my right eye. She
raised her hand and wiped the other tear from my left eye.
‘Anyway, it is over between us, Priyanka. And I know it. I should get
over it soon. I know, I know,’ I said, talking more to myself.
She waited until I had composed myself. I bent over to splash my face
with water at the cooler.
‘Anyway, where is your wedding? Your mom will probably blow all her
cash for a big gig,’ I said, straightening up.
‘Some five-star hotel, I am sure. She’ll be paying off loans for years, but
she has to get a gold-plated stage that night. You’ll come, right?’
‘I don’t know,’ I said.
‘What do you mean you don’ know? It’ll be so strange if you aren’t
there.’
‘I don’t want to come there and feel horrible. Anyway, what’s so
strange if I am not there?’
‘Well, it’s little strange if the groom is not there at his own wedding,’
Priyanka said.
I froze as I heard the words. I rewound her last sentence three times in
my head.
‘What, what did you just say?’ I said.
She pinched my cheek and imitated me: ‘What, what did you just say?’
I just stood there shocked.
‘But don’t think I am going to let you go that easy. One day I want my
800 with AC,’ she said and laughed.
‘What?’ I said.
‘You heard me. I want to marry you, Shyam,’ Priyanka said.
I could not believe her words. I though I would jump in joy, but mostly I
was shocked. And even though I wanted to hug, cry and laugh at the same
time, a firm voice asked like a guard inside me. What was this all about?
Hell, however miserable my life was, I didn’t want pity.
‘What are you saying Priyanka? You will choose me over Ganesh? Is this
a sympathy decision?’
‘Stop thinking about yourself. My life’s biggest decision can’t be a
sympathy decision. I have thought about it. Ganesh is great, but…’
‘But what?’ I said.
‘But the whole touching up of the photo bothers me. He is an achiever
on his own. So why did he have to lie?’
‘You are rejecting him because he is bald? My hair isn’t reliable either,’
I said. It was true. Every time I took a shower, the towel had more time than
me.
‘No. I am not rejecting him because he is bald. Most men go bald one
day,, it is horrible, I know,’ she said and ruffled my hair. She continued: ‘He
might be fine in most ways, but the point is, he lied. And this gives me a clue
about the person he is. I don’t want to spend my life with a person like that.
In fact, I don’t want to spend my life with a person I don’t know well
beforehand. That is one part of my decision. There is the other big part.’
‘What/’ I said.
‘That I love you. Because you are the only person in the world I can be
myself with. And because you are the only person who knows me with all my
flaws and still loves me completely. I hope,’ she said, with a quivering voice.
I did not say anything.
She spoke again: ‘And even if the world says I am cold, there is a part of
me that is sentimental, irrational and romantic. Do I really care about money?
Only because people tell me I should. Hell, I prefer truck driver dhabhas over
five-star hotels. Shyam, I know mom and you say I am uncaring…’
‘I never said that…’ I said and held her shoulders.
‘I’m sorry, Shyam. I judged you so much. I am such a bitch,’ Priyanka
said.
She sniffed. Her puckered nose looked cuter than it ever had.
‘It’s okay Priyanka,’ I said and wiped her tears.
‘So that is it, Shyam. Deep inside, I am just a girl who wants to be with
her favourite boy. Because like you, this girl is a person who needs a lot of
love.’
‘Love?’ I need a lot of love?’ I said.
‘Of course, you do. And everyone else does too.; funny we never say it.
It is okay to scream in public if you are hungry “I’m starving”. It is okay to
make a fuss if you are tired “I’m so sleepy”. But somehow we cannot say “I
just need some more love”. Why can’t we say it, Shyam? It is as basic a need.’
I looked at her. Whenever she gives these deep, philosophical lines, I
get horribly attracted to her. The guard inside reminded me, ‘Be firm’.
‘Priyanka?’
‘Yes, she said, still sniffling.
‘I love you,’ I said.
‘I love you too,’ Priyanka said.
‘Thanks. However…Priyanka, I can’t marry you. Sorry to say this, but my
answer to your mind-blowing proposal is no,’ I said.
‘What?’ Priyanka said as her eyes opened wide in disbelief. The guard
inside me was in full charge.
‘No. I cannot marry you. I am a new person tonight. And this new person
needs to make a new life and find new respect for himself. You chose Ganesh,
and he is fine. You have an option for a new life. You don’t really need me. So
maybe it is better this way,’ I said.
‘I still love you Shyam, and only you. Please don’t do this…’ she said and
came closer to me.
‘Sorry,’ I said and moved back three steeps. ‘I can’t. I am not your spare
wheel. I appreciate you coming back, but I think I am ready to move on.’
She just stood there and cried. My heart felt weak, but my head was
strong.
‘Bye Priyanka ,’ I gingerly patted her shoulder and left.
#37
‘What the hell kept you?’ Vroom said, as he sat on his bike and the main
entrance. He showed his watch to me, it was 6:59 a.m.
‘Sorry man, Priyanka met me at the water cooler,’ I said and sank onto
the pillion seat.
‘And?’ Vroom said.
‘Nothing. Just goodbye and all. Oh, and she wanted to get back—marry
me, she said. Can you believe it?’
Vroom turned to me.
‘Really? What did you say?’
‘I said no,’ I said coolly.
‘What?’ Vroom said.
As we were talking, Radhika, Esha and Military Uncle came out of the
main entrance into the wintry sunshine.
‘Hi, you guys still here?’ Radhika said.
‘Shyam just said no to Priyanka. She wanted to marry him,’ but he said
no.’
‘What/’ Radhika and Esha spoke unison.
‘Hey guys, chill out. I did what I needed to do to get some respect in my
life. Quit bothering me,’ I said.
The Qualis driver bothering me,’ I said.
‘We aren’t bothering you. It’s your life—let’s go Esha,’ Radhika said and
gave me a dirty look. She turned to Esha as they walked to the Qualis.
‘Where’s Priyanka madam? We are getting late,’ the driver said.
‘She’s coming. She is on the phone with her mother. Ganesh’s parents
are coming home for breakfast. Her mother is making hot paranthas,’ Radhika
said, loud enough so I could hear. The mention of paranthas made me hungry.
But I guess I would be the last person to be invited to this breakfast.
‘Looks like their entire families are getting married to each other,’
Vroom said. He lit a cigarette to take a few final puffs before we began our
ride back.
The driver started the Qualis. Esha and Radhika sat in the middle row,
while Military Uncle sat behind.
Priyanka came running our of the main entrance. She avoided me and
went straight to the Qualis front seat. The driver turned the Qualis so its rear
end faced us.
As the Qualis began to move, Military Uncle looked out from his window
and said something. I could only make out in lip sync. ‘You bloody idiot…’ I
thought it was.
Before I could react, the Qualis was gone.
Vroom stubbed out his cigarette.
‘Oh no. I am a bloody idiot. I let her go,’ I said.
‘Uh-huh,’ Vroom said as he wore his helmet.
‘Is that a yes? You think I am a total idiot?’
‘You are your best judge,’ Vroom said as he dragged the bike with his
feet.
‘Vroom, what have I done? If she reaches home and has paranthas with
Ganesh’s family, it is all over. I am such a moron,’ I said and started jumping
up and down on my seat.
‘Stop dancing around. I have to ride,’ Vroom said s he placed his foot on
the kick-pedal.
‘Vroom, we have to catch the Qualis. Can you ride fast enough to catch
it?’
Vroom removed his helmet laughed.
‘Are you insulting me? You are doubting that I can catch that wreck of a
Qualis? I am hurt, man.’
‘Vroom, let’s go. Please,’ said and pushed his shoulders.
‘No. first you apologize for doubting my driving abilities.’
‘I am sorry, boss, I am sorry,’ I said and folded my hands. ‘Now move,
Schumacher.’
Vroom kick-started his bike. In a few seconds, we had zipped out of the
call center. The main road was getting busier in the morning, but Vroom still
managed ninety an hour. We dodged cars, scooters, autos, school buses and
newspaper hawkers as we took the road to Delhi.
Four minutes later, I noticed a Qualis at a distant traffic signal.
‘It must be that one,’ I pointed out.
Just as Vroom moved ahead, a herd of goats decided to cross the road.
There were fifty of them, blocking our way.
‘Damn, where did they come from?’ I said, nervous as hell.
‘Gurgaon was a village until recently; the goats are probably asking
where did we come from,’ Vroom said as he cracked his knuckles.
‘Shut up and do something,’ I said.
Vroom tried to move his bike, but he only bumped into a goat’s horns.
He considered taking the right side of the road with traffic going the other
way—but it was full of trucks that would kill us in five seconds.
‘There is only one option,’ Vroom said and smiled at me through the
helmet.
‘Wha…’ I was saying when Vroom lunged his bike up on the road divider.
‘Are you crazy?’ I said.
‘No, you are crazy to let her go,’ Vroom said and started riding on the
divider. Te goats and traffic looked at us in shock. Vroom dodged through the
street lights, until we had crossed the herd. Once back on the road, Vroom
sped up to a hundred. A minute later, our bike met the Qualis at a red light. I
got off the bike and tapped the front window. Priyanka looked away. I banged
the glass with my palm.
She opened the window. ‘What is it? We don’t want to buy anything,’
Priyanka said, as if I was a roadside vendor.
‘I am an idiot,’ I said.
‘And?’ Priyanka said.
Everyone in the Qualis rolled down their windows to look at me.
‘I am a moron. I am stupid and insane and nuts. Please I want to marry
you.’
‘Oh really? What about the new man needing respect?’ Priyanka said.
‘I didn’t know what I was saying. What does one do with respect? I can’t
keep it in my pocket,’ I said.
‘So you want to keep me in your pocket/’ Priyanka said.
‘You are already in every pocket—of my life, my heart, my mind, my
soul—please comeback. Will you come back?’ I said, as the red light turned
yellow.
‘Hmm. Let’s see…’ Priyanka said.
‘Priyanka, please answer fast.’
‘I don’t know. Let me think. Meet me at the next red light okay? Let’s
go Driver ji,’ she said as the light turned green. The driver, as if enjoying my
misery, took off at full speed.
‘What did she say?’ Vroom said as I sat on the bike.
‘She’ll answer at the next red light. Let’s go.’
There was a mini-=traffic jam at the next red light. I got off the bike
and ran past a few vehicles to reach the Qualis. I tapped the window again.
Priyanka wasn’t there.
‘Where is she?’ I asked the driver. He shrugged his shoulders.
I looked inside the Qualis. Radhika and Esha shrugged their shoulders;
she wasn’t in there.
Someone came up from behind and hugged me.
‘I told you we didn’t want to buy anything. Why are you bothering us?’
I turned around to look at Priyanka.
‘I don’t know what I was doing at the water cooler,’ I said.
‘Shut up and hug me,’ Priyanka said and opened her arms.
Our eyes met, and even though I wanted to speak a lot, our eyes did al
the talking. I hugged her for a few seconds, and then she kissed me. Our lips
locked, and every passenger stuck in the traffic jam looked at us, enjoying
the early morning show. It was awkward to kiss in this setting, but I could not
extract myself from her. We were kissing after six months, and there was a
lot of pent-up demand. Vroom and everyone else from the Qualis surrounded
us. Soon, they began to clap and whistle. The vehicles on the road joined in
with their horns in sync with the applause. But I could not see them or hear
them. Al I could see was Priyanka, and all I could hear was my inner voice that
said—kiss her, kiss her and kiss her some more.
#38
Well guys, that is how that night, and my story ends. We did not know
what, how or when things would happen in the future. And to some extent,
we still don’t know. But that is what life is like—uncertain, screwed up at
times, but still fun. However, let me tell you where we were one month after
this night. Vroom and I started this website design company with the seed
capital that Bakshi gave us. We called it the Black Sheep Web Design
Company. In a month, we had only managed to get one local order. It helped
us break even or even show a profit—depending on whether Vroom charged
the cigarettes to the company or not. No international orders yet, but we
shall see.
Esha quit her modeling aspirations and continued to work at the call
center. However, she works with this NGO during the day. Her job is to
fundraise with corporate. I heard she is doing well. I guess when male
executives hear such a hot woman ask for money for a good cause, they
cannot say no. most of them are probably staring at her navel ring when they
are signing the cheque. Apart from that, Vroom asked her out on a coffee
semi-date (whatever that means) for next week and I think she said yes.
Military Uncle got a visa for the US and went to make amends with his
son. He has not come back, so things must be working out. Radhika is fighting
her divorce case with her husband, and has moved in with Esha. She is also
planning to visit her parents for a while. Anuj has apologized, but Radhika is
in no mood to relent yet.
Priyanka works at Connexions as well, but in six months she will go to
college for an accelerated one0-year B.Ed. We decided that marriage is at
least two years away. Right now, we meet often but the first focus is career.
Her mother faked three heart attacks when Priyanka said no to Ganesh, but
Priyanka yawned every single time until her mom gave up on the heart attack
front and closed the Ganesh file.
So looks like things are working out. As for me as a person, I still feel
the same for the most part. However, there is a difference. I used to feel I
was a good-for-nothing non-achiever. But that is not true. After all, I helped
save lots of jobs at a call center, taught my boss a lesson, started my own
company, was chosen over a big-catch NRI groom by a wonderful girl and now
I even finished a whole book. this means that i) I can do whatever I really
want ii) God is always with me and iii) there is no such thing as a loser after
all.
EPILOGUE
_____________
‘Wow,’ I said, some story that was.’ She nodded. And had a sip of water
from her bottle. She held the bottle tight to prevent the water from spilling
over in the moving train.
‘Thank you,’ I said, ‘it made our night go by pretty quickly.’
I checked the time; it was close to 7 a.m. Our journey was almost over.
Delhi was les than an hour away. The train was tearing through the night, and
deep into the horizon, I could see a streak of saffron light up the sky.
‘So, you liked it?’
‘Yes, it was fun. But also, it made me think. I want through a similar
phase like Shyam, at work and in my personal life. I wish I had known this
story then. It might have made me do things differently, or at least would
have made me feel less bad.’
‘There you go. It is one of those rare stories that is fun but can help you
as well. And that is why I am asking you to share it. You ready to make it into
a book?’ she said, replacing the cap on the water bottle.
‘I guess. It will take your time though,’ I said.
‘For sure. And I will give you all the people’s details. Feel for to contact
tem if you want. Through which of them will you tell the story?’
‘Shyam. Like I said, he and his story are a lot like mine. I relate to him a
lot; I had similar problems. My own dark side.’
‘Really? That’s interesting,’ she said. ‘It is true through, we all have a
dark side—something we don’t like about ourselves, something that makes us
angry and something we want to change about ourselves. The difference is
how we choose to face it.’
I nodded. The train rocked in a soothing, gentle motion. We were silent
until I spoke after a few minutes.
‘Listen, sorry to say this. There it one issue I think readers may have
with this story.’
‘What?’
‘The conversation with God.’
She smiled.
‘What’s the issue with that,’ she said.
‘Well, just that—some people may not buy it. One has to present reality
in a story. Readers always say, “tell me what really happened”. So in the
context, how is this “God calling” going to fit in?’
‘Why? You don’t think that can happen?’ she said shifting in her seat.
Her blanket moved, uncovering a book I had not noticed before.
‘Well, I don’t know. It obviously does not happen a lot. I mean, things
need to have a rational, scientific explanation.’
‘Really? Does everything in life work that way?’
‘I guess?’
‘Well, let’s see. You said you did not know why, but you could really
relate to Shyam. What’s the scientific and rational explanation for that?’
I thought for a few moments but could not think of a suitable answer.
She saw me fidgeting and looked amused.
‘Please try and understand,’ I said. ‘Calls from God don’t happen a lot.
How can I write about that?’
‘Okay, listen. I am going to give you an alternative to the ‘God’s phone
call” bit. A rational one, okay?’ she said and kept her bottle away.
‘What alternative?’ I said.
‘Let’s rewind a bit. So they drove into a pit and the Qualis it trapped,
suspended by rods, right? You okay with that part?’
‘Right. I can live with that,’ I said.
‘And then they felt the end was near. There was no hope in life—
literally and figuratively. Agreed?’
‘Agreed,’ I said.
‘Okay,’ she continued, ‘so let’s just say that, at that moment, Military
Uncle spoke up. He said “I noticed you guys are in an unusual situation here,
so I thought I should intervene and give you some advice”.’
‘That’s exactly what God said,’ I said.
‘Correct. And from that point on, whatever God said, you can substitute
as if Military Uncle said it. He told them about success, the inner call and all
those other things.’
‘Really? Is that what happened?’ I said.
‘No. I did not say that. I just said you have the option to do that; so that
everything appears more scientific, more rational. You understand my point?’
‘Yes,’ I said.
‘So, you choose whichever version you want in the main story. It will,
after all, be your story.’
I nodded.
‘But can I ask you one question?’
‘Sure,’ I said.
‘Which of the two is a better story?’
I thought for a second.
‘The one with God in it,’ I said.
‘Just like life. Rational or not, it just gets better with God in it.’
I reflected on her words for a few minutes. She became silent. I looked
at her face she looked even better in the light of dawn.
‘Well, looks like Delhi is coming son,’ she said and looked out. The fields
had ended, and we could see the houses of Delhi’s border villages.
‘Yeah, the trip is over,’ I said. ‘Thanks for everything—err, let me guess,
Esha right?’ I stood up to shake her hand.
‘Esha? Why did you think I was her?’
‘Because you are so good–looking.’
‘Thanks,’ she laughed, ‘but sorry, I am not Esha.’
‘So? Priyanka?’ I said.
‘No.’
‘Don’t tell me—Radhika?’
‘No, I am not Radhika either,’ she said.
‘Well then…who are you?’
She just smiled.
That is when it struck me. She was a girl, she knew the full story, but
she was not Esha, Priyanka or Radhika. Which meant there was only one
alternative left.
‘So…that means…oh my…’ My whole body shook as I found it difficult to
balance. I felt down on my knees. Her face shone, and bright sunlight entered
our compartment in one stroke.
I looked up at her as she smiled. She had an open book next to her. It
was the English translation of a holy text. My eyes focused on a few lines on
the page that lay open:
Always think of Me, become My devotes, worship Me and offer your
homage unto Me. Thus you will come to Me without fail. I Promise you this
because you are My very dear friend.
‘What,’ I said as I felt my head spin. Maybe the sleepless night was
catching up. But she just smiled and smiled. She raised her hand and kept in
on my head.
‘I don’t know that to say,’ I said in the blinding light.
A sense of tiredness engulfed me as the sleepless night took its toll. I
closed my eyes.
When I opened them, the train had stopped, and I knelt on the floor
with my head down. The train was at Delhi Station. The cacophony of porters,
tea sellers and passenger movement rang in my ears. I slowly looked up at her
seat—but she was gone.
‘Sir, will you get out on your own or do you need help,’ a porter tapped
my shoulder.
 FINISH

Five Point Someone
What not to do at IIT
Chetan Bhagat is the author of two blockbuster novels – Five Point Someone (2004) and
One Night @ The Call Center (2005) – which continue to top bestseller lists. In March
2008, the New York Times called him the ‘biggest-selling English-language novelist in
India’s history’. Both his books have inspired major Bollywood films.
Seen more as the voice of a generation than just an author, this IIT/IIM-A graduate is making
India read like never before. The 3 Mistakes of My Life is his third novel.
After eleven years in Hong Kong, the author relocated to Mumbai in 2008, where he works
as an investment banker. Apart from books, the author has a keen interest in screenplays and
spirituality. Chetan is married to Anusha, his classmate from IIM-A, and has twin boys –
Ishaan and Shyam.
Five Point Someone
What not to do at IIT
I Love u Rachu
Dear Frnds pls spread this msg until its reach to my rachu
I thinks see knows my name
Downloaded from EBOOK4IN.BLOGSPOT.COM
For my mother
For IIT, my alma mater
Contents
Acknowledgements
Prologue
Bare Beginnings
Terminator
Barefoot on Metal
Line Drawing
Make Notes not War
Five-point Something
Alok Speaks
One Year Later
The Mice Theory
Cooperate to Dominate
The Gift
Neha Speaks
One More Year Later
Vodka
Operation Pendulum
The Longest Day of My Life I
The Longest Day of My Life II
The Longest Day of My Life III
The Longest Day of My Life IV
The Longest Day of My Life V
The Longest Day of My Life VI
Ryan Speaks
Kaju-burfi
Will we Make It?
A Day of Letters
Meeting Daddy
Five Point Someone
Acknowledgements
Well, to say this is my book would be totally untrue. At best, this was my dream. There are
people in this world, some of them so wonderful, that made this dream become a product
that you are holding in your hand. I would like to thank all of them, and in particular:
Shinie Antony – mentor, guru and friend, who taught me the basics of telling a story and
stayed with me right till the end. If she hadn’t encouraged and harassed me all the way, I
would have given this up a long time ago.
James Turner, Gaurav Malik, Jessica Rosenberg, Ritu Malik, Tracie Ang, Angela Wang
and Rimjhim Chattopadhya – amazing friends who read the manuscript and gave honest
comments. All of them also stayed with me in the process, and handled me and my
sometimes out-of-control emotions so well.
Anusha Bhagat – a wife who was once a classmate, and was the first reader of the draft.
Apart from being shocked by some of the incidents in the book, she kept her calm as she had
to face the tough job of improving the product and not upsetting her husband.
My mom Rekha Bhagat and brother Ketan, two people with an irrational, unbreakable
belief in me that bordered on craziness at times. My relationship with them goes beyond the
common genes we share, and I, like every author, needed their irrational support for me.
My IIT friends Ashish (Golu), Johri, VK, Manu, Shanky, Pappu, Manhar, VP, Rahul,
Mehta, Pago, Assem, Rajeev G., Rahul, Lavmeet,Puneet, Chapar and all others. This is a
work of fiction, but fiction needs real inspiration. I love them all so much that I could
literally write a book on them. Hey wait, have I?
My friends in Hong Kong, my work colleagues, my yoga teachers and others that surround
me, love me and make life fun.
The editor and the entire team at Rupa for being so professional and friendly through the
process.
And lastly, it is only when one writes a book that one realizes the true power of MSWord,
from grammar checks to replace-alls. It is simple – without this software, this book would
not be written. Thank you Mr Bill Gates and Microsoft Corp!
I Love u Rachu
Dear Frnds pls spread this msg until its reach to my rachu
I thinks see knows my name
Downloaded from EBOOK4IN.BLOGSPOT.COM
Prologue
I had never been inside an ambulance before. It was kind of creepy. Like a hospital was
suddenly asked to pack up and move. Instruments, catheters, drips and a medicine box
surrounded two beds. There was hardly any space for me and Ryan to stand even as Alok
got to sprawl out. I guess with thirteen fractures you kind of deserve a bed. The sheets were
originally white, which was hard to tell now as Alok’s blood covered every square inch of
them. Alok lay there unrecognizable, his eyeballs rolled up and his tongue collapsed outside
his mouth like an old man without dentures. Four front teeth gone, the doctor later told us.
His limbs were motionless, just like his father’s right side, the right knee bent in a way
that would make you think Alok was boneless. He was still, and if I had to bet my money,
I’d have said he was dead.
“If Alok makes it through this, I will write a book about our crazy days. I really will,” I
swore. It is the kind of absurd promise you make to yourself when you are seriously messed
up in the head and you haven’t slept for fifty hours straight…
1
—
Bare Beginnings
BEFORE I REALLY BEGIN THIS BOOK, LET ME FIRST TELL you what this book is
not. It is not a guide on how to live through college. On the contrary, it is probably an
example of how screwed up your college years can get if you don’t think straight. But then
this is my take on it, you’re free to agree or disagree. I expect Ryan and Alok, psychos both
of them, will probably kill me after this but I don’t really care. I mean, if they wanted their
version out there, they could have written one themselves. But Alok cannot write for nuts,
and Ryan, even though he could really do whatever he wants, is too lazy to put his bum to
the chair and type. So stuff it boys – it is my story, I am the one writing it and I get to tell it
the way I want it.
Also, let me tell you one more thing this book is certainly not. This book will not help
you get into IIT. I think half the trees in the world are felled to make up the IIT entrance
exam guides. Most of them are crap, but they might help you more than this one will.
Ryan, Alok and I are probably the last people on earth you want to ask about getting into
IIT. All we would say as advice is, if you can lock yourself in a room with books for two
years and throw away the key, you can probably make it here. And if your high school days
were half as miserable as mine, disappearing behind a pile of books will not seem like such
a bad idea. My last two years in school were living hell, and unless you captained the
basketball team or played the electric guitar since age six, probably yours were too. But I
don’t really want to get into all that.
I think I have made my disclaimers, and it is time for me to commence.
Well, I have to start somewhere, and what better than the day I joined the Indian Institute of
Technology and met Ryan and Alok for the first time; we had adjacent rooms on the second
floor of the Kumaon hostel. As per tradition, seniors rounded us up on the balcony for
ragging at midnight. I was still rubbing my eyes as the three of us stood to attention and three
seniors faced us. A senior named Anurag leaned against a wall. Another senior, to my
nervous eye, looked like a demon from cheap mythological TV shows – six feet tall, over a
hundred kilos, dark, hairy, and huge teeth that were ten years late meeting an orthodontist.
Although he inspired terror, he spoke little and was busy providing background for the boss,
Baku, a lungi-clad human toothpick, and just as smelly is my guess.
“You bloody freshers, dozing away eh? Rascals, who will give an introduction?” he
screamed.
“I am Hari Kumar sir, Mechanical Engineering student, All India Rank 326.” I was
nothing if not honest under pressure.
“I am Alok Gupta sir, Mechanical Engineering, Rank 453,” Alok said as I looked at him
for the first time. He was my height, five feet five inches – in short, very short – and had
these thick, chunky glasses on. His portly frame was covered in neatly ironed white kurta-
pajamas.
“Ryan Oberoi, Mechanical Engineering, Rank 91, sir,” Ryan said in a deep husky voice
and all eyes swung to him.
Ryan Oberoi, I repeated his name again mentally. Now here was a guy you don’t see in
IIT too often; tall, with spare height, purposefully lean and unfairly handsome. A loose gray
T-shirt proclaimed ‘GAP’ in big blue letters on his chest and shiny black shorts reached his
knees. Relatives abroad for sure, I thought. Nobody wears GAP to bed otherwise.
“You bastards,” Baku was shrieking, “Off with your clothes.”
“Aw Baku, let us talk to them a bit first,” protested Anurag, leaning against the wall,
sucking a cigarette butt.
“No talking!” Baku said, one scrawny hand up. “No talking, just remove those damn
clothes.”
Another demon grinned at us, slapping his bare stomach every few seconds. There
seemed to be no choice so we surrendered every item of our clothing, shivering at the
unholy glee in Baku’s face as he walked by each of us, checking us out and grinning.
Nakedness made the difference between our bodies more stark as Alok and me drew
figures on the floor with deeply embarrassed toes, trying to be casual about our twisted
balloon figures. Ryan’s body was flawless, man, he was a hunk; muscles that cut at the right
places and a body frame that for once resembled the human body shown in biology books.
You could describe his body as sculpture. Alok and I, on the other hand, weren’t exactly
what you’d call art.
Baku told Alok and me to step forward, so the seniors could have better view and a
bigger laugh.
“Look at them, mothers fed them until they are ready to explode, little Farex babies,”
Baku cackled.
The demon joined him in laughter. Anurag smiled behind a burst of smoke as he
extinguished another cigarette, creating his own special effects.
“Sir, please sir, let us go sir,” Alok pleaded to Baku as he came closer.
“What? Let you go? We haven’t even done anything yet to you beauties. C’mon bend
down on all fours now, you two fatsos.”
I looked at Alok’s face. His eyes were invisible behind those thick, bulletproof
spectacles, but going by his contorted face, I could tell he was as close to tears as I was.
“C’mon, do what he says,” the demon admonished. He and Baku seemed to share a
symbiotic relationship; Baku needed him for brute strength, while the servile demon needed
him for directions.
Alok and I bent down on all fours. More laughter, this time from above our heads, ensued.
The demon suggested racing both of us, his first original opinion in a while but Baku
overrode him.
“No racing-vacing, I have a better idea. Just wait, I have to go to my room. And you
naked cows, don’t look up.”
Baku raced up the corridor as we waited for twenty tense seconds, gazing at the floor. I
glanced sideways and noticed a small water puddle adjacent to Alok’s head, droplets
falling from his eye.
Meanwhile, the demon made Ryan flex his muscles and make warrior poses. I am sure he
looked photogenic, but didn’t dare look up to verify.
Our ears picked up Baku’s hurried steps as he returned.
“Look what I got,” he said, holding up his hands.
“Baku, what the hell is that for…?” Anurag enquired as we turned our heads up.
In each of his hands, Baku held an empty Coke bottle. “Take a wild guess,” he said as he
clanged the bottles together, making suggestive gestures.
Face turning harder, arms still in modelling pose, Ryan spoke abruptly, “Sir, what exactly
are you trying to do?”
“What, isn’t it obvious? And who the hell are you to ask me?” choked Baku.
“Sir, stop,” Ryan said, in a louder voice.
“Fuck off,” Baku dismissed, disbelief writ large in his widened eyes at this blatant
rebellion against his age-old authority.
As Baku put the bottles in position, Ryan abandoned his pin-up pose and jumped.
Catching him unawares, he grabbed the two bottles and stamped hard on Baku’s feet. Baku
released his hands and the bottles were with Ryan, James Bond style.
We knew that stomp hurt since Baku’s scream was ultrasonic.
“Get this bastard,” Baku shrieked in agony.
The demon’s IQ was clouded by the events but his ears registered the command for action
and he had just collected himself in response when Ryan smashed the two Coke bottles on
the balcony parapet. Each bottle now was butt-broken, and he waved the jagged ends in air.
“Come, you bastards,” Ryan swore, his face scarlet like a watermelon slice. Baku and the
demon retreated a few paces. Anurag, who had been smouldering in the backdrop, snapped
to attention. “Hey, cool it everyone here. How did this happen? What is your name - Ryan,
take it easy man. This is just fun.”
“It’s not fun for me,” growled Ryan, “Just get the hell out of here.”
Alok and I looked at each other. I was hoping Ryan knew what he was doing. I mean sure,
he was saving our ass from a Coke bottle, but broken Coke bottles could be a lot worse.
“Listen yaar,” Anurag started as Ryan cut him short.
“Just get lost,” Ryan shouted so hard that Baku seemed to blow away just from the
impact. Actually, he was shuffling backward slowly and steadily till he was almost flying in
his haste to get away, the demon following suit. Anurag stood there gaping at Ryan for a
while and then looked at us.
“Tell him to control himself. Or one day he will take you guys down too,” Anurag said.
Alok and I got up and wore our clothes.
“Thanks Ryan, I was really scared,” Alok said, as he removed his spectacles to wipe snot
and tears, face to face with his hero at last.
There is a reason why they say men should not cry, they just look so, like, ugly. Alok’s
spectacles were sad enough, but his baby-wet blubbery eyes were enough to depress you
into suicide.
“Yes, thanks Ryan, some risk you took there. That Baku guy is sick. Though you think they
would have done anything?” I said, striving for a cool I did not feel.
“Who knows? Maybe not,” Ryan rotated a shoulder, “But you can never tell when guys
get into mob mentality. Trust me, I have lived in enough boarding schools.”
Ryan’s heroics were enough to make us all bond faster than Fevicol. Besides, we were
hostelite neighbours and in the same engineering department. They say you should not get
into a relationship with people you sleep with on the first date. Well, though we hadn’t slept
together, we had seen each other naked at primary meet, so perhaps we should have
refrained from striking up a friendship. But our troika was kind of inevitable.
“M-A-C-H-I-N-E,” the blackboard proclaimed in big bold letters.
As we entered the amphitheatre-shaped lecture room, we grabbed a pile of handouts
each. The instructor sat next to the blackboard like a bloated beetle, watching us settle
down, waiting for the huddled murmurs to cease.
He appeared around forty years of age, with gray hair incandescent from three
tablespoons of coconut oil, wore an un-tucked light blue shirt and had positioned three pens
in his front pocket, along with chalks, like an array of bullets.
“Welcome everyone. I am Professor Dubey, Mechanical Engineering department…so,
first day in college. Do you feel special?” he said in a monotone.
The class remained silent. We were busy scanning our handouts and feeling like a herd.
The course was Manufacturing Processes, often shortened to ManPro for easier
pronunciation. The handouts consisted of the course outline. Contents covered the basic
techniques of manufacturing – such as welding, machining, casting, bending and shaping.
Along with the outline, the handout contained the grading pattern of the course.
Majors – 40%
Minors – 20%
Practicals – 20%
Assignments (6-8) and Surprise Quizzes (3-4) – 20%
Prof Dubey noticed the limp response to his greeting and made his voice more exuberant.
“Look at the handout later. Don’t worry, you will get enough of these, one for every course.
Put them aside now,” he said as he stood up and walked toward the blackboard.
He took out a chalk from his pocket with a flourish celluloid-terrorists reserved for handgrenades
and underlined the word ‘machine’ approximately six times. Then he turned to us.
“Machine, the basic reason for existence of any mechanical engineer. Everything you learn
finds application in machines. Now, can anyone tell me what a machine is?”
The class fell even more silent. That’s the first lesson: various degrees of silence.
“Anyone?” the professor asked again as he started walking through the rows of students.
As the students on the aisles felt even more stalked and avoided eye contact, I turned around
to study my new classmates. There must have been seventy of us in this class, three hundred
of us in a batch. I noticed a boy in front of me staring at the instructor intently, his head
moving to and fro, mouth ajar; a timid sort, whom Baku could polish off for snack any given
day.
“You,” Prof Dubey chose me as his first casualty.
It was the first time the condition struck me, where tongue cleaves unto dental roof, body
freezes, blood vessels rupture and sweat bursts out in buckets.
“You, I am talking to you,” the professor clarified.
“Hari, Hari..” somebody inside me called but could only get my answering machine. I
could have attempted an answer, or at least a silly ‘I don’t know’ but it was as if my mouth
was AWOL.
“Strange,” surmised Prof Dubey dubiously as he moved to another student.
“You in the check shirt. What do you think?”
Check Shirt had hitherto been pretending to take notes to escape the professor’s glance.
“Sir, Machine sir…is a device…like big parts…sir like big gears and all…”
“What?” Prof Dubey’s disgust fell like spit on Check Shirt. “See, the standard just keeps
falling every year. Our admission criteria are just not strict enough.” He shook his oiled
skull, the one that contained all the information in this planet, including the definition of
machines.
“Yeah, right. Busted my butt for two years for this damn place. One in hundred is not
good enough for them,” Ryan whispered to me.
“Shshh,” ordered Prof Dubey, looking at the three of us, “anyway, the definition of a
machine is simple. It is anything that reduces human effort. Anything. So, see the world
around you and it is full of machines.”
Anything that reduces human effort, I repeated in my head. Well, that sounded simple
enough.
“So, from huge steel mills, to simple brooms, man has invented so much to reduce human
effort,” the professor continued, as he noticed the class was mesmerized by his simple
clarification.
“Airplane?” said one student in the front row.
“Machine,” instructor said.
“Stapler,” suggested another.
“Machine.”
It really was amazing. A spoon, car, blender, knife, chair – students threw examples at the
professor and there was only one answer – machine.
“Fall in love with the world around you,” Prof Dubey smiled for the first time, “for you
will become the masters of machines.”
A feeling of collective joy darted through the class for having managed to convert Prof
Dubey’s sour expression into smiles.
“Sir, what about a gym machine, like a bench press or something?” Ryan interrupted the
bonhomie.
“What about it?” Prof Dubey stopped beaming.
“That doesn’t reduce human effort. In fact, it increases it.”
The class fell silent again.
“Well, I mean…” Prof Dubey said as he scouted for arguments.
Boy, did Ryan really have a point?
“Perhaps it is too simple a definition then?” Ryan said in a pseudo-helpful voice.
“What are you trying to do?” the professor asked tight-lipped as he came close to us
again, “Are you saying that I am wrong?”
“No sir, I’m just…”
“Watch it son. In my class, just watch it,” was all Prof Dubey said as he moved to the
front.
“Okay, enough fun. Now, let us focus on ManPro,” he said as he rubbed off the word
‘machine’ from the blackboard and the six underlines below it, “my course is very
important. I am sure many professors will tell you about their courses. But I care about
ManPro. So, don’t miss class, finish your assignments and be prepared, a surprise quiz can
drop from the sky at any time.”
He went on to tackle casting, one of the oldest methods of working with metal. After an
hour on how iron melts and foundry workers pour it into sand moulds, he ended the session.
“That is it for today. Best of luck once again for your stay here. Remember, as your head
of department Prof Cherian says, the tough workload is by design, to keep you on your toes.
And respect the grading system. You get bad grades, and I assure you – you get no job, no
school and no future. If you do well, the world is your oyster. So, don’t slip, not even once,
or there will be no oyster, just slush.”
A shiver ran through all of us as with that quote the professor slammed the duster on the
desk and walked away in a cloud of chalk.
2
—
Terminator
THEY SAY TIME FLIES WHEN YOU ARE HAVING FUN. IN THE first semester alone,
with six courses, four of them with practical classes, time dragged so slow and comatose,
fun was conspicuous by its absence. Every day, from eight to five, we were locked in the
eight-storey insti-building with lectures, tutorials and labs. The next few hours of the
evening were spent in the library or in our rooms as we prepared reports and finished
assignments. And this did not even include the tests! Each subject had two minor tests, one
major and three surprise quizzes; seven tests for six courses meant forty-two tests per
semester, mathematically speaking. Luckily, the professors spared us surprise quizzes in the
first month, citing ragging season and the settling-in period of course; but the ragging season
ended soon and it meant a quiz could happen any time. In ever y class we had to look out for
instructor’s subtle hints about a possible quiz in the next class.
Meanwhile, I got better acquainted with Ryan and Alok. Ryan’s dad had this handicraft
business that was essentially a sweatshop for potters that made vases for the European
market. Ryan’s father and mother were both intimately involved in the business and their
regular travel meant Ryan stayed in boarding school, a plush colonial one in hill-town
Mussoorie.
Alok’s family, I guess, was of limited means, which is just a polite way of saying he was
poor. His mother was the only earning member, and last I heard, schoolteachers didn’t
exactly hit dirt on pay-day. Besides, half her salary regularly went to support her husband’s
medical treatment. At the same time, Alok’s elder sister was getting near what he mournfully
called ‘marriageable age’, another cause of major worry for his household. Going by Alok’s
looks I guess she wasn’t breathtakingly beautiful either.
I also got familiar with Kumaon and other wing-mates. I won’t go into all of them, but in
one corner there was Sukhwinder or the ‘Happy Surd’since his face broke into sunny smiles
at proximity with anything remotely human. Next to him was the studious Venkat, who
coated his windows with thick black paper and stayed locked inside alone. There was
‘Itchy’ Rajesh whose hands were always scratching some part of his body, sometimes in
objectionable places. On the other side of the hallway were seniors’ rooms, including Baku,
Anurag and other animals.
Ryan, Alok and I often studied together in the evenings. One month into the first semester,
we were sitting in my room chasing a quanto-physics assignment deadline.
“Damn,” Ryan said as he got up his easy chair to stretch his spectacular spine. “What a
crazy week; classes, assignments, more classes, assignments and not to mention the comingattraction
quizzes. You call this a life?”
Alok sat on the study desk, focused on the physics assignment, head bent down and
sideways, just two inches above his sheet. He always writes this way, head near the sheet,
pen pressed tight between his fingers, his white worksheets reflected on his thick glasses.
“Wha...” Alok looked up, sounding retarded.
“I said you call this a life?” Ryan asked, this time looking at me.
I was sitting on the bed cross-legged, attempting the assignment on a drawing board. I
needed a break, so I put my pen down.
“Call it what you want,” I said, words stifled by a Titanic yawn, “but that is not going to
change it.”
“I think this is jail. It really is. Damn jail,” Ryan said, hitting the peeling wall with a fist.
“Maybe you’re forgetting that you’re in IIT, the best college in the country,” Alok said,
cracking knuckles.
“So? You put students in jail?” Ryan asked, hands on hips.
“No. But you expect a certain standard,” Alok said, putting his hand up to indicate height.
“This is high standard? Working away like moronic drones until midnight. ManPro
yesterday, ApMech day before, Quanto today…it never ends,” Ryan grumbled. “I need a
break, man. Anyone for a movie?”
“And what about the assignment?” Alok blinked.
“Priya has Terminator on,” Ryan beguiled.
“Then when will we sleep?” Alok said.
“You are one real muggu eh?” Ryan said indulgently to him.
“I’ll go,” I said, keeping my drawing board aside, “come Alok, we’ll do it later.”
“It will get late, man,” Alok warned half-heartedly.
I stood up and took his pen, put it into his geometry box. Yes, Alok had a geometry box,
like he was about twelve years old.
“Come get up,” I said when I noticed two paintbrushes in his box. “Hey, what are the
paintbrushes for?”
“Nothing,” Alok mumbled.
I lifted the brushes, painting imaginary arcs in air. “Then why do you have them? To give
colour to your circuit diagrams?” I laughed at my own joke, waving the brushes in the air.
“Or to express your soul in the ManPro class? To draw Prof Dubey’s frowny face?”
“No. Actually, they are my father’s. He was an artist, but he’s paralyzed now.”
There are times in life you wish dinosaurs weren’t extinct and could be whistled to come
and gulp you down. I went motionless, fingers in mid-air.
Ryan saw my face and pressed his teeth together to be simultaneously tch-tch sympathetic
to Alok and stop laughing at me. “Really Alok? That’s really sad. I’m sorry man,” he said,
putting his hand around Alok’s shoulder. The bastard, scoring over me for no fault of mine.
“It’s okay. It was a long while ago. We are used to him like that now,” Alok said, finally
getting up for the movie while I was still hoping I’d evaporate.
When we walked out, Ryan was with Alok, me trailing six steps behind.
“Well, I have lived in boarding school all my life, so I can’t really understand. But it must
be pretty difficult for you. I mean how did you manage?” Ryan continued.
“Barely managed actually. My mother is a biology teacher. That was the only income.
Elder sister is still in college.”
I nodded my head, trying desperately to evince how empathetic to his cause I was, too.
“How do you think I got into IIT? I was taking care of him for the past two years,” Alok
said.
“Really?” I said, finally getting my chance to get into the conversation.
“Yes, every day after school I was nursing him and reading my books.”
Ryan had a scooter, which made it easy for us to get to Priya. It was illegal for three
people to ride together in a triple sandwich, but cops rarely demanded more than twenty
bucks if they stopped you. Chances of getting caught were less than one in ten, so Ryan said
it was still cheap on a probability weighted basis.
Priya cinema at night was a completely different world from our quiet campus. Families,
couples and groups of young people lined up to catch the hit movie of the season. We bought
front row tickets, as Alok did not want to spend too much. Personally, I think he was just too
blind to sit far away. In any case, the movie was science fiction, which I should have
guessed given Ryan’s choice; he always picked sci-fi movies. I hate sci-fi movies, but who
asks me? This one had time travel, human robots, laser guns, the works, presented in an
unfunny way. In ten minutes, the obscenely muscular hero’s heroics looked too silly to even
smirk at, and I was yawning uncontrollably.
“Wow!” Ryan said, bringing his hand to his face as the villain launched a torpedo from
his backpack.
“What the hell do you see in these movies?” I whispered, just to jack his trip.
“Man, look at all those gadgets.”
“But they’re all fake. It is fiction.”
“Yes, but we could have them one day.”
“Time travel? You really think we could have time travel?” Ryan’s ridiculous when he
gets excited.
“Hush, it’s hard enough to understand the accent guys,” Alok objected.
When we returned to Kumaon at midnight, our asses were set on fire, I mean not literally,
but everyone from Venkat to Sukhwinder were running around with notepads and textbooks.
“Surprise quiz. Strong rumour of one in ApMech,” Happy Surd explained as he furiously
riffled through his notes, for once not electrified at our company.
ApMech was Applied Mechanics, and apparently, some student in Nilgiri hostel had
visited the professor’s office in the evening to submit a late assignment. The professor had
sinisterly advised to “keep revising your notes”, waggling left eyebrow at the same time.
Enough to ring the alarm as news travelled through the campus like wildfire.
“Damn. Now we have to study for ApMech. It will take hours,” Alok said morosely.
“And we have the Quanto assignment to finish as well,” I reminded.
Everyone gathered in my room to study. It was at two in the morning that Alok spoke.
“This whole movie thing was a dumb idea, I told you.”
“How was I to know? Anyway, why are you taking arbit tension?” Ryan took offence.
“It is not arbit. It’s relative grading here, so if we don’t study and others do, we are
screwed,” Alok said, stressing the last word so hard even Ryan was startled.
Just then, a mouse darted out from under my bed.
“Did you see that?” Ryan said, eager to change the topic. He removed his slippers,
hoping to take aim and strike the rodent down. However, the rodent had other ideas on his
own demise and dived diplomatically back under the bed.
“Yes, there are these creepy mice in my room. Little bastards,” I said, almost
affectionately.
“You want me to kill them for you?” Ryan offered.
“It’s not that easy. They are too smart and quick,” I said.
“Challenge?” Ryan said.
“I beg you brothel-borns, not now. Can we please study?” Alok said, literally folding his
hands. The guy is too dramatic.
Ryan eased back into the chair and wore his footwear. He opened the ApMech book and
exhaled deep through his mouth.
“Yes sir, let us mug and cram. Otherwise, how will we become great engineers of this
great country,” Ryan mock-sighed.
“Shut up,” Alok said, his face already immersed in his workbook.
Ryan did shut up after that, even though he kept bending to look under the bed from time to
time. I was sure he wanted to get at least one mouse, but the little creatures smartly
maintained a low profile. We finished our Quanto assignment in an hour and then revised the
ApMech notes until five, by which time Ryan was snoring soundly, I was struggling to stay
awake and even Alok’s eyes had started watering. We still had around a third of the course
left, but it was necessar y to catch some sleep. Besides, the quiz was only a rumour, we did
not know if it would actually materialize.
But rumours, especially ugly ones, have a way of coming true. Thirty minutes into the
ApMech class, Prof Sen locked the door and opened his black briefcase. “Time for some
fun. Here is a quickie quiz of multiple choice questions,” he said.
Prof Sen passed the handouts to the front row students, who in turn cascaded them
backward. Everyone in class knew about the rumour, and the quiz was as much a surprise as
snow in Siberia. I took the question sheet and glanced over the questions. Most of them
were from recent lectures, the part of the course we could not revise.
“Crap. We never got to the lectures for question five onward,” I whispered to Alok.
“We are screwed. Let’s get screwed in silence at least,” he said as he placed his head in
his ‘study’ position, left cheek almost touching the answer sheet.
We never discussed the quiz upon our return to Kumaon that day. Other students were
talking animatedly about some questions being out of course. Obviously, we never finished
the course, so we did not know better. We did not have to wait for results too long either.
Prof Sen distributed the answer sheets in class two days later.
“Five? I got a five out of twenty,” I said to Alok, who sat next to me in class.
“I got seven. Damn it, seven,” Alok said.
“I have three. How about that? One, two, three,” Ryan said, counting on his fingers.
Prof Sen wrote the customary summary scores on the blackboard.
Average: 11/20
High: 17/20
Low: 3/20
He kept those written for a few minutes, before proceeding with his lecture on cantilever
beams.
“I have the lowest. Did you see that?” Ryan whispered to me, unmoved by cantilever
beams. It was hard to figure out what he was feeling at this point. Even though he was trying
to stay calm and expressionless, I could tell he was having trouble digesting his result. He
re-read his quiz, it did not change the score.
Alok was in a different orbit. His face looked like it had on ragging day. He viewed the
answer sheet like he had the coke bottle, an expression of anxiety mixed with sadness. It’s in
these moments that Alok is most vulnerable, you nudge him just a little bit and you know
he’d cry. But for now, the quiz results were a repulsive enough sight.
I saw my own answer sheet. The instructor had written my score in big but careless
letters, like graffiti written with contempt. Now I am no Einstein or anything, but this never
happened to me in school. My score was five on twenty, or twenty-five per cent; I had never
in my life scored less than three times as much. Ouch, the first quiz in IIT hurt.
But take Ryan’s scores. I wondered if it had been worth it for him to even study last night.
I was two points ahead of him, or wait a minute, sixty-six per cent ahead of him, that made
me feel better. Thank god for relative misery!
Alok had the highest percentage amongst the three of us, but I could tell he did not find
solace in our misery. He saw his score, and he saw the average on the board. I saw his face,
twisting every time he saw his wrong answers.
We kept our answer sheets, the proof of our underperformance, in our bags and strolled
back to Kumaon. We met at dinner in the mess. The food was insipid as usual, and Alok
wrinkled his pug nose as he dispiritedly plopped a thick blob of green substance messworkers
called bhindi masala into his plate. He slammed two rotis on his stainless steel
plate and ignored the rest of the semi-solid substances like dal, raita and pulao. Ryan and I
took everything; though everything tasted the same, we could at least have some variety of
colors on our plate.
Alok finally brought up the topic of the quiz at the dinner table.
“So, now you don’t have anything to say?”
Ryan and I looked at each other.
“Say what?” I said.
“That how crap this is,” Alok said.
“The food?” I said, fully aware Alok meant otherwise.
“No damn it! Not the damn food,” Alok said, “The ApMech quiz.” His expression
changed from the usual tragic one to a livelier angry one. I found that expression marginally
more pleasant to look at and easier to deal with.
“What about the quiz? We’re screwed. What is to discuss in that?” Ryan simplified.
“Oh really. We are screwed, no damn doubt in that,” Alok said.
I think Alok picks up a word and uses it too much, which ruins the effect. There were too
many ‘damns’ in his dialogue.
“Then drop it. Anyway, you got the highest amongst us. So, be happy.”
“Happy? Yes, I am happy. The average is eleven, and someone got seventeen. And here I
am, at damn seven. Yes, I am happy my damn Terminator ass,” Alok scoffed.
I told you, Alok ruins the effect. I wanted to tell him that he should stop ‘damn’ right now
but something told me he would not appreciate the subtleties of cursing right now.
“What? What did you just say?” Ryan said, keeping his spoon down on the plate, “Did
you say Terminator?”
“Yes. It was a stupid idea. Your stupid damn idea,” Alok said.
Ryan froze. He looked at Alok as if he was speaking in foreign tongue. Then he turned
toward me. “You heard what he said? Hari, you heard? This is unbelievable man.”
I had heard Alok, nothing being the matter with my eardrums but I wasn’t paying attention
to anything apart from keeping count of the ‘damns’.
“Hari, you think I screwed up the quiz?” Ryan asked slowly.
I looked at Alok’s and Ryan’s faces in quick succession. “Ryan, you got three. You still
need me to tell you that you screwed up?” I counter-questioned, mediating on something I
did not understand yet.
“No. I mean Alok is saying I screwed up the quiz for both of you because I took you to the
movie. You think so or…?”
“That is not what I said…” Alok interrupted even as Ryan raised his hand to indicate
silence.
I understood Ryan’s question now, but I did not know how to answer it, without taking
sides.
“But how does that….”
“No, Hari tell me. Is that what you expect your best friends to say?” Ryan asked.
“It is not important. And besides, you did not drag us forcibly to see that crap movie,” I
said, reminding myself to never see sci-fi again.
Ryan was satisfied with the answer. He relaxed his raised hand and smiled, “See, there
you go.”
“But Alok is right too. We should have a limit on the fun factor. You can’t screw with the
system too much, it comes back to screw you – the quiz is an example.”
“Thank you sir,” Alok said, “That is exactly what I am saying.”
Cool, I had managed to come out clean in this one. Sometimes, if you just paraphrase
everyone’s arguments, you get to be the good guy.
3
—
Barefoot on Metal
THE QUIZ MISHAP REINVIGORATED OUR COMMITMENT TO studies for a while.
Ryan was quieter when we studied in the rooms, controlling his urge to discuss emergency
topics ranging from movies to food to new sci-fi movies, leading to more productive study
sessions. Though our scores moved closer to class average, assignments can get dull as hell
after a while, and you need a break. Ryan often dozed off between assignments, or stared
unseeingly at the wall, whispering curses frequently every time he opened a new book.
“Okay then,” he sighed one day, stapling his assignment. “I have finished today’s crap.
You guys going to mug more or what?”
“Why are you always calling this crap?” Alok asked, perplexed.
“Take a wild guess,” Ryan said, tossing his assignment on the table like a used tissue.
“But why?” Alok said, “I mean, surely you studied a lot to get into IIT right?”
“Yes, but frankly, this place has let me down. This isn’t exactly the cutting edge of
science and technology as they describe themselves, is it?”
I closed my book to join in the conversation. “Boss, mugging is the price one pays to get
the IIT tag. You mug, you pass and you get job. What let-down are you talking about?”
“That is the problem, there is this stupid system and there are stupid people like you.”
I hate Ryan. When he is on his own trip, we all turn stupid.
“Continuous mugging, testing and assignments. Where is the time to try out new ideas?
Just sit all day and get fat like Hari.”
Ryan doesn’t like mugging, therefore, I am stupid and fat. People like him think they are
god’s gifts to the world. What’s worse, they are.
“I don’t have any new ideas. And I am not that fat, am I?” I said turning to Alok. Looking
at him I instantly felt better.
“Fatso, look into a mirror. You should do something about it.”
“It is genetic, saw a TV documentary once,” I defended weakly.
“Genetic, my ass. I can make you lose ten kilos like that.” He snapped his fingers.
I did not know where Ryan was going with this, but it could not have been pleasant for
me. Being fat was more appealing to me than running behind the insti bus or climbing the
stairs of these buildings fifty times a day. “Ryan, forget about me. If you don’t want to mug,
should we go to the canteen for a parantha?”
“Boss, this is the problem – all food and no exercise. I’ve decided, Hari has to go on an
exercise routine,” Ryan said, jumping up. “We start tomorrow morning then.”
Ryan decided for other people. I don’t know if it was his good looks or just his goodnatured
vanity that you didn’t want to prick, but mostly he got away with it.
“Wait Ryan, what the…” I began.
“Actually, Alok you should come, too. Interested?”
“Go to hell,” Alok muttered as he dived back into his books like a squirrel with a nut.
I thought about losing ten kilos. All my life people had called me Fat-Man, to the point
where plumpness was part of my identity now. Of course, I hated that part of my identity and
Ryan did seem to know what he was doing, and his own body was great. Heck, I thought, it
was worth a try.
“What do I have to do?” I capitulated.
“Early morning jogs around the whole campus, around four kilometers.”
No way, I can’t even walk four kilometers,” I dismissed.
“You wimp, at least try. You’ll feel great afterwards,” Ryan said.
Sure enough, Ryan mercilessly kicked at my door at five a.m. sharp the next morning. I
hate Ryan. Anyway, I opened the door and he stood there waiting for me to change into Tshirt
and shorts.
“Four kilometers?” I was drowsy and pitiful at the same time.
“Try, just try,” Ryan enthused.
It was still dark outside when I left Kumaon. I was happy for that small mercy – no one
would see an eighty-kilo globe-shaped creature bouncing along the road. To do the fourkilometer
route meant reaching the other end of campus, past the hostels, sports grounds,
insti building and the faculty housing. I thought I could cheat and cut corners, but I wanted to
give Ryan a chance, not that I hated him any less for it.
My entire body groaned as muscles I never knew existed made themselves known. In ten
minutes, I was panting like a trekker on Mount Everest without oxygen, and in fifteen, I felt a
heart attack coming on. I panted for a few minutes and started again till I passed the insti
building and was in the faculty-housing colony.
Dawn broke, revealing manicured lawns and picture postcard bungalows of our
tormentors in class. I passed Prof Dubey’s house. It was hard to imagine this man out of
class, living in a home, watching TV, peeing, eating at a dining table. By now, I was wet
with sweat and my face beyond red, reaching rare shades of purple.
I stopped, huffing and puffing, when I went bump at the knees. Stumbling at the
unexpected impact, I kind of whooshed forward, extending my hands just in time to save
myself from a bad fall. I sat stunned on the road, recovering from the shock and
breathlessness, and then turned around.
A red Maruti car was the culprit! I continued panting as I squinted my eyes to see the
driver through the windscreen. Who was trying to kill me when I was already dying? I
wondered, waiting for my breath to return to normal.
“I am so-so sorry,” a female voice announced. A young girl, around my age, in a loose Tshirt
and knee-length shorts, clothes that one usually wore at home. She skipped forward in
a silly way, which was probably her attempt to run toward me. I noticed she was barefoot.
“I am so sorry. Are you all right?” she enquired, tucking her hair behind an ear.
I was not all right, and it was her damn fault. But when a young girl asks a guy if he is all
right, he can never admit he is not.
“Yeah. I guess,” I said, flexing my palms.
“Can I give you a lift?” she asked nervously, extending a hand to help me up.
I looked at her carefully as she came closer. Maybe I was seeing a female after a long
time or something, but I thought she was really pretty. And the whole just-out-of-the-bed
look blew me. Only girls can look hot in their nightclothes: Alok, for instance, looks like a
terminally ill patient in his torn vest and pajamas.
“I was actually jogging,” I said, holding her hand and getting up as slowly as I could
without being obvious. Who wants to abandon a pretty girl’s hand? Anyway, I had to after I
was standing up.
“Hi. I am Neha by the way. Listen, I am really sorry,” she said, adjusting her hair again
with the hand I had just held.
“Hi. I am Hari, still alive so it is okay,” I grinned.
“Yeah, you see I am learning to drive,” she said pointing to the ‘L’ sign on the
windscreen. That is understandable, I thought, you are allowed to hit people if you are
learning to drive, especially if you are eye-candy.
Now to be very frank, I wasn’t hurt or anything. For one thing, she was driving at like two
kilometers an hour, and I think my adipose tissues absorb bumps better than most people’s.
Still, I wanted to milk this moment.
“You sure you don’t need a lift? I feel really bad,” she said, wringing her hands.
“Actually, I am sort of tempted to get a drop back to Kumaon,” I said.
“Sure. Please come in,” she said and chuckled, “if you trust my driving, that is.”
We got into the car. I saw her sit carefully in the driver’s seat, as if she was running the
starship Enterprise or something. Then she placed her bare foot on the accelerator. Now
maybe it is because I am an engineer, but that was hot. Bare female skin on metal is
enormously sexy. There was dark red nail polish on her toenails, with one or two toes
encircled in weird squiggly silver ringlets that only girls can justify wearing. I just wanted
to keep looking at her feet but she started to talk.
“Kumaon hostel, so a student, eh?”
“Yes. First year, mechanical engineering.”
“Cool. So how are you finding it, college and everything? Fun?”
“Nothing much, just running around to keep up all the time.”
“So you have to study a lot? What do guys call it – mugging.”
“Yeah, we have to mug. Some damn profs get this vicious joy driving students nuts….”
“My dad is a prof,” Neha said.
“Really?” I said and almost jumped in my seat. I was lucky I did not fully express my
insightful views on professors and I was hoping she was not Prof Dubey’s daughter.
“Yes, I live in faculty housing,” she said. The car had passed the housing blocks now, and
we were nearing the insti building.
“And that is my dad’s office,” she said, pointing to one of the dozens of rooms.
“Really?” I said again, my mind racing flashback to gauge if I had done anything that
could get me into trouble. “What’s his name?” I asked casually.
“Prof Cherian. You probably don’t know him, he won’t take a course until your third
year.”
I shook my head. I had heard the name, but never seen Prof Cherian. Then I remembered
our first class. “Is he the head of the Mechanical Engineering department?” I said, looking
austerely away from her feet.
Sensing my anxiety, she patted my arm while shifting into third gear. “Yes, he is. But don’t
be tense, he is the prof, not me. So relax.” She burst out laughing as if she knew of my
fascination with her feet.
We chatted for a few more minutes along the insti-hostel road. She told me about her
college, where she was studying fashion design. She had lived in this campus for over ten
years and knew most of the professors.
She apologized again when we came near Kumaon, and asked if she could do anything for
me.
“No, it is all fine really,” I reassured her.
“Sure Hari? So will I see you again when you jog?”
“I guess,” I said, dreading another round of Ryan’s training.
“Great. Maybe sometime, I can drive you to the deer park outside campus, lots of joggers
there. And you get excellent morning tea snacks there. I owe you a treat,” she said.
I was nervous at meeting the daughter of my head of department again. But her offer, and
mostly she herself, was too irresistible.
“That sounds great,” I said leaping out of the car, “free food is always welcome. Keep
bumping me.”
She smiled, waved and the little red car disappeared from sight. Her image still floated
in my head as I reached the Kumaon lawns. Ryan was already waiting there, doing push-ups
or pull-downs or something. He had seen me get out of the car and demanded full
explanation. I had to then repeat it to Alok. Though they exhibited appropriate excitement,
asking me how she looked and everything, they also told me to stay away from her, given
she was a prof ’s offspring.
But they had neither seen her nor talked to her. I was dying to meet her again, was waiting
for the next time I bumped into her and could feast silly at the sight of those two bare-naked
feet!
4
—
Line Drawing
BANG IN THE MIDDLE OF THE FIRST SEMESTER CAME Ryan’s scooter. His parents
sent him a dollar cheque as a Christmas gift as everybody else around them was doing in
Europe. Ryan was not a Christian and cared two hoots about Christmas, but loved the
cheque and cashed it; voila scooter – a beautiful Kinetic Honda in gleaming metallic blue.
When Ryan got it to Kumaon, all the students gathered around it to pay homage, but only
Alok and I got to park our butts on it. It was for two people, but Ryan carried both of us; we
went to class, canteen and on rare occasions to movies like the Terminator zipping away on
Ryan’s Kinetic, letting the world watch us in envy and the scooter in probable pity, groaning
as it was under our combined weight.
Meanwhile, classes got worse. The professors kept up the pressure and the overworked
students worked even harder to beat the average, thereby pushing the average higher. We
still studied together, but the resolve to concentrate was breaking down. We had managed to
reach average grades in a few assignments, but in physics we had messed up.
One night Alok got a call from home. His father had had a seizure or something and
someone had to take him to the hospital pronto. Alok’s mother had never done this alone and
she sounded hysterical enough to warrant a trip for herself to the hospital.
There was a strong rumour of a physics quiz circulating but Alok had no choice. Ryan
offered his scooter, which Alok couldn’t drive for nuts. Hence Ryan had to go as well. I did
not want to be alone, so I went along.
It was the first time I’d seen Alok’s home. I told you he was kind of poor, I mean not
World Bank ads type starving poor or anything, but his home had the barest minimum one
would need for existence. There was light, but no lampshades, there was a living room, but
no couches, there was a TV, but not a colour one. The living room was where lived Alok’s
father, entertaining himself with one of the two TV channels, close to unconscious by the
time we reached. Alok’s mother was already waiting, using her sari edge to wipe her tears.
“Alok, my son, look what happens when you are not here,” she said in a pathetic voice
that would make even Hitler cry. Man, I could totally see where Alok got his whining talent.
Anyway, I hired an auto and Ryan and Alok lifted the patient into it. We then went to the
hospital, checked him in and waited until a doctor, unfortunate enough to work in an
overcrowded free government hospital, saw Alok’s father. We returned to Kumaon at three
in the morning exhausted and nauseated by hospital smells.
Of course, you can imagine what happened the next day, the physics quiz, that’s what
happened and we screwed up big time. We got like two on twenty or some such miserable
score. Alok tried to ask the professor for a re-quiz, who stared back as if he had been asked
for both his kidneys.
That physics quiz episode broke Alok a bit. Now he was less vigilant when Ryan
distracted us from studies.
“You know guys, this whole IIT system is sick,” Ryan declared.
“There he goes again,” I rolled my eyes. We were in my room.
I expected Alok to ignore Ryan, but this time he led him on with a monosyllable. “Why?”
“Because, tell me, how many great engineers or scientists have come out of IIT?”
“What do you mean? Many CEOs and entrepreneurs have,” I said, a mistake as Ryan had
not finished yet.
“I mean this is supposed to be the best college in India, the best technology institute for a
country of a billion. But has IIT ever invented anything? Or made any technical contribution
to India?”
“Doesn’t it contribute in making engineers?” Alok asked, snapping shut his book. I knew
that with Alok not keeping us in check, we were not going to study any more that day. I
suggested we go out to Sasi’s for paranthas and skip the mess dinner. Everyone agreed.
Ryan continued to muse. “Over thirty years of IITs, yet, all it does is train some bright
kids to work in multinationals. I mean look at MIT in the USA.”
“This is not the USA,” I said, signalling Sasi’s minions to bring three plates of paranthas.
“MITs have budgets of millions of dollars.”
“And anyway, who cares, I want to get the degree and land a good job,” Alok said.
Sasi’s was a ramshackle, illegal roadside establishment right outside the IIT hostel gates.
Using tents and stools, the alfresco dining menu included paranthas, lemonade and
cigarettes. At two rupees each, the butter paranthas were a bargain, even by student
standards. Proprietor Sasi knew the quality of food in the mess and did a voluminous
business serving dozens of students each day from every hostel. We got three plates of
paranthas, and the dollop of butter on top melted and produced a delicious aroma.
“See, it is not always the money,” Ryan said, flicking ash. “So IITs cannot do space
research, but we surely can make some cheaper products? And frankly, money is just an
excuse. If there is value, the industry will pay for research even at IIT.”
“So what the hell is wrong then?” I was irritated. I seriously wanted Ryan to shut up, now
that the food was here. I mean, if he did not want to study, fine, but spare us the bloody
lecture, it wreaks havoc on digestion.
“What is wrong is the system,” Ryan denounced soundly, sounding like a local politician.
Blame the whole damn system if you can’t figure anything out.
But Ryan had more. “This system of relative grading and overburdening the students. I
mean it kills the best fun years of your life. But it kills something else. Where is the room
for original thought? Where is the time for creativity? It is not fair.”
“What about it is not fair? It gets me work, that’s all I care,” Alok shrugged, taking a
break from devouring his rations.
“Wow, that rhymes,” I said.
“See your attitude is another problem. You won’t get it, forget it,” Ryan said.
“That rhymes too,” I said and Alok and I broke into giggles. I knew I was annoying Ryan
like hell, but I really wanted him to shut up or at least change the topic. That lazy bastard
would find any reason to goof off.
“Screw you,” Ryan gestured, diving back to his plate.
“Anyway,” I said, “so what is the plan for the weekend?”
“Nothing, why?” Alok looked up.
“Well, we have the scooter now.”
Ryan stayed silent.
“Hey, stop sulking like a woman.” I nudged his elbow until he had to laugh.
“Yes, we can go, you dope. Connaught Place?”
“Why?” Alok repeated.
“Well, they have this cheap dhabha there with the best butter chicken and we can catch a
good Hindi movie. And then maybe check out some girls in the market.” Ryan’s eyes were
exaggeratedly lecherous.
“Sounds good,” I said, the mention of girls making me think of Neha. I had not bumped
into her again, maybe I should go jogging again.
“Alok, you’ll come too, right? Or will you mug all day?”
“Uh..there is this ApMech worksheet…anyway, screw it man…yes, I will come,” Alok
capitulated.
We did go to Connaught Place that weekend and had quite a blast. The movie was what
every Hindi movie is like – regular boy meets girl, boy is poor and honest, girl’s dad is rich
and a crook. However, the heroine was new and eager to please the crowds so she bathed in
the rain, played tennis in mini-skirts and wore sequined negligees to discos. Since all her
hobbies involved wearing less or transparent clothing, the audience loved her. The girl’s
father damn near killed the boy who flirted with his hot daughter, but ultimately the hero’s
love and lust prevailed. The hero had no damn assignments to finish and no freaky profs
breathing down his neck. I know, these Hindi movies are all crap, but they do kind of take
your mind away from the crap of real life like nothing else.
After movie came lunch. The dhabha was great as Ryan is never wrong about these
things. He ordered for everyone, which he always does. And he orders big – right from
boneless butter chicken to daal to paranthas to raita. The spoilt brat even orders the
overpriced Coke, I mean, which student orders Coke in restaurants? Anyway, the meal was
great, and an overactive desert-cooler sprayed water on our faces and kept the ambience
cool.
Tearing his rotis like a famished Unicef kid, Alok got chatty. “This is too good man, the
chicken is fundoo here.”
“So tell me, Fatso, did you have fun today or not?” Ryan asked.
“Uh-huh,” said Alok, mouth too stuffed with food, but he meant yes.
“Then tell me, why the hell do you want to kill yourself with books?”
“Aw, don’t you guys start arguing again,” I groaned. I had enjoyed my day so far and
watching these jokers go at it is really not funny after a while.
“We are not arguing,” Ryan said, in a tone that sounded like he was arguing with me now.
He took a deep breath. “Okay, here is the thing. I have been thinking.”
Oh please, spare us, I thought. But it was too late.
“Guys, these are the best years of our life. They really are. I mean, especially for
someone like Alok.”
“What, why specially me?” Alok was baffled, nibbling at a chilli from the salad bowl.
“It brings out the amino acids in your eyes,” I joked, when he coughed at the tangy
spiciness.
“Because,” Ryan told Alok, “look at your life before this. I mean, I know you love your
dad and everything. But like, you were just nursing him and studying for the past two years.
And after college, you’ll probably have to live with them again, right?”
“I’ll take up a job in Delhi,” Alok nodded, a bit more serious now, though his mind was
still preoccupied with chicken breast.
“Exactly, so it is back to the same responsibility again. I mean, you will earn and
everything, and maybe hire a servant. But still, would you be able to have this kind of fun?”
“I love my parents, Ryan, it is not a responsibility,” Alok said and stopped eating. Boy,
this must have affected him. Usually, the Fatso will not leave chicken for his life.
“Of course, you love them,” Ryan waved a hand. “I mean, I can understand that even
though I don’t love my parents.”
“What?” I said, though I had not wanted to be part of their argument.
“I said I don’t love my parents. Is that a big deal?”
Alok raised his eyebrows at me. I mean, if Alok could love his dad, who if you think
about it, is no more than a vegetable with vision, how could this brat not love his parents?
And his parents were nice, I mean they gave him everything - the blue scooter, clothes from
Gap and money for the damn colas at restaurants. His parents had worked their asses off all
their lives, started selling flower pots with two potters, and then moved all over India to
make a name until two years ago when they went overseas. They weren’t making any big
money out there yet but wanted to keep sonny boy happy, this spoilt, pigheaded, marginally
good-looking ass who did not love them!
“Screw you,” I blessed.
“Screw you! You don’t even listen to me,” Ryan said.
Yeah right, that when I listened to this idiot all the time.
“Why?” Alok said, getting back to his food.
“I don’t know why. I mean, I have been in boarding school when I was six. Of course,
like every kid I hated it and cried when they left me. But then, it was at boarding school I
got everything. I did well in studies, got noticed in sports, learnt how to have fun and live
well and made my best friends. So, somewhere down the line, I don’t miss them anymore.
Just kind of outgrew them. Sure, we meet at vacation time and they send letters, cash, and
everything but...”
“But?”
“But I don’t miss them.”
“So you don’t think that is wrong?” Alok picked teeth.
“Heck, no. I mean, for me my friends are everything, they are my family. Mom and Dad
are nice, but I don’t love them the way I love my friends. I mean, I don’t love them, but I
love my friends.”
“So you love us then Ryan aah? I love you,” Alok said in a falsetto; he was obviously
satiated, his lighter mood a proof of his post-gluttony bonhomie.
“Up yours, Fatso, love you my ass,” Ryan said and some heads turned to look at us.
Ryan, however, came back to his earlier theory.
“Anyway, my point is, these are our best years. So either we can mug ourselves to death,
or tell the system to stuff it.”
“And how exactly do we tell the system to stuff it?” I enquired.
“I mean, not like stop mugging completely or something, but like, let us draw a line. We
can study two-three hours a day, but do other stuff, say sports, have you guys ever played
squash? Or taken part in events – debates, scrabble and stuff, an odd movie or something
sometimes. We can do so much at the insti.”
“Yeah, but very few people do it. And they are the ones with pretty bad GPAs,” Alok
said.
“See, I am not saying we stop mugging. We just draw the line. A day of classes, then three
hours a day of studies and the rest is our time. Let’s just try, just one semester. Isn’t it fair? A
kind of decentralization of education.”
Alok and I looked at each other. Ryan had a point. If I never played squash in college, I’d
probably never play it again. If I did not take part in Scrabble now, I’d never do it when I
had a job.
“I can try,” I said, mostly to agree with Ryan. He would not have stopped otherwise
anyway.
“Three hours is not enough.” Alok was doubtful.
“Okay, three and a half for our super-mugger,” Ryan said, “Okay?”
Alok agreed, but his voice was so meek, it sounded like the chicken he just ate speaking
from within.
Ryan was elated, and he drove us back to Kumaon at speeds that made the traffic police
dizzy. No one stopped us, or rather, we didn’t stop. I covered the number plate with my foot,
so that cops could not take it down. After all, this was a celebration of drawing the line.
Meanwhile, I ran into Neha at the campus bookstore. I had not met her since she had tried to
kill me and it wasn’t anyone’s fault. Mostly that whole jogging plan was a bad idea. Even
with the prospect of meeting Neha, I just could not wake up. I did try once again, but I was
late and did not see her car. After that, all my motivation dropped and Ryan gave up on
waking me up. He had to, cause I kind of threatened to withdraw from his draw-the-line
study plan. So, what I’m trying to say is, when I saw Neha again, it was a nice surprise.
”Hi,” I said, raising my hand to catch her attention.
She looked at me, and then kept looking, her face expressionless. She acted as if she did
not recognize me. Then she went back to flipping pages of the notebooks she had just
bought. Now that was hell, I mean, if you are in a public place and say ‘hi’ to a girl, all
beaming and everything and she’s like ‘have we been introduced?’
The shopkeeper looked at me, as did a few other customers, and I felt like low-life
though I gave it another try. I mean, just a few weeks ago she was all sympathetic and
friendly, so maybe she just couldn’t place me.
“Neha, it’s me! Remember the car accident in the morning?” I said.
“Excuse me,” she said huffily and departed.
This time the shopkeeper looked at me like I was a regular sex-offender. The girl bumped
me and gave me a lift and all dammit, I wanted to scream, even as I bought my pencils and
loose sheets. So I am not that attractive and that is reason enough not to recognize someone
in public because I guess being friends with ugly people kind of rubs off badly on you. I had
been some sort of a loser in school as well, so this was not a total shock. I mean what
happened to me once in my school, I don’t even want to get into all that but somehow, I felt
strange. I don’t know, Neha did not look like that kind of girl.
I walked out of the shop as quickly as possible to get away from the humiliation. I was
feeling crap. I mean, she could have at least said “hi,” I thought. I know I am fat and if I
were a girl, I’d probably not talk to me either. I was walking alone on a narrow path
connecting the bookshop to the hostel, when someone tapped my shoulder. I turned around
and guess who?
“Hi,” said Neha.
Go to hell, was my instant mental reflex. But I turned to look at her and damn, she was
pretty. And with that one tiny dimple on her right cheek flashing every time she smiled…
Now tr y saying ‘go to hell’ to that!
“Hi. Neha, right?” I said, this time really careful and slow.
“Of course. Hey, I am really, really, really sorry, I could not reply to you properly there.
There’s a reason,” she divulged.
Now, girls do this all the time, they think repeating an adjective makes it more effective;
the three ‘reallys’ were supposed to constitute an apology.
“What reason?” I said.
“It is just that, I mean…can we just forget it?”
“No, tell me why?” I insisted.
“The shopkeeper there knows me and my dad for the last ten years and they talk
regularly.”
“So?”
“My dad is really strict about me talking to boys and he will totally flip out if he hears I
am friends with a student.”
“Really? Just greeting someone?”
“He is like that. And campus rumours always get blown out of proportion. Please, I am
sorry.”
She was being a bit ridiculous, I thought, but I kind of knew where she was coming from.
Some girls’ dads are a bit touchy, and with over a thousand boys with their proportional
quota of hormones on campus he would be worried.
“Well, I can’t see you then anyway, right?”
“You can as long as it is out of campus.”
“We live here!”
“Yes, but there is a world outside. We can go to the Hauz Khas market. Do you feel like
some ice-cream?”
It is hard enough to say no to pretty girls or to ice-cream but when it’s offered together, it
is well nigh impossible. I said yes, and she instructed me to walk out the campus gate and
walk two blocks to an ice-cream parlour. She would come there as well, but gave me a
five-minute headstart, walking sedately behind me.
It was completely weird to walk alone that way, and I kept thinking how stupid I’d look
in the parlour if she did not show up. At least I’d have ice-cream, I thought. Food is almost
as good as girls.
But Neha did show up and inside the Cadbury’s ice-cream parlour she was a different
person.
“So, Mr Jogger, did not see much of you after that day. Did I scare you off?” She began to
giggle. Girls do this all the time, say something half-funny, and laugh at it themselves.
“No, it’s just a pain to wake up.”
“Well, I was kind of hoping to see you,” she confessed.
“Yeah, looked like it at the bookshop.”
“I said I am sorry, Hari,” she said, and touched my arm again like she had earlier. I kind
of liked that, I mean, which guy wouldn’t. You have this pretty girl all smiley and sorry and
touching your arm; better than ice-cream I tell you.
There are two kinds of pretty girls in Delhi. One is the modern type, girls who cut their
hair short, wear jeans or skirts, and tiny earrings. The second is the traditional type who
wears salwar-kameez, multi-coloured bindi and large earrings. Neha was more the second
type, and she wore a light-blue chikan suit with matching earrings. However, she was not a
forced traditional type, like fat girls who have no choice but to wear Indian clothes. Neha
was just fine, and actually way out of my league, with her long light brown hair, which she
mostly left open, a curl catapulting carelessly on to her forehead. Her face was completely
round, but not because she was fat or anything, just a natural cute shape. I just kept looking
at her as my strawberry ice-cream melted.
“Friends?”
“I guess so. You know, when you ignored me there, I first thought it was because of the
way I am.”
“What way are you?”
“Never mind,” I said.
I told Neha about our harebrained scholastic plan.
“Three hours? Pretty brave I must say. Guess you are underestimating the profs and their
love for assignments,” she said, scraping up whatever remained in her cup.
I shrugged my shoulders. “Anyway, you tell me about yourself. Learnt driving now?”
“Yes, I even got a licence,” she chirped and opened her bag to show it to me. She started
taking stuff out of her handbag and a million things came out – lipsticks, lip balms, creams,
bindis, earrings, pens, mirrors, wet tissues and other stuff that one can live without. She
found what she was looking for eventually.
“Wow. Neha Samir Cherian, female, 18 years,” I read her name aloud.
“Hey, stop it. You are not supposed to notice ladies’ ages.”
“That is for sixty-year-old women, you are young.” I returned her licence.
“Still, I like chivalrous men,” she said, repacking her bag and the million belongings.
I did not know if it meant something. I mean, did she want me to know what kind of men
she liked, or did she want me to be like the men she liked, or did she like me. Who knows?
Figuring out women is harder than topping a ManPro quiz.
“Samir, isn’t that a guy’s name?”
“It is my brother’s. I decided to keep it when I got this licence made.”
“Really? What does your brother do?”
“Not much,” she shrugged. “He’s dead.”
Now this was unexpected. I mean, I just thought I’d tease her on a mannish middle name
and everything but this was turning heavy. “Oh!” I said.
“It’s fine, really, he died one year ago. We were just two years apart, so you can imagine
how close I was to him.”
I nodded my head. Her beautiful face was turning sad and I wished I could do something
clownish to change subjects.
“How did it happen?” I asked, for it seemed the polite thing to do.
“A freak accident. He was crossing the rail-tracks and got hit by a train.”
I wondered if I could take a chance and hold her arm like she had a few minutes ago. I
mean, that is how shallow I was. She was all choked up and everything, but all I could think
of was if I could make my move.
I shifted my hand closer, but she startled me by talking again. “Life goes on, you know. He
was my only sibling, so that is kind of tough. But life goes on,” she repeated, more to herself
than to me.
I pulled my hand back. I sensed this was not the best moment.
“Ice-cream? C’mon let us do round two,” she said brightly and went up to the counter
without waiting for me. She returned with these two big sundaes, and she was smiling again.
“So he had a train accident? In Delhi?”
“Yes. You don’t think that can happen?” she asked challengingly.
“No….o.”
“C’mon, tell me something cheerful about your hostel.”
I told her about Ryan’s scooter and how we over-speed on it and things. It was hardly
interesting, but it changed the topic. We talked about other things until dusk and Neha’s
internal clock went off.
“Have to go,” she jumped up. “Shall we walk back?”
“Yeah. Separately though right?” I was catching on fast.
“Yes, sorry please,” she said in a mock-baby tone that girls lapse into at the slightest
provocation.
I stood up, too.
“So, Hari?”
“So what?”
“Aren’t you going to ask me out or what?”
That stumped me. I mean, of course I’d wanted to but thought she’d say no for sure and
then I’d have felt crap all night. I would have been satisfied with the ice-cream and
everything but this was kind of neat, and now I had no choice anyway.
“Huh? Sure. Neha, would you like to go out…with me?”
She had made it pretty safe for me, but I tell you, the first time you ask a girl for a date, it
is like the hardest thing. Almost as stressful as vivas.
“Yes, of course I will. Meet me at this parlour next Saturday, same time as today.”
I nodded.
“And next time, don’t be this shy IIT boy, just ask.”
I smiled.
“So, what are you waiting for? Leave now.”
A demure five minutes ahead of her, I pleasantly dwelt on the mechanics of the female
mind, waddling back into hostel.
5
—
Make Notes not War
U.S. WAS GUNNING FOR IRAQ, TAKING AS ITS FIRST CASUALTY our majors, or
end-semester exams. Thousands of kilometres from our campus, a despotic dictator annexed
another smaller despotic dictator’s country. It just so happened that both countries had heaps
of oil and that made the whole world take notice. Next, the world’s most powerful country
asked the dictator to get the hell out. Big dictator refused and very soon it became clear that
he would be attacked.
So, what the hell did this have to do with the three of us at IIT, you’d think. If this was one
of Ryan’s stupid sci-fi movies, the three of us could be like involved in a conspiracy, using
the IIT lab to provide superior weapons to the CIA or something. But this was not sci-fi, and
the three of us considered ourselves lucky to complete the ManPro welding assignment on
time, let alone provide superior war technology.
No, the Gulf war did not personally invite our involvement but it was a big bang that
swallowed our first semester majors, a catalyst for all our competitive, macho instincts.
But before that let me tell you of the glory days of the short-lived ‘draw-the-line’ policy.
As per plan we studied for three exact hours every day, mostly late unto night, which meant
we had the evenings free for fun.
“The best game ever invented,” Ryan said as he took us to the squash courts despite Alok
and me looking like guys who never came near a mile of a squash court.
“This game will rest your mind, and burn some of that fat off.” Ryan, who had been the
squash captain in his school, tossed warm-up shots in the court.
Unless you are like a champion or something, you probably know how difficult the damn
game is. The rubber ball jumps around like a frog high on uppers, and you jump around it to
try and connect it to your racket. Ryan had played it for years and Alok and I were hopeless
at it. I missed connecting the ball to the racket five times in a row, and Alok did not even try
moving from his place. After a while, even I gave up. Ryan tried to keep the game going as
we stood like extra pillars on court.
“C’mon guys, try at least,” Ryan called out.
“I can’t do this,” Alok said and sat down on the court. The guy is such a loser. I mean, I
could not play squash for nuts, but at least I won’t sit down on the court.
“Let us try again tomorrow,” Ryan said, optimistic to say the least.
He dragged us to court for ten days in a row, but Alok and I got no better. We found it
hard enough to even spot where the ball had gone, let alone chase it.
“Ryan, we can’t do this man,” Alok said plaintively, panting uncontrollably. “If you really
want to play this, why don’t you find other partners?”
“Why? You guys are getting better,” Ryan said.
Yeah right, maybe in thirty years, I thought grimly.
“So you don’t enjoy this?”
What was Ryan thinking? Enjoy? Enjoy? I was in danger of tearing that ball into roughly
fifty pieces.
“Not really,” I ventured mildly.
“Fine then, we don’t have to do this. I mean, I can give up squash,” Ryan said.
“No, that is not…” Alok said.
Ryan had already decided, no point arguing with him. It was his whole ‘where my friends
go, I go’stand, though I kind of felt bad making him give up his favourite sport.
“You can play with others,” I suggested.
“Others aren’t my friends,” Ryan said in a firm voice that sounded like the final word.
Alok and I shrugged and we left the court.
After squash came something tamer and less active, chess. Alok and I felt somewhat up to
this one, for, unlike squash, we could at least touch and move the game pieces. But Ryan
usually won, and I would never be passionate about bumping off plastic pieces like him.
Apart from chess, we spent our free time riding Ryan’s scooter, feeling the fierce wind
whistle through our hair. We caught every new movie, visited every tourist destination in
Delhi, did everything, went everywhere.
For the most part, we managed fine within the three hours assigned to studies. Sometimes
assignments took longer, leaving no time for revision. That worried Alok, especially when
the end-semester exams edged closer, and he suggested increasing the limit. And we would
have if it hadn’t been for one thing – the afore-mentioned Gulf war.
Now wars happen all the time and India alone has fought more than it can afford. But the
Gulf war was different, as it came right on TV. CNN, an American news channel, had just
opened shop in India and brought the deserts of Iraq right into our TV room.
“This is CNN reporting live from the streets of Baghdad. The sky is lit up with the first
air raid,” a well-groomed person told us.
Alok, Ryan and I looked up from our chess game. It was sensational, spectacular and
unlike anything we had ever seen on TV. To put it in context, this was before cable or any
private channels came to India. Until then we had two crummy government channels in
which women played obsolete instruments and dull men read news for insomniacs and
retards. Colour had only arrived two years ago, and most programs were still black and
white. Then, in one quick week, we had the glitzy, jazzy and live – CNN.
“Is this real? I mean is this happening?” Alok looked dazed.
“Of course, Fatso. You think this is a play?” Ryan scoffed as two American pilots hifived
themselves after hours of pounding a perfectly real city. A CNN reporter asked them
questions about their mission. The soldiers told about bombing a godown, and taking down
a power station that gave electricity to Baghdad.
“Wow, the Americans are going to win this,” Alok said.
“Don’t underestimate the Iraqis, who have fought wars for ten years. Americans are just
pounding from the air,” Ryan said.
“Yes, but America is too powerful. Saddam hasn’t a clue.”
“He does, wait till a land battle happens,” Ryan defended.
The war sucked us in like quicksand, Alok and Ryan got really into ‘who is going to win
this’ kind of crap. I mean, you stop doing that when you are twelve I think (Superman or
Batman?), but there was no stopping them. I liked watching the war as well, though I primly
took no sides.
Iraq was kind of anonymous then, and we unabashedly cheered on America. IIT cared
about America. Most of our foreign aid came from rich American firms and quite a large
percentage of our alumni went on scholarship there and for jobs, constituting a chunk of the
brain drain. So, unsurprisingly, our heart bled for the US.
At the same time, the war visuals became more gruesome. Americans pounded Baghdad
non-stop, and Saddam hid himself deep in one of his oil wells I think. Many times,
Americans hit civilian targets and people died and everything, and that was crap. I mean,
the aid to IIT was fine, but how can you justify bombing kids? But then, Saddam was kind of
this loser General anyway, and apparently shot his own people when he was grumpy. Oh, it
was impossible to take sides in the Gulf war. And it was all pointless for us anyway. These
guys would realize this soon.
“Man, the majors are eight days away,” Alok finally said one day. “We’ve got to switch
off the TV.”
“We still study three hours though.” Ryan quirked an eyebrow.
“Screw three hours! It’s not enough,” I contributed.
“I think Iraq will win,” Ryan said.
“Drop it, man, America has busted him,” Alok said, “so please I beg you Ryan, let’s study
before we’re busted too.”
“Not yet, ground battle not done yet,” he said righteously.
Luckily, the war ended five days before the majors. America won big-time, and Iraqis ate
crow before ground battle. Saddam left Kuwait alone and Americans were happy all the oil
in the world was theirs to burn and Ryan did not eat for a day or so.
“This is not fair. Real wars are fought on the ground,” he wailed as we started revisions
for the final tests in our room.
“Shut up, Ryan. Americans got what they wanted. Now can we study?” I said.
“Unfair man. US is a schoolroom bully.”
“ApMech, ApMech” Alok muttered like a mantra.
Squash, chess and the war – all ate into our studying hours. In the five days before exams,
we dropped the three-hour rule, well we had to; the heaps of course material was un-doable
even if we studied thirty hours a day. It was important to clamp down on Ryan and we
studied until three in the morning ever y day and passionately prayed India would go to war
on the morning of our first majors.
A day before the majors were practical tests. It was the only part of the course Ryan
enjoyed, and he dragged us early to the physics lab. We were in the same group and had to
conduct an electrical setup and then answer questions in a viva-voce. We got a resistancevoltage
relationship testing experiment.
I hated practical tests. Most of all, I dreaded the viva-voce. I don’t know if I told you
about my condition; it strikes me whenever someone looks me in the eye and asks me a
question. My body freezes, sweat beads cover me brow to groin, and I lose my sense of
voice. How I hated vivas and when Ryan was all excited assembling the circuit for the
experiment, I hated him too.
“Hey guys, watch this,” Ryan said, holding the circuit components in his hand.
Alok looked up from his notebook.
Ryan spent the next ten minutes connecting resistors, capacitors, switches and cables to
each other. It was completely unconnected to our experiment and Alok was seriously getting
worried.
“Ryan, can you please connect the resistor-voltage setup so we can start our experiment?”
Alok said.
“Wait Fatso, we have two hours to do the experiment. Do they have a small speaker
here?” Ryan fumbled through the component box.
“What do you need a speaker for?” I said even as Ryan found one and made the final
connection.
“For this,” Ryan said and switched his circuit on. He moved a few connections, and soon
Hindi music came from the speaker.
“Ghar aaya mera pardesi…”
“What the hell!” Alok jumped as if a ghost had shimmered into the lab.
“It is a radio, stupid,” Ryan said, eyes all lit up, “I knew we had all the parts to make
one.”
“Ryan,” I said, as firmly as possible.
“What?”
“We are having a damn major here,” I said.
That is Ryan. The guy will do clever things but only at the wrong time and wrong place.
Alok panicked, too. “The viva is in twenty minutes, boss.”
Ryan ripped off his circuit and looked at us in disdain as if we were tone-deaf listeners
who had rejected live Mozart.
We just about managed to finish the circuit on time when Prof Goyal walked in.
“Hmm…,” the Prof said tugging at the circuit wires. Ryan had made the circuit; he was
good at this, we trusted him.
“So, Ryan what will happen if I change the 100-ohm resistor with a 500-ohm resistor?”
“Sir, we would have higher voltage across, though there would be a higher heat loss as
well.”
“Hmm…” Prof Goyal scratched his chin in response, which meant Ryan was right.
“So Alok, how do you read the stripes on this resistor to get the ohm resistance?”
“Sir, the red stripe is a 100-ohm, then 10 for the blue, implying 110 ohm.”
Our group was doing well. But Prof Goyal was not done. Despite my frantic hopes, he
turned to me.
“So Hari, if I add another resistor on top of the 110 ohm resistor, what happens to the
current flow?”
A trick question. The current flow depends on how one connects the new resistor, in
series or parallel. In series, the current would drop. In parallel, it would increase. Yes, this
was the answer. I think so, right?
I had recited the answer in my mind. But Prof Goyal stared at me and me alone while
asking the question, not surprising since he prefixed the question with what was a good
facsimile of my name.
“Sir…” I quivered as my hand started to shiver. My condition was upon me.
“What will happen to the current flow?”
“Sir..I…sir,” I said, inexorably tumbling toward total paralysis. I mean, I totally knew the
answer but what if it was wrong? I tried articulating, but the thoughts did not cash into
words.
“Sir, the current flow depen...” Ryan intervened, trying to save the situation.
Prof Goyal raised his forefinger.
“Quiet, I am asking your group member, not you.”
I shook my head and lowered it. There was no use, I had given up.
“Hmm…” Prof Goyal said, not scratching any part of his face. “The standard of this
institute is going down day by day. What are you, commerce students?”
Calling an IIT-ian a commerce student was one of the worst insults the profs could accord
to us, like a prostitute calling her client a eunuch. The institute was the temple of science
and anyone below standards was an outcaste or a commerce student.
Prof Goyal scribbled a C+ on our group experiment sheet, and tossed it at us. Ryan caught
it, I think.
We did not have much of a chance to discuss the physics practicals, as the majors started
the next day. I had even postponed my next rendezvous with Neha until after the exams. I had
called her once, getting her number from the faculty’s internal directory. She freaked out,
telling me not to call home without notice. How the hell was I supposed to give her notice?
Anyway, we had fixed to meet the day after my majors.
Majors were when everyone studied in Kumaon, lights remained on in rooms until dawn,
people rarely spoke – and then only on matters of life or death – and consumed endless cups
of tea in the all-night mess. Ryan, Alok and I scrambled to revise our six courses. The
exams schedule was three continuous days, leaving little time to discuss the tests. I knew I
had done fine in some tests and screwed up some. Alok had developed a permanent scowl
and Ryan could maintain his laid-back air only with the utmost effort; no jokes, majors blow
the wind out of anyone. ManPro, ApMech, physics, mathematics, chemistry and computing.
One by one, we finished them. When majors ended, it did seem like the worst was over
though the results come only after two weeks.
Those two weeks between the end of majors and the results were bliss. Even though the
second semester began, no one really got into the new courses until they knew how they’d
done in the first semester. The profs were busy evaluating tests, going easy on new
assignments, giving us plenty of time to kill. Ryan upgraded us from chess to crossword
puzzles, taking us from cryptic clues to rhyme words to anagrams.
Meanwhile, I met Neha again on a summery evening early into the second semester even
though she had short-circuited when I called her. It was the same ice-cream parlour.
“God, are you crazy or what, calling at home?” she greeted.
I didn’t know what to say. I thought I’d been pretty cool to think of getting the number
from the profs directory and everything.
“How else am I to reach you?
“My parents are very strict about me getting calls from boys.”
I couldn’t tell her, “Your parents sound like regular psychos,” so in non-sequitur, I asked,
“Strawberry?”
She was wearing a demure white salwar-kameez that day. She held my hand as she took
the cone from me. God, she is beautiful, I tell you.
“So how am I supposed to reach you?”
“Call me on the 11th.”
A pink tongue darting out to catch some melted cream from reaching the ground had
disoriented me. “Huh?”
“Just call me on the 11th of any month.”
Now Neha is beautiful and everything, but she can be pretty loony at times.
“What? Why 11
th?”
“Because no one is at home that day. You see, my brother died on 11
th May. So on every
11
th my parents go to this temple near the rail-tracks where he died. They are gone most of
the day.”
“Really? And you don’t go?”
“I used to. But it used to remind me of Samir a lot. I’d be depressed for days afterward
and the doctor told me not to go.”
She said it matter of factly, as if she were choosing an ice-cream flavour. It was strange,
but a hell of a lot better than her gearing up to cry or something; I can’t stand people who
cry in public.
“Only on 11
th?”
“Well for now, that is the only safe date,” she said and laughed, “why? You want to talk
more often?”
I did not answer her. I mean, I just thought it weird that I could call her only on that one
day a month, like I had a dental appointment or something. But girls are weird, I was
learning.
“So tell me,” she said tapping my hand again to change the topic, “how were the majors?”
I loved it when she touched me in any way, that’s how deprived or depraved I was; I
almost forgot her question in the aftermath of the tiny localized tremors exploding on my
skin’s surface.
“Uh majors…nothing great. Results come in one week or so.”
“Did well?”
“Not really.”
“You want me to put in a word to Dad to increase your grades?” she said.
“Can you?” The pinkness enveloped me.
“I’m kidding.”
Of course. She giggled as if she had got me. Like I thought I believed she could help me
with my grades or something. Girls love laughing at their own jokes but Neha amused is
better than Neha looking around furtively.
I suddenly leaned forward, bringing my face close to hers. Catching her breath, stifling
that laugh and pink tongue, she watched me wide-eyed. I removed the wallet from my back
pocket and sat down casually again.
“What happened?” I asked idly.
“I thought…never mind.” She blinked.
Ha, gotcha.
6
—
Five-point Something
“THEY’RE OUT!” ALOK SAID, SHAKING RYAN’S SHOULDER on a Saturday morning
as if India had won the World Cup or nude women were rolling on the grass outside. “The
major results are out!”
“I want to sleep,” Ryan said, burrowing deeper under the quilt that Alok eventually
succeeded in tugging off.
We reached the insti where a crowd of students had gathered to see their first set of
grades. From these one could determine their first grade point average, or GPA, on the
10point scale. The topper would be close to 10.00, while the average would be around
6.50. We, however, were closer to the bottom. Clicking through the scientific calculator,
Alok calculated our scores.
“Ok, Hari is at 5.46 and… Ryan is at 5.01 and I …I’m at 5.88,” Alok said.
“So all of us are five-pointers,” I said, as if making a particulary insightful comment.
“Congrats Alok, you have topped amongst us,” Ryan said.
Topped amongst us, I thought. As if we were the high-brain society or something. These
were pathetic grades: we ranked in the high 200s in a class of 300 students. Alok
recalculated his score, hoping for some miracle to happen on the calculator. But miracles
never happen in IIT, only crap grades do.
“Screw that. Bloody hell, I am just a 5.88. This is so below average.”
“We knew that, right?” Ryan said, “Whatever. Alok, let’s celebrate this over chicken.”
“Celebrate!” Alok spluttered. “I have just screwed up any chance of getting a US
scholarship or a good job and you want to bloody celebrate?”
“Grow up, Fatso. What do you want to do? Mug more in mourning?” Ryan was calm.
“Fuck you,” Alok said.
It was the first time he had used the ‘F’ word. From him, it sounded peculiar, I mean he is
still a kid.
Ryan’s calmness vanished faster than a prof ’s smile. “What did you say?” he turned
toward me, “What did the Fatso say?”
Why was the bastard dragging me into this? Ryan had damn well heard what Alok said. In
fact, all the twittering students around us had heard it too.
“C’mon guys, let’s take the show to the hostel,” I pleaded. I don’t care if they kill each
other, but privacy I insist on. They were in no mood to let go and for a moment I thought they
were going to ignore me and have a fisticuff right there. Somehow, I knew this wasn’t one of
the regular Ryan-Alok arguments; this had, at its core, their basic character contrasts.
“Let’s go,” I said again and they dragged their feet back to the scooter. Ryan rode us back
to the hostel as rashly as he possibly could, intentionally going over ever y bump on the
road. He has his own strange way of sulking I tell you.
We sat in Ryan’s room after dinner, we had not spoken a word since the insti. I had thought a
little about my little GPA. Yes, a five-pointer was pretty crap. From now on, every prof
would know that I was a below average student and that would influence my grade in future
courses. I knew a few five-pointers who were panned at campus recruitment last year. This
was crap, how did I get into this situation? Was I just not smart enough? At the dinner table,
other students were either plain morose or extremely excited. There was the studious
Venkat, who never left his room and was always quiet at meals. Today, he was smiling. He
had a nine point five. He sat next to Alok, and told his stories of topping in four out of six
courses. Alok was talking only to him and totally ignoring us. There were others too. Even
the Smiling Surd in our wing had managed a respectable seven point three. I think the three
of us were the lowest in Kumaon or something. I could have mulled more over my future, or
rather the lack of it, but Ryan and Alok’s swollen faces filled my immediate vision.
We trooped into Ryan’s room and sat quietly for half an hour or so. Nobody opened a
book, looked at each other or said a word. I wondered if we were going to stay quiet
forever. I mean, that couldn’t be such a bad thing. We could attend class, study together and
eat together, quiet as mice. Maybe our grades would improve as well. It really isn’t that
important for people to talk.
But my rosy fantasy of silence was finally broken by Ryan.
“So, you are not going to apologize?” he asked belligerently.
“Apologize? Me? It is you who should apologize Ryan,” Alok said.
“You are the one who said ‘fuck you’ in front of the whole damn insti,” Ryan said, “and I
should apologize? Hari, can you believe this? I should apologize.”
Now this had nothing to do with me, so I ignored Ryan. Let the two nuts figure it out
amongst themselves.
“You just don’t fucking get it do you?” Alok said, going the ‘damn’ way with ‘fuck’.
Ryan kept silent.
“Get what?” I said. I mean, I really wanted to know what I was missing in this moronic
conversation.
“Get this. Today I got a GPA of 5.88. Damn it, a 5.88. Over 200 students have done better.
Do you know in my twelve years in school I never even got a second rank.”
In most parts of the world, that would be a pretty loser statement to make. To announce
that you were like this nerd in school is hardly something to be proud of. But that is Alok for
you.
“So?” Ryan said, “your insti grades are bad. And who cares about how much you
mugged. Why the hell should I apologize?”
“Because damn it…because it is your damn fault,” Alok said and stood up.
Now that was whacko. Poor Ryan had just managed to scrape a five, and now he was
getting crap from Alok.
“My fault?” Ryan said and started laughing. “Hari, listen to this. Fatso screws up his
grades and it is Ryan’s fault. My fault. Hey Alok, have you gone nuts or something?”
“Say something,” Alok beseeched me.
“Say what?’ I looked away from both of them.
“It is okay. If Hari does not have the guts to say it, I can. You and your ideas, Ryan. Study
less, draw the line, enjoy the best years, this system is a machine, crap, crap and more crap
all the time.”
Ryan stood up from his chair as well; I think it gives you an edge in the argument if you
stand up, kind of more serious and purposeful.
“I know you are upset and everything but there is no need to overreact. Just some stupid
grades…”
“I am not overreacting,” Alok said and sat back down. “And it is not just stupid grades
for me. I don’t have my parents earning dollars like yours. I came to this institute with a
purpose. To do well, get a good job and look after my parents. And you have fucked it up.”
Another F-word; Alok was still upset I guess.
“Stop saying fuck all the time,” Ryan said.
“I will say whatever I want. That is the problem. No one can say anything to you. You
propose something, Hari blindly agrees and we all end up doing it. You are just a spoilt
brat. Someone who wants to do whatever he wants without caring for his friends.”
“What? What did you just say? That I don’t care for my friends?” Ryan said. Though his
voice was notched at a menacing pitch, I noticed his hands starting to shiver a little bit.
“No. You don’t care about anything – not studies, not the insti, not your parents and not
your friends. You just want to have your fun.”
“You’re crossing the line here,” Ryan warned.
“I am drawing the line for a change. From now on, I am not going to hang out with you
anymore, it is official.”
Now it was pretty clear that Alok was overreacting. “What are you saying, man?” I said.
“No drop-shrop it. I have listened to you guys for the entire first semester and screwed up
everything,” Alok said.
“So what are you going to do?”
“Like I said, no more hanging out with Ryan. From now on, I am going to be with Venkat.
He has agreed to let me study with him. He got a nine point five you know?”
I felt disgusted. Nobody in Kumaon talked to Venkat; given a choice he wouldn’t talk to
himself. He had a good GPA and everything, but he was hardly human. Venkat woke up at
four in the morning to squeeze in four hours of muggins before classes. Every evening he
spent three hours in the library before dinner. Then after dinner, he studied on his bed for
another couple of hours until he went to sleep. Who on earth would want to be with him?
“You are sick Alok,” Ryan said, “you are just one sick person.”
“My grades are important to me. My future is important to me. Does that make me sick?”
I went to Alok and put my arm around his shoulder; kind of felt he needed comfort during
insanity. “C’mon Alok, we can study more…”
“Stop c’mon-Aloking me, will you?” Alok pushed my arm away, voice all wobbly.
“Enough is enough,” he said, his face contorted exactly like his mother’s.
This heredity factor fascinated me; was there a how-to-cry gene? Or was this something
he had picked up while growing up? Maybe Alok’s family all cried together sometimes;
mother, sister and himself bawling away with his father, who could still produce tears from
one eye.
“You don’t understand that I have responsibilities. I have to do well to support my family.
Half my mother’s salary goes for my father’s medicine. She has not bought a new sari for
herself in five years,” Alok said as he choked on his tears. He needed to blow his nose.
Ryan sat down to watch Alok, intrigued. He could take ‘fuck yous’ ten a minute, but
crying was a different game altogether. And the whole one-saree-in-five-years was tough to
argue against. I mean, how do you argue with that? How many sarees a year is reasonable? I
don’t know, and Ryan for sure had no damn clue.
“And my sister needs to be married,” Alok went on, “everyone is counting on me. And
you guys don’t understand. Ryan wants to play chess, see TV, enjoy his years. I hate
enjoyment.”
“Will it make it better if I say sorry? I mean, you aren’t making any sense. And this whole
parents deal – you know I don’t understand that.” Ryan was gentling, I could see.
But this shifted Alok into higher gear. “Of course, you don’t. How could you? You never
had them.”
“I had them. I mean I still have them. But I don’t sit and cry for them.”
“Because you don’t love them.”
“Yes I don’t. But at least I am not crying like a baby.”
“Shut up!” Alok screamed and continued crying.
“You are a baby. A sissy-fat baby. Sorry sissy baby, now wipe your nose,” Ryan said and
started laughing. It is something he always does when he can’t think of anything else, a kind
of conversation filler.
“Shut up you…you...” Alok said.
“I want my mummeeeeee,” Ryan said, imitating Alok’s choked tones.
“…shut up, you abandoned orphan!”
Silence. Yes, sometimes people say something so messed up that all bets go off. Ryan’s
laughter vanished in a nanosecond. I sat up straight, confused if I’d heard right. Even Alok
noticed the change in expressions and froze. Twenty solid, slow and long seconds of silence
followed.
“Orphan. Hari, he called me an orphan,” Ryan said.
I stayed silent. Alok stayed silent.
“Just get out. Go to Venkat or whichever prick you want to be with. Just get lost,” Ryan
said.
“I don’t need you to tell me. Hari?” Alok said, not crying anymore.
“Yes?” I said.
“You coming with me?”
“Where?”
“Do you want to be with me or Ryan?”
This was so damn unfair. I had nothing to do with all this. Yet, I had to now choose
between my friends.
“Yes, go with this loser Hari, go hold his hand.”
“I am not going anywhere,” I said.
“So you choose Ryan,” Alok said in defeated tones.
“I am not choosing anyone. You are the one who is leaving. Do whatever you want,” I
said, disgusted with both of them.
There were no more words. Alok got up and left. Ryan shut the door behind him as hard
as he could. It was purely symbolic, as we never shut the door in our rooms.
“You saw what he did. And he expected you to go with him, ha!” Ryan said.
“Fuck you,” I said.
I met Neha soon after, though I was getting sick of the ice-cream parlour, and of the
sickeningly sweet strawberr y flavour. Neha still looked beautiful as hell, but I didn’t feel
like talking to her. In fact, I did not feel like talking to anyone.
“What’s wrong?”
“Who said anything was wrong?” I said. I can be quite a prick if I want.
“It is all over your face. Now are you going to tell me or what?”
That is the thing with girls. They are like half your size or something, but if they know you
like them, they boss you around. Who the hell did she think she was?
“It is nothing.”
She placed her hand over my arm and self-respecting nitwit that I am, I melted faster than
the ice-cream; like the bad mood bugs running through me suddenly got Baygon-sprayed.
“Neha, those bloody Alok and Ryan.”
“Language!”
“Sorry, I mean my friends, my best friends, they had this massive argument and now our
group has split.”
“What was the argument about?”
“About grades. Alok said it was Ryan’s fault we did badly.”
“Really, how badly?”
I told her about our five-pointer grades.
“Damn, did you say five-pointers?” she said.
“Language!” I said.
“Oh sorry. I mean that is kind of low by insti standards.”
See that is the thing. Once you get a GPA in IIT, everyone has an opinion about it, about
you, even if it’s a fashion design student.
“I know,” I said, “but that is not what I am upset about. It is this place. I hate it.”
Neha started laughing. I told you, didn’t I, she can be a bit loony at times. “What is there
to laugh about?” I asked, irritated.
“Nothing. Just how people would die to get in here.”
“I know,” I said, “but it sucks. I have tons to study, my grades are crap, and I don’t have
friends anymore.”
“So Alok wants to mug, and he goes to the mugger,” she paraphrased the recent events
after I had told her the longhand version, “but how come you chose Ryan?”
“I didn’t choose, Alok left,” I reminded her.
“What are you going to do?”
I shrugged.
“You know my dad was a 10 when he was a student.”
“He was a student?” I had never thought of Cherian as anything less in size or years.
“Yes, a class topper. Guess he wouldn’t be too happy to know I am with a five-pointer,”
she said happily.
“So now you also want to stop talking to me,” I said.
“No silly. I am joking,” she said and laughed. Why does she do this all the time, tell jokes
that are funny to her alone?
“Whatever.”
“Come here,” she said, tapping the seat next to her in the parlour.
“Why?”
“Just come here.”
Like a trained pet, I got up from the seat opposite and sat next to her; pretty girls have this
power to turn Mary, making lambs out of people.
She held my hand and turned her face toward me. “I like this five pointer,” she said, and
kissed my cheek.
“One, two, three, four, five,” she listed, smacking my right cheek each time. “See, now
that isn’t too bad.”
Damn, I was melting again. “Can I kiss you back?”
“No, I don’t have a GPA,” she pointed out.
I loved people who did not have a GPA. I loved anyone who was not at IIT. I did not
want to go back. I wondered if I could work at the ice-cream parlour, filling cones all day
and never have to worry about classes, courses, grades, and Alok-Ryan arguments.
“Let’s see a movie, how about Saturday next?” she asked.
“Sure,” I said, snapping out of my fantasy of working in the parlour.
“Great. Gotta go now. I’ll pick you up from this parlour at two. Matinee show,” she said
and left.
I waited for five minutes, read the list of five daily specials and thought about the five
kisses. Somehow, it made up for my five-point GPA.
How I wished I had got a higher GPA, if only to get more of those ice-creamy kisses!
I Love u Rachu
Dear Frnds pls spread this msg until its reach to my rachu
I thinks see knows my name
Downloaded from EBOOK4IN.BLOGSPOT.COM
7
—
Alok Speaks
FATSO, CRY-BABY, MUGGER, TRAITOR, SISSY, THAT IS HOW I come across to you. You
probably picture me as this boy who refuses to grow up, the perennial prodigy who wants
to show his good report card to his parents year after year. You are free to judge me, my
whining over grades, my splitting with the group, my reticence to cut apron strings, an
umbilical cord that stretches out across Delhi all the way from Rohini Colony to the IIT
campus, binding me to mother.
Allow me, however, to tell you this my way, for yes, this is Alok Gupta, and His
Highness Hari has given me an itsy-bitsy space here to give vent to my feelings. But
before I do that, let me tell you a story.
Once upon a time, there lived a boy in a lower-middle class home in one of the suburbs
of Delhi. Let us call this boy Loser – just to make it easier – whose father and mother
were schoolteachers, art and biology respectively. Loser grew up in a simple home filled
with notebooks and canvases, and learnt how to draw before learning to tie his
shoelaces. Loser was good in studies (owing to two teachers looking over him at home),
but what he loved most was to paint. Loser took part in every art competition for his age,
and won most of them. The prizes kept coming in – and dozens of painting sets,
calligraphy sets and stationery coupons later, it was clear Loser was above average at
the easel. He wanted to be an artist when he grew up, and of course, this was a silly
dream. For in India, there is only room for one or maybe two artists who are ninety years
old (or better still, dead) to survive. Yet Loser did not care, he knew he would make it and
nothing could stop him from his goal.
But that is when life screws you. Right at moments when you feel you have got it all
figured out. Loser’s father got this prestigious mural painting job, which for once paid
well. The job involved painting the ceiling of the lobby in the education department
building. Murals are hard anyway, and painting a ceiling is excruciating work. They put
these bamboos upon which the artist lies down and works, and hopes to create that one
masterpiece that will make the world crane their necks and take notice.
However, the only time people noticed Loser’s father was when he fell down from the
bamboo structure, ten meters down, and that was to step out of his way lest they broke his
fall.
Right side paralysis, doctors said. Half of Loser’s father was gone, but more
importantly, the whole of his salary was gone, the right hand that painted was gone and
so was Loser’s dream.
Loser’s father came home bed-ridden and never left it for ten years. His one good eye
shed tears every now and then, and the sorrow of never painting again brought one
infection after the other.
Soon, the bottles of paint were swapped with bottles of medicine. There was no money
to af ord a nurse, and Loser was appointed one. He was in class seven then, and for the
rest of his school years he sat next to his father’s bed after school.
For a while he painted, but soon he realized the family needed money more than
landscapes. IIT, the one college in the country that virtually guaranteed a future, caught
his eye. Yes, to become an engineer was the only way out of poverty.
Loser’s mother used to cry every night. But she could not give up. She had to keep on
teaching the digestive system and the endocrine system and reproductive system year
after year to go on.
“One day, they will be out of this,” Loser vowed to himself as he helped his father
change sides at night and studied pulleys, magnetism and calculus for the IIT entrance
exam. For two years, Loser did not step out of the house apart from school, gained fifteen
kilos and muttered calculations while wiping bed-sores.
And one fine day he made it. He was in the IIT. How happy his mother and half-afather
were. Yes, four more years of discipline and he could emancipate everyone. That is
when he met Ryan and Hari. And then, to remain with them, he screwed up his grades to
the lowest in the institute.
Ryan, the man who lives for the moment, who does not want to be like him? Rich
parents, good looks, smart enough to get into IIT, athletic enough to be good in sports
and fun enough to always attract friends. Ryan is infectious, and Hari is a perfect
example of this infection. If Ryan wants something, Hari gives it to him. So, if Ryan does
not want to study, Hari will close his books. If Ryan thinks GPAs are not important, then
Hari stops caring about them. Ryan is Pied Piper….
I remember when he came home once, he lifted my father to carry him out, and kept
holding him even in the auto. It was he who argued with the hospital staf to get us a
good bed, and then stayed with us until three a.m. Yes, Ryan is good, he is very, very
good. For who would have broken Coke bottles for unknown freshers? Or who would
have screwed up his new scooter and overloaded it with three people, two of them in
possession of large butts?
But there is more to Ryan. Like did you know his parents send him a letter every other
week? Or that he never replies to any of them? Yes, he will tell you he doesn’t love them
or whatever crap he dishes out. But the truth is, he keeps every letter neatly in a file.
When he is alone in his room at night, he opens the letters and reads them again. I mean,
if he is so cool and everything, why can’t he respond to them occasionally? And why does
he keep re-reading those letters anyway? I always knew Ryan had issues but Hari is
blind.
See, even though I think I have figured out Ryan somewhat, I cannot for the hell of it
understand Hari. I mean, he really is like me – ordinary, unattractive, fat and dull. But he
wants to be somebody else – someone cool, smart and sharp like Ryan. But deep down, he
knows that this is not possible. He will always remain the under-confident kid who turns
corpse during viva. The uncool cannot become cool. If only he’d accept that, he would be
able to think straight. But he doesn’t, and so went along with Operation Pendulum.
When I first split up with them, I was really not sure if I had done the right thing. But
after Operation Pendulum, I am not sure if I should have ever come back. Well, that is
life. It screws you right when you think you have figured it out.
8
—
One Year Later
I KNEW 365 DAYS HAD PASSED SINCE ALOK LEFT US BECAUSE third semester
results had just come out that day. How irrelevant they seemed now; another five point
something, another tattoo stamped on your worth as an individual in IIT society. Ryan and I
had gone to the insti to see the results, but that was incidental, the real reason was to chill
out on the insti roof.
I don’t remember when we first discovered this roof, it must have been soon after we
started smoking grass, which was soon after we had started vodka, which was soon after we
had started listening to Pink Floyd. Floyd, vodka, grass and the insti roof; finally, we were
on to what really mattered in life, the stuff that made IIT life bearable, especially when you
were a five-point something.
The giant insti building had nine stories; one had to take the clandestine service stairs on
the ninth floor to get to the roof. There was an old lock guarding the entrance to the terrace,
but thankfully the bolt was even more ancient. It took Ryan three minutes with a screwdriver
to remove the rusted bolt and then we were on cloud nine, the highest point on campus. The
bare, rough concrete surface made up the flat patch of terrace, there was no parapet. It was
mostly empty, too, apart from the insti-bell tower, and a few dish antennas that helped the
computer and telecom networks. After dark, only the stars above were visible. If one stood
up and looked down, one could see the street lights on campus roads and distant views of
Kumaon and other hostels a kilometre away.
Ryan laid out the vodka, the joints and his small Walkman in autopilot, familiar with our
twice a week routine.
We lay down on the concrete, still warm from the sunlight in the day. Ryan divided the
pair of earphones, such that we had one earphone each, passed a joint to me, and we kept
the vodka bottle in the center. Sip, puff, sip, rewind, stop and play.
The lyrics washed over us and we flew up to the sky as it flew down at us.
“You see all those kids screaming over their GPA,” Ryan said, releasing a smoke-ring.
I think smoke is beautiful; weightless and shapeless, it almost appears as deceptively
powerless as the person releasing it, yet, it comes from within and rises above us all. Crap,
I am talking all artsy stuff, grass does this to me.
“Yes, I saw them. And I see how they look at us,” I said.
“How?”
“Like what the hell are we there for? How does our miserable GPA matter anyway? As if
we are blocking their view or something.”
“Screw them,” Ryan said, words of wisdom from the man who knows everything.
“It’s true though,” I said, “we really serve no purpose here...”
“Of course, we do. We are the under-performers.”
“So?”
“So we bring the average down. We make them look better. Hence, we bring happiness in
their lives.”
“Point,” I conceded.
“But it is not the students that bother me. It is the profs.”
“You are talking about the design class right?”
“Yes, that Prof Bhatia. I mean you were there, right? I gave him some ideas on how one
could design a suspension bridge and he got all excited. He told me to make a scale drawing
and submit it, said he would give me a special internship project. Then he asked me my
name and found out my GPA. So then he calls me and says to forget about the drawing and
internship. Can you believe that scum?” Ryan said.
We had finished one joint each. Ryan sat up to make another one, crushing the grass and
tobacco hard, as if it were Prof Bhatia’s innards.
“Screw him,” I passed the words of wisdom back to Ryan.
We refilled our glasses, as it turned dark on the roof.
“Yes, screw all profs,” Ryan said.
“Yeah. Though Prof Veera is all right.” Prof Veera was our fluid mechanics professor.
“Yes, not him. Though I have heard the worst one is yet to come,” Ryan said as he lit up
the second joint.
“Who?” I debated whether I should smoke more. Ryan’s tolerance was much higher and
he could probably make a wholesome meal out of dope but I knew I was getting trippy. For
one thing, I felt I was feather-light; up here, it felt like I was floating above the world.
Screw all profs, all students and all design assignments.
“Prof Cherian.”
“Neha’s dad?” I said, somewhat returning to my senses.
“Yes. They say he’s a real terror. Like he is the head of the department, and is this total
control freak with other profs and students.”
I knew Neha’s dad was a control freak, at least with his daughter. “Who told you?”
“It is well known, ask any senior. Anyway, for the record, Anurag told me.”
“So when does the control freak teach us?”
“Next year. He takes third year courses,” Ryan said.
“Next year, too far. Give me another joint.”
There were still more than two years to leave this place. And the worst prof was yet to
come. I deserved another joint.
“Here,” Ryan said, passing me the crude cigarette. He was a good pal, one who rolls
joints for you.
“Anyway, I don’t want to talk about grades or profs. Talk about something else,” I said.
Ryan stayed silent; I guess he was searching for another topic.
“How is your girl?” he asked after straining his brain for twenty seconds.
That is how Ryan addresses Neha. He never says her name, as if her being ‘my girl’ is
more important than her being Neha.
“Neha is great. Going for a movie next week.”
“So you guys serious?”
“Serious about what?”
“I don’t know, like you love her and everything?”
“I don’t know,” I said.
That is how men talk about their relationships. Nobody knows anything – neither the
questioner nor the answerer.
“Has she said anything?”
“Well, you know how she is. So damn moody all the time. Sometimes she is all cuddly,
holds my hand, and acts cozy at the movies. But when I try something, she stops me and
gives me these lectures on how she is a decent girl and I should learn to behave.”
“What do you do? You are a bastard I know,” Ryan said and started laughing. Screw him.
That is the thing with people who know you well, they judge you before they hear you out.
“I do nothing. Like I mean, do you know we have not even kissed yet. Like I have met her
twenty times, but every time I get the push. She has like this under-the-elbow policy.”
“Sounds like a nice girl. You’re lucky.”
“Screw nice. I don’t want nice.”
That is true, nice people are completely boring. They don’t give you joints, and they don’t
let you kiss them.
“Talk to her then. Tell her to be naughty. I am sure she wants to be bad,” Ryan said.
“Are you crazy? She is a girl; girls never want to be bad.”
“They do. Just that they want it a little less than us.”
I couldn’t imagine Neha wanting to do the same things I wanted to do with her. “I don’t
believe you. Did you ever have a girlfriend?” I said.
“Then don’t believe. Anyway, enough talk about women. Time for another drink and
tape,” Ryan said.
Ryan never talked much about himself. Sometimes, I wondered if he was gay. But he
wasn’t, I mean, I would have known. I practically lived with the guy, and unless he found
me hideously unattractive, I think I would have known. But he wasn’t gay, for he did notice
the heroines in movies, whistled at pretty girls on the street. Maybe he just wasn’t in the
mood for women most of the time.
He changed the tape and put on another Pink Floyd. I saw the levels of the vodka bottle
drop and Ryan scraping through his brown bag for the last joint of the day. A half-moon lit
up the sky, and bright little stars looked smug, winking down at us like students with higher
GPAs.
You know the thing about Floyd? Not only are they damn good, they sound better with
every drink, like the singers designed them for alcohol. Like samosas-chutney, idli-sambhar
or rajma-chawal, Floyd and vodka are in a combo-class of their own.
“You know what today reminds me of?” Ryan said.
“What?”
“The first sem results. You remember?”
“Yes, I do. The first fiver.”
“And after that.”
“What?”
“Fatso left us.”
Ryan still referred to him as Fatso and even though it is derogatory, it was always laced
with indulgence. I know Ryan had not spoken to Alok for the entire past year and he
wouldn’t let me as well. “Don’t go to him. He left us,” he said, and I knew Ryan would do
some serious sulking if I rebelled.
“How come you thought of Alok today?” I asked, rising to see how much vodka
remained. Surely, Ryan had drunk too much to be talking this.
“I just mentioned him today. I think of him more often.”
Ryan in a profound mood. Grass and vodka have mixed to optimal levels.
“Screw him,” I said as the song reached some of my favourite lines.
“What do you think he is doing right now?” Ryan said.
“Who?” I said, “Alok?”
Ryan nodded.
“Probably mugging away with Venkat. I hear he is a six- pointer now,” I said.
“You know Hari, Alok did the right thing.”
“Yeah, right.”
“No, I am serious. You should have left me too. I am not good for you.”
Now what is going on here, I thought. Am I going to have to waste real good dope in
making Ryan feel all wanted and better about himself? I have two options: one, to tell him to
shut up and enjoy the song, two, do what he wants me to do.
“What is the deal Ryan? Not feeling good?”
“No, I am fine. You should have left me. Everyone leaves me. They must be right.”
“What?”
“They do. Dad, Mom, Alok…they all do.”
“No need to be senti, Ryan, just enjoy the evening.”
“You think Fatso was right? You think I did not care for him?” he demanded.
I hate it when people want to be assured, you have no choice but to play ball.
“No Ryan, Alok was wrong. He will realize it someday. Now just close your eyes and
cruise a little,” I advised.
I closed my eyes. The grass and vodka were now in complete control of the policeman in
me, making me see what I wanted to see. I saw Neha sitting next to me, smiling and
embracing me. Her hair, and especially that one soft, floppy lock, brushes me. Her round
faces resembles the moon, or is it that I am actually watching the moon? This is trippy and
the grass is getting the better of me but I want to be gotten the better of. I continued drifting
until Ryan interrupted me.
“You know the best thing about the insti roof?” He stood up, towering over me.
“That no one knows we are here.”
“No. The fact that you always have an option.”
“What option.”
“You can jump over the edge and end it all.”
“Shut up, Ryan.” I struggled to sit up.
“I’m serious. They can do whatever, but I can still control my options.”
“You are too drunk Ryan, I want to go back,” I said, sobering up fast. Sometimes, you
want your commonsense to get the better of you.
We never missed the fluid mechanics class in the fourth sem and the reason was Prof Veera.
That and the fact that the class was at noon and we finally woke up by then. Prof Veera was
completely different. For one, he was like twenty years younger than other profs. No more
than thirty, he dressed in jeans and T-shirt, which bore his US university logos. He had like
five degrees from all the top universities – MIT, Cornell, Princeton etc, and T-shirts from all
of them. He carried this CD-man with him, and after class, he would plug it into his ears
before he left. Students said Prof Veera had just joined the insti, and was not supposed to be
taking a full course so early. However, the prof he was assisting had a heart attack or
something, and Prof Veera had to teach us.
“Hi everyone,” Prof Veera said as he entered class. He offered chewing gum to the first
row students. The front row guys were all mugging nine-pointers, and freaked out at his
offer. They declined, and he shrugged and popped a piece in his mouth and turned to the
board.
“Turbulent flows,” he wrote in big letters on the board.
“Guys, in the first five lectures, we studied simple flows called laminar flows. The shape
and direction of these flows are predictable with the help of formulas and equations. You
know which equation, right?”
He looked around for answers. Unlike other profs, he did not stick to the first row. In fact,
he scavenged at the back. “Okay, I am not going to ask the studious kids all the questions. I
want to ask the cool dudes at the back.”
Ryan and I were chronic backbenchers; out of sight, this was the most defensive position
for the outcaste five-pointers, but Prof Veera did not care.
“Ryan, tell me, which is the first principle equation for laminar flows?”
“Sir, me?” Ryan said, surprised that a Prof would know his name.
“Yes you, Ryan. I know you know the answer.”
“The Navier-Stokes equation.”
“Right. You want to write it down for the class?”
Ryan ran up to the board and the nine-pointers in the front row smirked at a five-pointer
contributing to class. The equation was right though; Ryan doesn’t go up to the board unless
he knows he’s right.
“Perfect, thanks Ryan. By the way, was it you who wrote the impact of lubricant
efficiency on scooter fuel consumption in your last term paper?”
“Well, yes sir.”
“Is it true you actually tested the data on your scooter?”
“Yes I did, sir. Not accurately though.”
“I like that,” Prof Veera said, looking at the nine-pointers who were busy taking frantic
notes like trained parrots. “I really like that.”
Ryan came back to his seat. I could tell he loved fluid mechanics, and most of all, he
loved Prof Veera. He never missed FluMech and he would do anything for Prof Veera.
Others however – the testy design prof, the painfully dull solid mechanics prof and the
assignment-maniac thermodynamics prof – were a different story. Ryan could cut up their
guts with a lathe machine in the machining workshop given a chance.
I met Neha at Priya cinema a week after the FluMech class. I would have said I met my
girlfriend but the damn problem was I was still not sure. I had known her for over a year,
but she called me different things depending on her mood. First, I was just a friend. Then I
was a good friend, then a friend who was special, then really-really good and special
friends or some such crap. For her, calling someone a boyfriend was a big thing. Her dad
had made her promise that she would never have a boyfriend, and she wanted to keep it. Of
course, it did not prevent her from watching movies with me hand in hand every two weeks
for over a year.
“Late again?” she said. I must have been late by like two minutes.
“Had fluMech class. Prof Veera overshot time and we did not even realize it.”
“Prof Veera is that young guy right?”
“Yes, you know him?”
“Not really. Dad mentions him. I think my dad hates him.”
“Your dad sounds like a total...”
She raised her eyebrows.
“Let’s go in. I don’t want to miss the trailers.”
The movie was Total Recall, another sci-fi action crap. That’s the thing about English
theatres in Delhi. They either show action or adult movies. I don’t mind the latter except that
you can’t really take a girl to them. Especially these really nice and good-Indian-traditional
girls like Neha. So, you have the choice of sci-fi action nonsense or a Hindi movie. No selfrespecting
girl will watch a Hindi movie on a date. Hence, there I was again, to watch
Arnold flex his muscles and blow up planets.
“You like sci-fi,” she said as she took her seat.
“I do,” I said. What choice did I have anyway?
“Typical IIT engineer.”
Yeah right. Typical IIT engineers, my girl, don’t skip design class to watch stupid movies.
And then just when I thought it couldn’t get worse, it did. Neha and I took our seats in the
balcony (Rs 35/ticket, total rip-off) and waited for the trailers to begin. However, according
to a new government regulation, the theatre had to screen a ‘family planning documentary’
first.
Okay, so India has this big population. So maybe people should just use some protection
and we would have less new people. Simple enough, right? So you would think. Apparently,
nobody wants to use contraception, so the government has to show people a more permanent
way to not have kids.
The documentary began; a doctor in a government hospital introduced himself with a
beatific smile. He was supposed to be your friend in family planning, though I think he was
the angel of death, especially when he recommended one sure shot procedure – vasectomy.
The documentary showed this mill worker who had this idyllic home where he lived with
his simple wife (who cooked all the time) and two kids. Then one day he sleeps and has a
dream that he has six kids or something (obviously that would have taken a lot of screwing
his wife, but they skipped all that). The kids need more food, education, toys and keep
asking dad for more. But dad is tired from the mill job (not to mention the screwing) and
breaks down. That is when our friend in family planning or angel of death appears.
The doctor had this portable flip-chart with a picture of the male anatomy. He opened it,
and the whole theatre, especially the front rows, started hooting. (Theatres are the opposite
of class lectures, the front row is where the action is.)
Anyway, so all this is going on when I am on my date. I had never approached the topic of
sex (let alone controlling sex) with Neha. But there he was, the angel of death, showing the
exact location of the cuts so that the male organ came under control. I was embarrassed like
every other man in the balcony.
Neha looked at me, noticing I was shifting around in my seat.
“You all right?”
“Don’t you think this is too much? Why do they have show this indecent stuff?”
“What? It is educational.”
“Yeah, right. I need that when I come to see a movie.”
“Oh come on Hari. I actually think it is pretty funny.”
The wife on screen listened carefully to the doctor and smiled at the prospect of sex
without any consequences. I think the doctor and the wife had a thing going, but that was just
my imagination.
To the relief of all, the documentary ended in like half an hour. The mill worker wakes up
and realizes how he must control his family and signs his reproductive facilities away.
Happy ending, smiling faces of wife and kids which turn into cartoons, and the inverted
triangle of the population control department. ‘Small Family Happy Family’ was the last
nugget of wisdom thrown at us before trigger-happy Arnold took over the screen.
Neha held my hand as the movie began. She had grown comfortable with doing this and I
could not hope for anything more. I remembered my last conversation with Ryan. Could
Neha also secretly want to do more than hold hands? Could I just ask her? Should I just
make a bold move?
We went to Nirula’s after the movie for a meal. “So, what is Prof Veera like, tell me,”
Neha said, cutting the pizza we ordered into equal-sized pieces. Girls love organizing food
on a table.
“He is really different,” I said. “Like he doesn’t discriminate between nine-pointers and
five-pointers. And he likes original thinking. Even his assignments push you to think more.”
“Like how?”
“Like he gave a term paper asking students to think about an engineering problem linked
to fluid mechanics. Most profs would have just said, ‘do all the numericals at the end of
Chapter 10’ or something, but Prof Veera invites ideas.”
“Sounds cool. Is he good looking?”
“I think so.”
“Then I should tr y to see him. Maybe I’ll ask dad to invite him home,” she said and
laughed.
A surge of jealousy rose within me. Somehow Prof Veera didn’t seem so nice anymore.
“Go to hell.”
“Hey, are you getting jealous?”
“No, why should I get jealous? I’m not your boyfriend.”
Neha laughed really hard. Jokes only she finds funny. Stupid woman, I feel like cutting off
her cute lock of hair.
“I am just kidding, silly,” she said. “In any case my dad will kill me for that. And he hates
him anyway. But it is nice to see you all worked up.”
“I’m not.”
She held my hand, though she hadn’t stopped laughing. What is so funny to women all the
time? And why do I still find her so beautiful? And why the hell can’t I kiss her?
She stopped laughing and got back her composure. “Sorry, Hari. Don’t feel bad, you are
my sweetest little special friend.”
Now what is that? Another title for the fortnight?
She bent forward to kiss my cheek. Now is my chance, I thought. Give her the illusion that
you don’t care then as soon as her mouth comes to the cheek, jerk once and move your lips
there instead. This is the only way to kiss good Indian women, Ryan told me.
“What are you doing?” Neha pulled back.
I tried to look innocent.
“Were you trying to kiss me on the lips?”
“No.”
“Hari, you know I am not into that.”
Then what the hell are you into? Funny private jokes? Or your stuck-up father?
“Because this is wrong. This spoils everything. Because it feels wrong. You are not a
girl, you won’t understand.”
Yes, I wanted to say, and you are not a guy, so you will not understand. So, should we just
eat our pizza and go home? I didn’t say anything. I had lost my chance, and right then even
my desire. Besides, her face had turned sad. I didn’t want her to be upset. Because we fixed
our next date at the end of the meal. I didn’t want to not fix the next date. “This pizza is
good.”
“You want to meet next Thursday?”
“Sure.”
“I have to buy a gift for a friend’s birthday. Will you come to Connaught Place with me?”
I agreed. I was sick of Priya and all the overpriced dating alternatives around it.
“Cool. I’ll get the car, and pick you up from the ice-cream parlour,” she said.
I scraped through the crumbs on the pizza plate without looking up.
“Venkat, I have certain responsibilities…” Alok said.
“But they aren’t my problem are they? This is the third time this month. It is about time I
stop listening to this sort of stuff,” Venkat said, interrupting him.
It was a chilly February night. The noise came from inside Venkat’s room. Ryan and I
were in the corridor of our wing, returning from one of our visits to the canteen.
“Why are they talking so loudly?” Ryan said.
“I don’t know. Normally muggu Venkat’s room is pretty quiet.”
Ryan put his ear on Venkat’s door.
“What are you doing?” I said.
“Shh... I think they’re having an argument.”
“What do we have to do with it? Let’s go,” I said.
“Shh…come here,” Ryan said.
At some level, even I was curious about the argument. Was it a big one? What was it
about? I put my ear on the door, and every word could be heard loud and clear.
“Alok, this is too much. I mean, I have to study for ten hours a day to keep my GPA. The
least I can expect is to count on my group partners,” Venkat was saying.
“My dad has become unconscious. We are worried he may have had a stroke! Two calls
have come from home...” Alok said.
“Listen, your mom always overplays your dad’s illness. He will recover, how will your
making a trip help?”
“I am the only man in the house Venkat. I want to go. Can’t you take care of it this time?”
“Actually, no. I have to study class notes for other subjects. I don’t think you realize this, I
mean how would you being a five-point something,” Venkat said.
“Realize what?” Alok said.
“That I have to maintain my rank. The second guy in the department is only 0.03 behind
me you know. Now should I finish this group assignment or read my notes?” Venkat said, or
rather shouted.
“Bloody mugger,” Ryan whispered in my ear. I signalled Ryan to keep quiet.
“Venkat you study all the time. Can’t you just…” Alok said.
“I am a nine-pointer, do you understand? I have to maintain my position!” Venkat said,
speaking more to remind himself than to tell Alok.
“But am I not your friend? You know I have to take care of my dad,” Alok said, this time
pleading more than protesting. “Enough!” Venkat said, “this assignment is worth ten percent.
Alok, you can’t go.”
“Venkat please,” Alok said, and voice started to sound like his mother’s, which meant he
was going to cry soon.
“This is too much, I am going in,” Ryan said, kicking the door open. I would have tried to
stop him, but Ryan acted in a nanosecond.
Alok was standing next to Venkat, who sat on the study chair. They turned toward us in
surprise.
“What the...” Venkat said, “Ryan, what are you doing here?”
It was a valid question. What was a five-pointer doing in a nine-pointer’s room? Venkat
looked at Ryan as if a person searching for a bar had reached a temple.
“What’s the problem?” Ryan said, completely ignoring Venkat.
I stood there silently, checking out Venkat’s room. Apart from a bed and a few clothes,
there were just books, books and more books.
“Ryan, it has got nothing to do with you,” Alok said. I could tell he was shocked to see
Ryan, yet somewhere deep down, like he felt his saviour was there.
The pathetic ‘I-will-cry-any-moment’ expression had vanished.
“I said, what’s the problem?” Ryan said.
“I’ll tell you what the problem is,” Venkat said. “We have a Thermo assignment due
tomorrow, and Alok and I are in the same group. It is ten percent. Yet, he wants to go
home…”
“I am not off on some tour, Dad is really sick,” Alok said.
“Do you want me to go?” Ryan asked.
I was left puzzled. One year of silence, and now this sudden offer of help.
Did Ryan really want to get back with Alok or was he just proving what a prick Venkat
was?
“Huh? You? Where...home?” Alok said.
“Yes, I know where you live and I have taken your dad to the hospital before. I have a
scooter too and will get there faster. Or, if you need to go, then I can help you finish the
assignment, except I don’t want to work with this mugger bastard friend of yours,” said
Ryan, stressing on the word ‘friend’.
This was too much. Ryan was acting like a Mother Teresa for Alok. The person Alok had
insulted and left, was today a cure-all fairy from heaven. I looked at Venkat, who looked
like a younger version of any of the anally retentive profs in the institute. He had put enough
oil in his hair to cook an entire Kumaon dinner, his forehead sported an ash-mark from his
devout prayers. Yet, at that moment, it was Ryan who looked like an angel.
“Really?” Alok said.
“So I go then,” Ryan said and stood up. Alok nodded and Ryan left the room.
We remained silent for a minute. Ryan had solved a problem that could save a sick man’s
life and offer a nine-point mugger a future. All with a scooter ride to Alok’s home.
“Well, that settles it then. I’ll leave you to do the thermal assignment,” I said and stood up
to leave the room.
“Wait,” Alok said.
“What?” I said.
Alok walked out of the room with me. Wasting no time, Venkat took out the
thermodynamics book, giving Alok a glance which meant ‘come back soon’.
“Thanks,” Alok said.
“Thank Ryan,” I said.
“Yes, I will. Is he still mad at me?”
“Obviously not, or why would he have gone to your house?”
“But you know Ryan, he could do things for you and yet be mad at you.”
“Yes, he can sulk. But what difference does it make. Just thank him later.” I was getting
irritated with Alok. I didn’t think he had the right to say he knew Ryan anymore, certainly
not as much as me. “Hari?” Alok said. “You think I can come back?” “Come back where?” I
was bewildered. “You know, the three of us again.” “Why? Venkat isn’t working out for
you?” “I didn’t know what I was doing man. I want to move back.” I couldn’t believe my
ears. The difference one year with an obnoxious nine-pointer can make! “You sure?”
“Yes, I am sure.” Alok’s voice was small.
And then, like sentimental fools, we hugged each other. I think Alok was dying for a cry
and he shed a few tears that he always has spare. I was kind of mellow too, I’d never
thought the three of us could be together again. I knew Ryan would do some drama, but
finally he would agree. If he could spend hours taking care of Alok’s half-dad, he certainly
felt something for him. “Good. Welcome back then,” I said.
“Yes. Right after this damn thermal assignment though,” Alok said and we laughed
together for the first time in over a year.
9
—
The Mice Theory
PREDICTABLY, RYAN POUTED OVER PRODIGAL ALOK’S return but not for too long
as it was kind of pointless. After Alok had shed yet more tears, we all bear-hugged and just
like that we were back to being a group once again. Venkat’s hissed curses we ignored
happily because he had his books, but we had each other.
Ryan threw a party to mark the historical event. He did the arrangements himself and that
included cleaning up his room – a Herculean task in itself given he had not disturbed the
layers of dust with as much as a sneeze for several months.
“Why is he calling it the Mice Party though?” puzzled Alok.
“Don’t know. He has this new theory that he is going to launch,” I shrugged.
Ryan had banned us from venturing near his room before the party. I heard him shout
“Fatso, buzz off ” at least six times at Alok. The guest list consisted of me, Alok,
Sukhwinder, Anurag and Vaibhav, who lived in the last room on our floor and always had
vodka in his room. To Ryan that meant he was good friend-material. However, I only later
figured out the real criteria for the guest list; all the guests were in the five-point something
range of scores, were underdogs and lived in the same wing. We all anxiously waited for
ten o’clock for Mr Ryan to open his damn door.
“Come in, guys,” Ryan called out after we had waited outside his room for like an hour,
on the verge of going bananas.
We entered and it was dark, for Ryan had replaced the normal bulbs in the room with red
ones so that a crimson hue spread over the study table, which now doubled as a bar. Ryan
had laid out vodka and rum bottles, juice from the roadside vendor, coke from the canteen,
lemons, ice, sugar and finally, joints for the guests. When ready-made joints are served, you
know the host is someone who gives attention to detail.
That was not all. Nude women adorned the walls, posters extracted from US porn
magazines, which made their way to Kumaon through ex-seniors in innocuous US university
admission brochures via mail. Blondes, brunettes, red-heads, thin, voluptuous and petite,
posed on Ryan’s wall, uniformly wanton.
Alok stared at the posters, his mouth open as if a UFO had landed in his kitchen-sink.
“These women are completely naked,” he managed to gurgle eventually.
Thanks for the insight, Alok. His quality time with Venkat had made him miss out on a lot.
We all sat down on the floor in Ryan’s room, where he had placed cushions for each
guest. The first drinks, the customary ‘cheers’, the challenge to execute ‘bottoms up’
followed and Pink Floyd sang to us.
We finished the first drink soon and Ryan topped us up promptly, and then again. I knew
the alcohol had reached my head when I reached out for the ready-to-smoke joints; I always
ache for a smoke when three drinks buzz inside me.
Surd had his own way of being drunk, by becoming overtly affectionate, kind of spilling
over on to others’ drunken space. He sat next to Alok, putting his arm around his shoulder,
occasionally squeezing, rubbing.
“Great party man. Alok, are you feeling happy-happy?” Surdy asked solicitously.
Alok nodded, delicately removed Surdy’s arm and moved forward to speak. “So Ryan,
what is the big theory that you are going to launch during this party?”
Ryan was sitting across us with Anurag and Vaibhav. “Let’s have a good time first,” he
said.
“I am feeling very good man. Tell us,” Surdy said and replaced his arm around Alok’s
shoulder.
“Yes, yes, tell us,” Anurag and Vaibhav spoke in unison.
“Guys, my theory is called the Mice Theory. But before I tell you that, I need you all to
answer one question.”
“What question?” Anurag said.
“I want you to tell me exactly what you want from life.”
“Yeah whatever,” I said, “Just tell us your damn theory.” I was familiar with Ryan’s
showman tactics. Besides, my brain had too much alcohol to answer deep questions.
“C’mon guys, work with me on this,” Ryan said, “you will appreciate this much more if
you think about your own life first. Just one question – what do you want in life? Think
about it for two minutes.”
We fell silent. Ryan took a commercial break from his theory and refilled everyone’s
drink. I was on drink number four and I had never felt more clueless about life. I watched
everyone else think.
“Okay, enough time,” Ryan said, “Surdy, what do you want?”
Surdy held Alok tighter and dragged him closer. Then he planted a kiss on Alok’s mouth
and whispered intimately to him, “Should I tell him?”
Alok determinedly extracted himself from the affectionate and inebriated grip again and
nodded.
“I just want to reach the US. With my GPA, it’s impossible, but just somehow, someplace,
somewhere I don’t know, I just want to be in the US of A,” Surdy babbled.
Anurag muttered something about inventing a new computer language, and Vaibhav
wanted to start his own business.
I could tell Ryan was not too interested in the others’ life ambitions, yet he politely
nodded to all of them. He wanted to hear from Alok and me.
Ryan nodded at Alok.
“Well, you know it,” Alok said.
“Tell me again.”
“I want to get a job in Delhi, so I can look after my parents and take care of our money
problems.”
“Really?” Ryan said, implying he did not find the response so convincing.
“Of course,” Alok said robustly.
“Really?” Surdy said again, though more out of affection than anything else.
“You, Hari?” Ryan said.
“I don’t know.” I really did not know what I wanted in life. I had thought about the
question. I did not want to have a five-point GPA, and I did not want to be fat and
unattractive. I also did not want to get tongue-tied in the damn vivas every semester. I mean,
I definitely knew what I did not want – as I had it all in that department. But knowing what I
really wanted was difficult.
“Of course you know. Come on, be a sport,” Ryan urged.
Sport, that is Ryan’s word. Ryan is always a sport. And Ryan is always thin and
attractive. And Ryan is always confident and carefree. I hated Ryan. Yet at that point I
realized what I really wanted – I wanted to be Ryan.
“Nothing much,” I said, as I tried to think of an answer. I surely could not tell ever yone I
wanted to be Ryan; after all, Ryan would never want to be someone else.
“Still, say something man. So we can hear the theory,” Alok said.
“I want to be able to kiss my girlfriend, and kiss her any time I want. And even do more,
like go all the way with her.”
I still don’t know why I said what I said. I mean, it was sort of true. Yeah, I did want to
kiss Neha and everything, but I had wanted to say something different.
“Who is your girlfriend?” Surdy turned to me with interest.
“None of your business,” Ryan said briskly.
“Anyway, tell us the theory now, sir,” Alok said. Two drinks down, he did not mind
Surdy’s overtures that much anymore, settling down into the masculine embrace with a
resigned look behind his glasses.
“Gentlemen,” Ryan said, sitting on the bed. He was now above us all physically,
showering our uptilted heads with his gospel knowledge. “Thank you for coming tonight. As
I am sure you have figured out, you are the lowest GPA holders in our wing. We are,
gentlemen, the underdogs. Cheers to the underdogs.”
Though Ryan was shamelessly working us up, we felt special at being the failures in the
IIT grading system, and held up our hands high to a big ‘cheers’.
“And this IIT system is nothing but a mice race. It is not a rat race, mind you, as rats
sound somewhat shrewd and clever. So it is not about that. It is about mindlessly running a
race for four years, in every class, every assignment and every test. It is a race where profs
judge you every ten steps, with a GPA stamped on you ever y semester. Profs who have no
idea what science and learning are about. Yes, that is what I think of the profs. I mean, what
have IITs given to this country? Name one invention in the last three decades.”
Silence ran through the party crowd as Ryan’s speech became serious. I hoped Ryan was
really drunk, for there was no other excuse for such patronizing crap at a party.
“Anyway,” Ryan continued, “screw the profs. Coming back, this system is an unfair race.
If you are a mouse who thinks or pauses to make friends with other runners, or stops to
figure out what you want to do in life, or drag baggage from the past,” Ryan said, looking at
Alok, “then you will be pushed behind. As we have been pushed behind by morons like
Venkat.”
Surdy blew a flying kiss. I guess that meant he approved.
“But we can change all that,” Ryan said.
“How?” Anurag said. At least someone was listening to this trash.
“By living on our own terms. By being rats, not mice, work together and beat the system. I
will not give up my friends for this system. In fact, my friendships will beat the system.”
“How?” Anurag said again.
“That is for me and my close friends. You only get the theory, I did not say you get the
practicals.”
“We are not your friends?” Surdy asked, his tone dipping emotionally.
“Of course you are. But I can only do this with my close friends.”
No one else protested. If nothing else, Ryan’s theory formed core entertainment at the
party. One vodka bottle, ten joints and three cassettes of Floyd later, the speech was just
part of the evening. At one a.m. the others left. Alok and I helped Ryan clear the mess.
“That was a good party,” Alok said.
“I know, Fatso. You missed out on all this with the bastard Venkat,” Ryan said, and
staggered to his feet.
“So, what is with the implementation of the theory? How does that work?” I spoke idly.
“C2D,” Ryan said.
“What the hell is that?” It sounded like a code in those damn sci-fi movies.
“Cooperate,” Ryan said and fell on his bed, only half-intentionally.
“Cooperate?”
“Yes, Cooperate to dominate, C2D…” Ryan said and closed his eyes. All that work for
the party and the vodka had taken their toll. He had passed out.
“Come, fellow mouse, let’s go to our room,” Alok said.
The party was over.
I was in the machining lab with Ryan when I remembered my date with Neha the next day.
This time, madam had asked for a gift. She made this whole big deal about how I actually
never give her anything, and how other girls got gifts from their friends. I mean, it was
asinine logic if you ask me, as there were things she could be giving me, and without much
capital investment. To have the nerve to ask for a gift on top of this deprivation is something
only a woman can do, as they are made differently after all. Anyway, I’d promised her I
would not come without a gift and then had totally forgotten about it.
“Tomorrow morning?” Ryan said “How will you get a gift by then?”
“I don’t know, I just forgot. Man, will she sulk! I’ll just buy some chocolates, bloody
expensive they are though.”
“Yeah, but chocolates? That is not original at all. No wonder she doesn’t give you any,”
Ryan said.
“Well whatever. You have any bright ideas?” I was irritated at his conclusions, which
were probably right.
“Think man, think.”
We thought for several minutes and threw out most ideas; clothes too expensive, perfumes
too frivolous, books impersonal and so on. I had neither time nor taste to improvise.
“Make something for her.” Ryan snapped his fingers.
“What?”
“Like, make an object right here, in the lab. A handmade original, from an engineer, how
neat is that?”
It seemed like an interesting idea, even though completely impractical. And what if she
was expecting me to spend some money.
“Make what?”
“I don’t know. Think of some simple device she could use.”
I tried to think of Neha’s life. She had this big purse full of things. “How about a little box
to keep her lipsticks? They kind of keep rolling out of her purse when she takes things out.”
“Now you are thinking customer needs. Ok, lipstick box. How many lipsticks max?”
“Three…four.”
“And size of a lipstick?”
“No idea. Say three inches by one inch by one inch.”
“Cool. So, say we stack them two by two…and then we design with sheet metal of
thickness…”
I saw Ryan transform from the irreverent IIT underdog he purported to be into this
passionate scientist over my stupid lipstick box. For the first time ever, he pored over an
engineering drawing like he really wanted to make one. He thought of other clever things, a
snap-up lid, a little mirror, and her name etched on top.
After the designing, he broke up the task into various parts; cutting, bending, buffing – all
concepts we found boring as hell in class were now suddenly interesting. We forgot about
the actual assignment for the day, as we gave a damn about our grades anyway.
Three hours later, I etched out the last few letters of ‘Neha Cherian’ on her made-in-IIT
lipstick box.
“This is pretty neat,” I said, impressed at the snap-open mechanism, “she will love this.
Thanks, Ryan.”
“Any time man,” he raised his thumb. Yes, I really wanted to be like Ryan, who I loved
most of the time. At least I hated him less than myself.
I presented Neha’s gift to her at our ice-cream parlour.
“What? What did you say this is?” She twisted the metallic cigarette box-sized case
round and round in her hands.
“It is a lipstick holder,” I said.
“Really? Never heard of them.”
I asked her for her lipsticks. She had five, which meant our design was below capacity.
Anyway, I took four – red, copper, brown and pink (why girls put coloured wax on their
bodies continues to be a mystery to me) and placed them inside. Snug fit, snap cover – the
design worked perfectly. One surface had a mirror, so the user could apply the coloured
wax accurately and not paint their nostrils in the bargain.
“Why lipstick case?”
“I don’t know. I like your lips I guess,” I said.
“Very funny. And you made this?” she said.
“Yes, with Ryan. See, it is personalized.” I turned the box to its lower surface. ‘Neha
Cherian’, the most beautiful name in the world was written in the most beautiful letters.
“Wow,” Neha said softly, and then fondled the lipstick holder from the IIT Delhi
machining lab like it was a newborn baby. “Wow,” she said again.
“What?” I said. (Okay, so I was fishing for a little more appreciation here than the
monosyllabic ‘wow’.)
“No one has done anything like this for me,” Neha said.
And it was at this moment that by pure chance I came out with the right line. I don’t know
how it came to me, but it just did. “Well, no one has meant more to me in life.”
Maybe it was not completely true. But it wasn’t all lies either (and in any case, it is about
saying the right thing to girls, who gives a damn if it is true or not. I am Hari, not
Harishchandra).
“Really?” Neha asked.
“Yes.”
“Thanks, Hari. See I am going to use it right now,” she said.
I watched Neha’s face as she applied her lipstick with the same concentration as Alok
had when doing quanti problems. Girls are beautiful, let’s face it, and life is quite, quite
worthless without them.
“What time you got to go home?” I said.
“Say by nine,” Neha said. “I told them I’m meeting girlfriends for dinner.”
“Wow, pretty liberal of them,” I said sarcastically.
“They know I was feeling down. Thinking of Samir again.”
“Hey, you want me to take you to a secret place?” I said.
“Where?”
“The insti roof.”
“What? Are you crazy. Right on top of the insti, as if there could be a worse place for
going public!”
“There is no one there. Ryan and I have gone dozens of times. And the view from the bell
tower is beautiful.”
I could see Neha was excited about the roof. It took me a few minutes of persuasion,
convincing her that no one would find out, as we could follow her standard ‘five minutes
apart’ policy to walk up there.
“I’ll go. But not today. It’s close to nine. How about next time, and I’ll cry for Samir the
whole day so they let me go out until eleven.”
I didn’t really dig her idea of using her brother as a weapon to stay out late but her
parents were certified weirdos and probably deserved such tactics.
“Next time meet me on the roof directly, at eight-thirty.”
“Sure,” she said, “you said it is safe, right?”
“Yes, trust me,” I winked.
10
—
Cooperate to Dominate
“HERE, ONE COPY FOR EACH OF YOU.” RYAN HANDED OUT papers to us with the
title: THE C2D PLAN.
I had forgotten about the C2D theory, but obviously Ryan hadn’t. He had in fact been
working on the official document. We were sitting at Sasi’s and Alok was busy with his
second plate of paranthas, when Ryan dished out his plan for the rest of our IIT stay.
“Whassit?” Alok’s greasy fingertips left marks on the sheet, obviously needing a tissue
more than an IIT plan. There was something about Alok with his food that was too intimate
to be watched.
I read out the contents.
Cooperate to Dominate. The IIT system is unfair because:
1. It suppresses talent and individual spirit.
2. It extracts the best years of one’s life from the country’s brightest minds.
3. It judges you with a draconian GP A system that destroys relationships.
4. The profs don’t care for the students.
5. IIT s have hardly contributed to the country .
“You have the time to do all this?” was Alok’s response, which was stupid because Ryan
had all the time in the world.
I read on: So, the only way to take on the unfair system is through unfair means – which is
Cooperate to Dominate or C2D. And this is the plan that Ryan, Hari and Alok agree to for
the rest of their stay at the insti. The key tenets are:
1. All assignments to be shared – one person will do each assignment by turn. The others
will simply copy it. Saves time, saves duplication of ef ort.
2. We will divide up the course responsibilities. For instance, if there are six courses in
the semester, we will take care of only two each. One must attend all classes that one is
responsible for, but can skip all others. (note: Ryan gets all Prof Veera courses) In each
class you attend for your course – take copious notes. The rest will merely copy them.
3. We share lab experiment observations.
4. Our friendship is above GPAs. With all the new spare time, we live our lives to the
fullest.
5. We combine our hostel rooms into one living unit – one common bedroom, one study
room and one fun party room.
6. We split the cost of vodka regardless of how many drinks each person has had.
Ryan looked at us as if he was expecting us to break into applause. We kept silent, hoping
he would explain where he was going with this.
“So, what do you guys think?” he asked.
“What is this? Some kind of teenage club thing?”
“If you agree, sign it. Sign it with your blood.”
“Yeah right,” I said, “How old are we, like twelve?”
“I am serious man,” Ryan said and then before we could say anything, he flicked out a
razor blade from his pocket. In one nick, his thumb sprouted a dot of red.
“Ryan, are you crazy?” Alok squeaked, almost losing his breakfast at this gross act.
“No. Just want to drive the point home. You decide what you want to do,” Ryan said,
signing the document with a toothpick dipped in his blood.
“Can we discuss this first?” I said.
“What is there to discuss? I am not forcing anyone.”
“Like this whole sharing assignments and observations. Isn’t that heating?” Alok said.
I agreed with Alok, though I was more concerned about the vodka costs, given that Ryan
out-drank us ever y single time.
“It is not cheating, it is cooperation. They have divided us with their GPAs, we are just
pulling together to fight back.”
“I don’t see it that way,” I insisted.
“Are you signing or not?” Ryan put his hands on his hips.
I thought about the C2D one last time. “Well. I can sign it, though I am not cutting myself
or anything.”
“It just takes a second,” Ryan said and flicked the blade on my forefinger and blood
spouted out of me before I could form my denial.
“Fuck you.”
Ryan laughed and said, “Sorry man, look at your face. C’mon man, get into the spirit. Just
sign it.”
I looked at Ryan in disgust and signed the sheet.
Alok sat there, petrified like a chicken in a butcher shop. The old Alok would have
vociferously stood up to Ryan, but the new, improved version, just back with us, did not
want to fight again. “I’ll make the cut myself,” he said finally.
And soon he did get some blood from his little finger and we signed the C2D document
like primitive tribesmen. I have to say, the whole blood thing made this feel important. I was
not sure of what I had done, but somehow it sounded exciting. We converted our three single
rooms into one apartment the same day. Ryan’s room became the party room, Alok’s was the
study room with three tables and my room had the three beds.
“So you friends moved in together,” Neha said.
We were en route to the insti roof as per plan. She met me at eight p.m., her parents
blissfully ignorant about her real whereabouts, picturing her by a cake at a non-existent
friend’s birthday party.
“Yes, sort of. We combined our rooms to one living unit,” I said, panting as we climbed
the back stairs to the building.
“Sounds exciting,” she said, blowing the fringe out of her eye.
It was already dark when we reached the roof. As always, there was no one there.
“Wow, look at all the stars,” Neha said.
“Yes,” I said, proud as if I had finger-painted the sky myself. “And it’s all ours. Check out
the campus view. See – that’s where you live,” I pointed.
We couldn’t see much, apart from the lights in the living room.
“Wow. We are so near to them, yet so far,” Neha said dreamily, flopping on the concrete
floor. “So?”
“So what?” I said.
“Where is the vodka? Don’t you guys drink here?”
“Yes. But you don’t drink, do you?”
“Says who? I’ll have one if you have some.”
“We do hide a bottle under the bell. Let me look,” I said, surprised at Neha’s request. She
was a nice girl, I thought. Nice girls do not drink. But I kind of could do with a drink myself,
so I came back with the bottle.
“Nice,” she said, as she lay back against the dish antenna, “look at the stars above, just so
beautiful. I wish I were a bird.”
When people want to be birds, they are normally getting drunk. But she was getting trippy
just from the idea of drinking on the insti roof.
“Oh, I could lie here forever. Give me another drink,” she said.
“Don’t have too much,” I had to caution.
“I won’t. My dad will kill me if he smells it.”
“Of course you’ll smell of it.”
“Not much, check this out.”
She opened her purse. Ten items later, she took out a pack of cardamom pods.
“See, one of these and I go home minty fresh.”
“Really? Then have one now, be minty for me.”
“What? Do I have bad breath?” she sat up straighter.
“I did not say that.”
She held my arm and pulled me toward her. “Look me in the eye and tell me if I have bad
breath.”
“I don’t know. I have never been that close to your mouth,” I said honestly, even as the
millimeters between our mouths lessened.
“Go to hell,” she laughed and pushed me away.
“See, you are chicken. Just so chicken,” I said.
“No, I am not. Look at me, a professor’s daughter, getting drunk on the insti roof with a
five point something loafer.”
If she had not been laughing, I would have resented that, but I decided to milk the
opportunity anyway.
“Loafer? So I am a loafer,” I said.
“Yes, but…”
“But what?”
“But I love my loafer,” she said and pulled me toward her again. Again, our mouths were
millimeters away. She tilted her head sideways. Was she going to kiss me? Or rather, was
she-plus-two-glasses-of-vodka going to kiss me?
“We don’t need no ejju-kay-shion…” a hoarse singing voice startled us from our
embrace. Someone had just come to the insti roof.
“What the…” Neha said, “I thought you said no one was here.”
“I don’t know. Shh…quiet,” I said as we tried to hide behind the antenna.
I finally recognized Ryan’s voice through all that bad singing and saw him heading for our
vodka hiding place.
“It’s Ryan!” I said in a voice mixed with relief and irritation at losing my moment.
“Ryan,” I shouted.
“Hari,” he shouted back, walking over. “Bastard, you are here and I was looking all over
for you. Is there someone with you?”
“Ryan, I want you to meet…”
“It’s a girl!” Ryan exclaimed as if he had spotted me with a dead rabbit. Neha continued
to cower behind me, attempting anonymity.
“It’s Neha,” I said. “Neha, meet Ryan. Ryan, be nice and say hello to Neha.”
Ryan’s voice mellowed down instantly. What is it with men; they become another person
in female company. So predictable!
“Hi Neha,” Ryan said, trying to avoid staring too much at someone he had heard so much
about.
“Hi,” Neha said, still unsure if Ryan could be trusted.
“I was just looking for Hari to do an assignment,” Ryan said.
“Drop it Ryan. We’re having a drink,” I said.
“Really?” Ryan said as if he expected Neha to be winged and haloed or something. “But I
thought Neha was not like that.”
“Like what?” she asked immediately.
“Uh, nothing,” Ryan said and sat down on the warm concrete.
“So what have you heard about me?” Neha said.
“Lots,” Ryan said and started telling her sacred details about all our past dates. They kept
talking for like ten hours or something and I just kept getting more drunk. Ryan has a
computer memory or something, and he told her about the times even I had forgotten about.
“He told you about the family planning documentary?” Neha tittered.
“Of course, he tells me everything,” he said with considerable pride.
I wondered if Neha and I would have kissed and managed more if bloody Ryan had not
dragged himself up here. I considered pushing him off the insti roof, but thought it would
kind of spoil the mood anyway.
“So why did you say I wasn’t that type of girl?” Neha said.
“You know, the whole vodka thing. You are supposed to be well…forget it,” Ryan said.
“What? Tell me,” Neha said with a firmness only good-looking women possess.
“You are like this good girl. Like why else won’t you let him do anything? Dating for a
year, still no kiss even. Just this goody-goody prof’s daughter.”
“He told you that?” Neha squeaked.
“Of course. You think you are dating a guy or someone asexual? You don’t think he has
needs?”
“Shut up, Ryan.” This from me.
“C’mon man. Show some guts sometimes. This is for your own good.”
“Needs?” Neha repeated, dazed.
“Yes, ever y man has needs. And pretty girls like you are either not aware of them or deny
them for power games.”
“Power?” Neha repeated.
I wanted to tell Ryan I had just been getting somewhere nicely, thank you, when he
whistled by.
“Yes, power. What else?” Ryan said, calming down finally.
“I crave power? Now that is a joke. You guys just don’t understand women do you?”
Neha said, with a vodka-infused confidence that could take on even Ryan.
“Huh?” Ryan said, proving that we really did not understand women.
Neha had to go home soon after that, so we left the topic there. I wanted to scream at
Ryan later, but he rolled two joints for me and gave me a scooter ride back to Kumaon, so I
left it. Besides, Neha really did not seem mad or anything.
I had a hunch he might have helped my case!
I Love u Rachu
Dear Frnds pls spread this msg until its reach to my rachu
I thinks see knows my name
Downloaded from EBOOK4IN.BLOGSPOT.COM
11
—
The Gift
I AM A HORRIBLE PERSON ON THE INSIDE AND THIS I demonstrated while fitting in
Alok for the morning classes, citing his practice of waking early during those Venkat days,
laying on thickly the unreliability of Ryan and me for any sunrise job.
C2D was great, I found out, as I was responsible for only two courses in a semester. For
the rest, Alok and Ryan gave me all the assignments (which I copied) and their notes (which
I photocopied). I returned the favour in my courses. We now needed to spend only an hour
or two a day in studies, leaving us with plenty of time for movies, scooter drives,
restaurants, chess, scrabble, indoor cricket, sleep, squash (yes, Ryan was trying again) and
of course, booze and grass. The first minors that semester were a breeze. We didn’t like ace
the class or anything, but our expectations were low – just maintaining our five-point GPAS.
It is amazing how happy one can be with low expectations of one’s self.
I was in the design class one day, a course for which I was responsible. Ryan chose to
attend the class with me. I think he believes he is like this great designer or something. Prof
Vohra was teaching us.
“Class, note down this problem that I want you to do in the next fifteen minutes. Design a
car jack to lift the chassis in case of flat tires etc. Do a simple sketch.”
Prof Vohra was a portly man in his fifties, who had an unusually kind face for a Prof. Of
course, nothing in his nature supported this. With six term papers a semester and a lethal red
pen that crossed out one design submission after another, kind was hardly how you’d
describe Prof Vohra.
It was my course, therefore my hand that had to sketch the car jack with Ryan merely
having to copy it. Prof Vohra had taught us enough for us to execute at least a basic screwtype
design. I had just begun to draw when Ryan said, “What? You are going to make the
same damn thing like the rest?”
“Yes sir, I am not Thomas Edison,” I said, “and this is my course so just shut up and copy
it.”
“I have another idea,” Ryan said.
I wanted to tell Ryan to screw his other idea and copy my screw-jack. But I never say
anything to Ryan, and he never listens to anyone anyway.
So Ryan drew this ‘modified screw-jack’, in which one did not manually have to open
and raise the jack. A flat tire did not mean the engine had failed, he said, hence one could
attach a motor on the traditional jack and hook it up to the car battery. If one switched on the
car ignition, the motor could derive power.
“What are you doing?” I said, worried about Ryan’s sketches of the car battery, obviously
irrelevant to the current task.
“You wait and see, the prof will love it,” Ryan said.
I stuck to my traditional screw-jack like the rest of the class. The course was called
Design, not Original Design after all.
Prof Vohra walked along the class rows, looking at the familiar designs that all his
students drew year after year – the simple screw-jack. His stroll ended at our desk.
“What is this?” Prof Vohra said, twisting his head around to make sense of Ryan’s
unfamiliar drawing.
“Sir, this is a modified screw-jack,” Ryan said, “It can be attached to the car’s
battery….”
“Is this an electrical engineering class?”
“No sir but the end need is the same...”
“Is this an internal combustion engines class?”
“Sir but…”
“If you don’t want to be in my class or follow my course, you may leave.”
Prof Vohra’s face no longer looked kind. If only Ryan had kept quiet, he would have
moved on.
“Sir, this is a new design,” Ryan said, as if it was not painfully obvious.
“Really? And who told you to do that?”
Ryan did not answer, just lifted his assignment sheet. Then in one stroke, he ripped it
apart in two pieces.
“There, it is useless now,” Ryan said.
Prof Vohra’s face contorted and turned red, “Don’t act smart in my class.”
“Sorry sir,” I said, though it was not for me to say it.
But it broke the tension. The prof and Ryan looked at me via the corners of their
respective eyes. Prof Vohra exhaled and moved on; Ryan sat down.
“That wasn’t very smart. You know he can flunk you,” I said to Ryan after class.
“I don’t care. I can’t wait to get out of this stupid place man,” he said, kicking the scooter
stand as if it was Prof Vohra’s face.
It wasn’t Ryan’s course anyway and he did not attend any further classes in design. He
directly copied answers of my assignments mindlessly, and never as much as looked at the
question-sheet. Yes, our greatest designer gave up.
The three of us were in our common study room one day, copying Alok’s thermal science
assignment.
“So, Prof Vohra is mad at you now,” Alok said.
Ryan kept silent.
“Of course he would be. You should have seen his face,” I contributed.
Alok laughed, shaking his head.
“He can flunk me for all I care,” Ryan stated.
“That is not the point,” Alok began.
“Fatso, you won’t get the point, so give up. By the way, Prof Veera called me to talk
about my lubricant assignment.”
“Really?” Alok and I said in unison, wondering if Prof Veera had caught us cheating.
“Nothing to worry guys. I gave him a separate paper. It wasn’t a class assignment.”
“You have time to do separate papers?” I said.
“I have time to do what I want. I had thoughts on doing some experiments with various
substance mixtures to check lubricant efficiency in a scooter engine.”
“Where?” I said.
“Well, ideally in the fluid mechanics lab. But then we need a scooter engine, and a small
budget to buy materials. Until then, I tried a few tests on my scooter.”
“Wow. you’re screwing your scooter up. How will we travel?” I said.
“It is for science. I might be on to something. Anyway, I combined different types of oils
to check mileage. I think I can beat normal lubes by ten percent.”
I have to say, I was impressed with Ryan. Against all odds, this man was working to
reduce our petrol bill. I thought of all the extra paranthas we could buy with a ten percent
lower fuel cost.
“So, what did Prof Veera call you for?” Alok said.
“He said he’d help me get the institute’s permission to use the lab and get some research
grant.”
“Wow! You will be a scholar man,” Alok said.
“Yeah whatever,” Ryan shrugged, “It is not that easy. One has to submit a proposal to Prof
Cherian, detailing budgets, benefits, timing and all that crap, then a committee decides. It
takes months.”
“But if you do get it...” Alok blinked rapidly, “so neat man.”
“I have to work hard on the proposal over the next few weeks. Don’t worry, I’ll do my
courses, but no partying or movies,” Ryan said.
Now, if Alok had said the same thing, Ryan would have blown a fuse. But this was Ryan,
and we never said anything to him. Besides, I was kind of glad he was into something
sensible.
“Sure, we’ll tell you what you missed,” I said and winked at Alok.
“Yeah, though that makes you the mugger now,” Alok said.
“I am not a mugger. You are the mugger, Venkat-boy,” Ryan retorted.
I have to say, it was never my thing to visit Alok’s house. Just the thought assailed me with
medicine smells, crumbling concrete and cooking smells, topped by a middle-aged woman
wailing at the drop of a hat. Yet, there I was one Saturday with Alok, if only because Ryan
was busy with his do-not-disturb-me lube research proposal. It was depressing to see Ryan
work so hard and he did like three night-outs one week in the computer centre and the
library. On top of that, he spent his days in the fluid mechanics lab mixing lubes and then
testing them on the scooter. I told him about this movie at Priya in which there were as many
as six topless scenes and he only looked blankly at me. I tried luring him with new cocktail
recipes, but Ryan stuck to six straight cups of coffee a night. Objectives, scoping, budgeting,
applications, past research – each section in his proposal was like a million pages. He
submitted drafts to Prof Veera, who almost always wanted Ryan to do more.
So when Alok asked me to his house for lunch I found myself agreeing if only for the
food. I had learnt to ride now and Ryan’s scooter was free that day (though Ryan did give us
the task of noting down the kilometres back and forth).
Delhi roads are a nightmare and I couldn’t dream of driving as fast as Ryan. Alok and I
couldn’t go beyond fifty, and Alok kept talking as I navigated the cows and the cops to the
suburbs.
“You think Ryan will get the project?” Alok said, sitting pillion.
“I think so. His proposal alone is eighty pages, which I think is a project in itself. And I
mean, it is original work.”
“Yes, but you know he has to put a cover sheet on the proposal.”
“So?”
“The cover sheet carries the student’s name and GPA. You think they’ll fund a five-point
something?”
“Why not? They’ll read the proposal and decide.”
“They are profs,” Alok said, “and you know how they think.”
“Prof Veera is with him.”
“Yeah, let’s see.”
We reached Alok’s house in an hour. I kind of stopped breathing to skip the medicine
smells. Of course, couldn’t do without oxygen forever but luckily Alok’s mom laid out the
food soon.
“Alok, see I have made paneer for you and your friend,” his mother said.
For a poor family, Alok’s family ate quite well. I mean, there was rice, rotis, daal, gobialoo,
mango chutney, raita and of course, matar-paneer. I guess that explained the
corpulence running in the family.
“Eat beta, eat. Don’t be shy,” Alok’s mother egged me on.
The food was delicious but the conversation tasteless. Alok’s mother recounted her last
week, which was full of problems. The funny thing was almost all her problems had one
solution – more money. On Monday, the five-time-repaired geyser had broken down and
there was no money for a new one. On Wednesday, the TV antenna took a toss and a new
one was too expensive. The family had to live with grainy reception until they could save
some money. On Friday, Alok’s father fell off the bed, which required a doctor to come
home, another hundred bucks. There were other stories too – the ration shop had started
charging double for sugar, and the maid had ditched twice that week.
“Ma, can you stop boring my friend,” Alok said.
“No, it’s fine,” I said, reaching for more daal. Actually, the life Alok’s mother led at
home intrigued me. Somehow, her clutching her sari to wipe her tears had been the only
image I had been stuck with for the past year but now I realized she had a life too. The
challenges she faced were not quite lube research proposals, but pricey tomatoes
nonetheless.
“And you know the sofa springs are coming out…” she was saying when Alok interrupted
her.
“Mom, can you please keep quiet. I have come home after a month and that is all you have
to tell me.”
She looked surprised. “Who else will I tell my problems to? I have only one son.”
“Enough mom,” Alok said, his face turning red like an expensive tomato.
“I will keep quiet,” Alok’s mom agreed and started mumbling to herself as she ate her
food, “earn for them, then work like a servant for them and then they don’t even want to
listen to you. Physics teacher Mrs Sharma tells me, these days sons forget their parents.”
Clang, Alok threw his plate on the floor. Bits of lunch splattered all across the living
room and he got up and left the room.
What was I supposed to do? Follow my friend, who had brought me here? Or sit and
watch Alok’s mother wipe her tears with her sari? I decided to do none of the above,
focusing on the matar-paneer. The food was good, that is what I came here for, I kept telling
myself, looking intently at the plate.
Needless to say, it wasn’t a happy visit home. Alok kind of cooled down, came back to
the living room, and sat on the sofa. Alok’s mother cried her stock of tears, and went in to
get kheer.
“Alok, what are you doing man?”
“You stay out of this Hari. You won’t understand.”
Yeah right, I should stay out of this, I thought. But he was the one who had got me into
this.
“She has made kheer and everything. What is your problem?”
“They are my problem. You won’t understand, shut up and wait for the kheer.”
We did wait for the kheer, which was perfect. I was sure that Alok’s family could solve
half their problems if they stuck to a more frugal diet but good food seemed vital to them,
even at the cost of TV reception. It was their situation, so I stayed out of it until we were on
our way back.
“I know what you are thinking,” Alok said.
“What?”
“That how can I be so heartless.”
The only thing I had thought about Alok’s heart was that it would be under tremendous
strain with such a fat-intensive diet.
“Nah, just haven’t seen you like that,” I said as I turned on the Munirka crossing,
narrowly avoiding a peanut seller.
“That is all they talk to me about; problems, problems and more problems,” Alok said,
“and what can I bloody do about them?”
“Hmmm. That is true,” I said, wondering if Alok was now telling me a problem I couldn’t
do anything about.
Vivas – the most hated, dreaded moments of my student life. I avoided them like I did cows
on the road with their tails twitched up. But like the cattle in Delhi traffic, sometimes you
just couldn’t avoid running into them. And this one Wednesday was the design viva. It was
my course under the C2D, and I was supposed to take the lead on all questions. I tried to
convince Ryan and Alok to help me, but the bastards didn’t care and had gone to sleep at ten
the previous night, leaving me to mug through the night and prepare for all expected
questions. It wasn’t much use, for in my case it wasn’t about knowing the answers.
“Hari, what makes C40 steel better than C20 steel for making rigid structures?”
More carbon in C40, hence harder steel, I thought. Also, probably cheaper in terms of
costs. C20 was soft and could buckle. I knew the answer… if only Prof Vohra would stop
looking me in the eye.
“Sir, C40 steel is…” I said as I looked back at Ryan and Alok to evoke some pity.
“Look at me Hari,” Prof Vohra said, “I am asking you.”
I didn’t want to look at him, and I really wanted to get the answer out. But all I got out
was fat drops of sweat, on my face, arms and hands.
Four tries and three different questions later, Prof Vohra gave up. Ryan shook his head
and smiled, as if he’d known all along that this would happen. Alok kept quiet, as he
mentally calculated how many marks we had lost.
“Sorry guys,” I said at dinner, “I let you down again. I hate vivas man.”
The mess workers tossed rotis that you could make jeans out of; I tore one hard, hoping to
relieve my tension.
“What happens to you?” Alok said.
“I don’t know. Whenever someone asks me a question in a stressful situation, I can’t say
anything.”
“Since when?” Alok said.
“Since high school,” I said.
“Something happened?” Ryan said.
“No…I mean yeah, nothing,” I said.
“What?” Alok said.
“Forget it. Pass the rice, I can’t digest these rotis. They are like chewing gum,” I said.
Neha’s birthday was on December 1 and as usual I was clueless about what to get her.
“You have to make it special,” Ryan said. We were skipping class and having lunch in the
canteen.
“Special how? I have no cash. I can’t even afford toothpaste right now,” I said.
“You are not brushing your teeth?” Alok said, looking up.
“No man I’m using Ryan’s,” I said. “Anyway, come to the point Fatso, what should I do?”
“Think,” Ryan said, knocking his head like he was solving a nuclear physics problem. He
is a patronizing bastard, I tell you.
“I can’t think of anything,” I said. “No more ‘make-your-own-gifts’, did that with the
lipstick box already, so it won’t have the same effect. And I am so broke, I can’t give her
something expensive.”
“How about something useful but cheap, like handkerchiefs?” Alok said.
“Shut up Alok,” Ryan said.
I was glad he said it for me. Alok had as much of an idea of romantic gifts as his mother
had about cabarets.
“Ryan, what should I do?” I was panicking.
“Well, it doesn’t have to be expensive, as long as it’s a surprise. Who doesn’t like
surprises?”
“Like what?” I said.
“Like being the first one to wish her,” Ryan said.
Ryan’s plan was quite original (and cheap); to break into her room, right through her
window on the eve of her birthday. At midnight, I would be the first one to wish her and the
surprise would sweep her off her feet (and hence eliminate the need for a real gift). It was a
crazy idea, for we weren’t just breaking into my girlfriend’s house, but a prof ’s house, that
too a head of the department no less. But Ryan made it seem easier than copying a
thermodynamics assignment, and I agreed.
So, at eleven-thirty p.m. on a cold December night, Ryan, Alok and I quietly slipped out
of Kumaon. Ryan drove us to the faculty housing complex and parked his scooter fifty
meters from Neha’s house. The entire lane was silent in contrast with Kumaon where the
assignments and mugging had only just begun for the night. The profs slept blissfully, while
their minions worked away through the night.
“Ryan, you sure we can handle this?” I asked one last time as we neared the lawns of
Prof Cherian’s house.
“Shhh… of course, we can, but if only you keep quiet,” Ryan said as he lifted the latch off
Cherian’s gate.
Silence, apart from a gentle creaking of the gate as we entered the den of the beauty and
the beast.
I looked up at Neha’s window, imagining her sleeping peacefully, her beautiful face
glowing in the dark. My heart quickened.
“Alok, come on you go first. On the pipe now,” Ryan whispered.
“This is impossible,” Alok said.
“I’ll give you a push,” Ryan said.
As he climbed up the flimsy steel pipe, he looked like a gorilla hanging onto a bamboo
stick. There was serious risk of the pipe breaking, given his mass and the strength of
galvanized steel (see, our engineering knowledge did amount to something), so we decided
to wait until he reached the roof.
After Alok it was my turn, followed by Ryan, who shimmied up the pipe in seconds. Ten
minutes to midnight, we were on Prof Cherian’s roof.
It was pitch dark. Ryan finally switched on a flashlight and we tried to navigate through
the water tanks and clothes left to dry on the roof.
“Where is her room?” Ryan whispered.
I pointed mutely and we moved toward the ledge.
“Here are the flowers,” Ryan said as he pulled out a bunch of sunflowers from under his
shirt.
“Where did you get these?” I said.
“Just now, from Cherian’s garden.”
“Are you crazy?” I said.
“Nice touch,” Ryan said, “now get ready.”
We knocked on Neha’s window using some pebbles from the roof. Nothing happened at
the first pebble, nothing on the second and third.
“It’s not working, she probably sleeps too deeply,” Alok said.
“Keep trying,” Ryan said.
We kept throwing little pebbles like morons. Probably a million pebbles later, we had a
reaction. The room light switched on, and the window became bright.
Climbing up a pipe was hard enough, but the next step was the real killer. I was supposed
to dangle myself over the ledge, with Alok and Ryan holding my hands for emergency
support. But first Neha had to open the window.
“Quick, say her name before she screams in fear,” Ryan said.
“Neha, it’s me,” I said, not whispering for the first time in half an hour.
“Hari,” Neha said as she opened her window, “What are you doing here?”
“I can explain. Let me come in first,” I said, and sprung myself over.
“Are you crazy?” she said and rubbed her eyes even as my legs dangled in front of her
face.
“Careful Ryan,” I said.
“Who else is there?” Neha said, by now completely awake and completely in shock.
“No one… I mean only Ryan and Alok,” I said as I swung myself inside the window.
“Careful,” she said as I landed on some cushions on a rug, pretty and delicate as only in a
girl’s room.
I gave a thumbs-up signal to my friends and banged shut the window.
“Hari, what exactly do you think you are doing?” Neha said, “What if Dad wakes up?”
She adjusted her hair as I noticed her nightclothes. She wore a sleeveless, simple cotton
nightie with little blue triangles all over. As always, she looked beautiful.
“Happy birthday, Neha,” I said, and took the flowers out from under my shirt.
The flowers were crushed and already wilted, but there is something about flowers and
women. Somehow, seeing these reproductive tools of plant-life works wonders. It chills
them out. Neha’s anger vanished, and I could tell the idea had worked.
“Sunflowers,” Neha said, “Where did you get these?”
“From your garden actually.”
“What?” Neha said and threw a stem at me, “you loafer. Such a cheapo you are.”
I took a cushion in response and threw it back at her. I was just getting excited about the
impending flower and pillow fight when she nipped it in the bud.
“Don’t mess with these cushions, I hand-painted the covers.”
Hand-painting cushion covers, how can girls waste their time on such useless pursuits? I
mean, Ryan and I didn’t even have cushion covers, let alone painted ones.
“What are you thinking?” Neha said as she came close and held my hand.
“Nothing. And I’m sorry I startled you like that.”
“It’s okay, I like it,” Neha said, “I guess it is kind of special. Come sit.”
She made me to sit on her bed. I sat down as close to her as possible, my eyes drifting
down to her chest. Girls don’t wear bras at night I guess, which quite obviously suits them
better. At the same time, I thought of the possibility of Prof Cherian walking in through the
door.
“What are you thinking? Look into my eyes,” Neha said.
“Huh…nothing. Happy birthday,” I said.
“Aren’t you going to kiss me?”
My eyes went wide as UFO saucers.
She drew back. “Wait a minute. You want to, right?”
“Yes, of course.”
“So now?” she said.
“Now what?” I said.
“Are you going to kiss me or what?”
Maybe it was the flowers, or just the whole excitement of breaking in, or maybe even that
she had finally grown up. I moved forward, and even though I had seen a million kisses in
movies, I can’t tell you how hard it is to deliver a good one the first time.
“Oops…not so hard,” she said, “gentle, baby kisses first.”
She led the path from there, and frankly, I was too excited and scared to do better. But I
had my first kiss, right there in Prof Cherian’s house.
“Shh…Daddy’s got up for water,” she said, pushing me away.
“Now what?”
“Nothing, he won’t come up. But you should go now.”
“I want to stay.”
“Just go now,” she said as she pushed me off the bed, in contrast to her loving looks
moments ago.
It was pointless to insist. Besides, a part of me wanted to get the hell out of there before
the gig was up.
“So, how was it?” Ryan said as I was pulled back on the roof.
“Nice. Very nice,” I said with a big grin splitting my face which said it all.
Getting down was as much an art as climbing up, but the real problem was as we reached
the lawns. Someone had switched on the living room light.
“How did the light go on?” Alok said.
“Don’t know. I think Cherian woke up for water,” I said.
“Let’s crawl out,” Ryan said as we bent under the window to be out of sight.
A bucket fell noisily as Alok crawled through the grass, loud enough to make all our
whispers pointless.
“Who is it?” a male voice came from inside as we heard footsteps.
“Fuck, it’s Cherian. Run, get the hell out of here,” Ryan said.
We stopped with the slithery crawl and ran for our lives. If Cherian had seen us, he
would have kicked our butts out of the college right then.
We were just outside the gates when the door opened and Cherian came out in what
looked like his wife’s nightgown.
“Who is it?” he shouted, adjusting his spectacles.
“Your father,” Ryan yelled as we ran away from the house.
I don’t know if Cherian chased us or was too scared to do so but the three of us did not
stop running until we reached Ryan’s scooter.
“Are you stupid or what? Why did you say that?” I reproved as we rode off.
“Yeah, right. I should have said, sir, it’s only your son-in-law with some friends. He
would’ve brought the drinks out then.”
12
—
Neha Speaks
SAMIR BHAIYYA,
I don’t know how and when you will read this, this letter that I’ve got to write anyway.
I am always composing replies to that last mail of yours, the one you penned only to me
though I am not happy about the exclusivity. But then I have told you that before.
Anyway, let me tell you about this boy I met. You could call Hari my boyfriend, though
I don’t. He is a student, can you believe it? Remember how we hated every IIT student
who lived on campus? We met in this totally strange manner, there was something about
him that drew me from the very beginning.
Not very good looking or anything, nor super smart but there he was, this silly
bumbler. As you can guess, Dad and Mom have no clue, something that I’ve learnt to live
with since you left but you can well imagine what will happen if Dad finds out. Remember
how he called cops to arrest a man who whistled at me at the campus bus stop? And the
time he changed the home phone number because a male classmate called for notes? He
wants to bring up his daughter right. I am his mission in life. He doesn’t want to make the
same mistake twice. Did you have to do that to me, Bhaiyya?
I just want to tell you, don’t worry about me for I know girls should be good.
Sometimes I feel this guy is only interested in getting physical. Other girls who have
boyfriends tell me all boys are the same, want the same thing. But can I tell you
something? Even I want the same. No, no I haven’t done anything yet. But then, every
now and then I get curious, start imagining what Hari would do if I let him. Is thinking
that a bad thing?
Oh no, here I go, throwing questions at you again. Let me tell you more about Hari. He
has two friends - Ryan and Alok. They are nuts. Now don’t think I have started liking IIT
students or anything – just that these guys are dif erent. For one, they can barely remain
students with their five-point something GPAs.
I know what you are thinking, they are the kind of students Dad would hate, and you
are thinking she is hobnobbing with them for precisely that reason. You are wrong,
Bhaiyya. You know on my last birthday, they broke into our house, these loafers I am
talking about. Hari came into my room and gave me flowers plucked from our garden! I
hope Dad never finds out about him the wrong way. And I hope I can keep meeting him
forever. Though there is so much more I don’t yet know about Hari.
My plan is the day Hari gets a job, I will introduce him to Dad. I mean, Dad will still
flip his lid, but at least there would be something going for Hari. Right now, he is a little
bit of a loser if you ask me. Sorry, if I am being mean. But in some ways, he is. For one
thing, he is besotted with Ryan. “Ryan this, Ryan that,” bugs me no end sometimes. I
don’t think this Ryan guy is all that cool. Wears branded clothes, but that is only because
his parents are loaded. I personally think behind all this guy’s aggression there is a
vacuum.
See, that is the thing with these IIT guys and their college, they all are too wrapped up
in the bricks and walls to know who they really are and what they really want. I want to
tell them – before you get all gung-ho about working for the future, work out your past
and present but that will just sound so grandma-ish and I am, well, so young.
Well, that is all I shall write for now. I promise to write again, and I promise to be
good. But do not tell Dad and Mom what I’ve been babbling about. See, I kept your last
promise and have not told anyone about your letter to me how much ever that broke me,
so keep mine. Yes, I know Mom would not have been able to take it. She hardly speaks
these days anyway. Why did you leave us Bhaiyya? It isn’t fair, you know that, right?
Missing you,
Neha
13
—
One More Year Later
WE WERE DRINKING ON THE INSTI ROOF. THIRD YEAR students now, alcohol no
longer a novelty. This meant we could drink less and not throw up every time to certify
having a good time. We were drowning our sorrows today for two reasons. Firstly, after a
year of working the files, the mechanical engineering department had coolly rejected Ryan’s
lube project proposal. Secondly, I had messed up yet another viva. When it came to
screwing vivas, I am the man you want!
“Screw the lube project. I have wasted too much time on it. But look at you, Hari. It is so
bloody typical of you. Why do you get so tongue-tied?” Ryan said, in whose veins
confidence corpuscles flowed larger than red.
“I wish I knew.” I squinted, frustrated.
“You know the answer to the viva questions. You know the answers, right?” That was
Alok.
I nodded my head. It was pointless. Three years of practice in vivas did not leave me any
less petrified.
“Ryan, you know I hate vivas. But c’mon man. You must feel like crap,” I said.
“What crap? I only did ten night outs on the proposal, the revised proposal and spent like
a hundred hours in the lab. But in the end, Cherian shot it down. ‘Too optimistic and
fantastic,’ he said. I could wring his bloody neck,” Ryan announced.
“But you know your idea is good,” Alok said flatly.
“Of course it is. Even Prof Veera thinks so. But Cherian doesn’t, and he is the head.
Anyway, screw it.”
“Is it completely over?” I said.
“From my side. Prof Veera might try private sponsorship or something. Pretty much over
though I should say,” Ryan said.
Alok sat quietly, picking his nose and sipping his vodka. It was disgusting, but it didn’t
bother me anymore. It is amazing how habit immunizes you.
I looked fully at Alok. “At least you are happy.”
“Happy?” Alok echoed, “good joke.”
“Now what happened?” I said.
“Nothing. Nothing bloody happens in my life situation. That is why I am never happy.
Sister needs to get married, that is the latest I guess.”
Alok had a point. A miserable home, pointless grades and loser friends was hardly the
route to happiness. At least he had the joy of picking dirt out of his nose in the company of
his friends.
“How’s Neha?” Alok said.
“She’s fine. That is the only thing that keeps me in IIT,” I said.
“Yeah right. Have you gotten any further though?” Ryan said.
“Like what? I have kissed her now you know,” I said.
“Yes, but like ten years ago. And there is much more than that. You know that right? Or do
you get tongue-tied in front of her as well.”
Alok tittered.
“Screw you Ryan,” I said, “Neha is not that type of girl.”
“But you are that type of boy. So make her that way,” he said.
“How?”
“I can’t tell you everything.”
Once it was dark we decided to return to Kumaon. Time did go on, and thank god for that.
For that meant we only had so many fewer days left in this place.
“I’ll be happy when college is over,” I said.
“At least we have perfected the C2D,” Alok said.
“Of course,” Ryan said and smirked, “when was the last time each of us did his own
assignment?”
“It still scares me sometimes though,” I said.
“Why? The profs never read the crap they give us carefully. They’ll never find out,” Ryan
dismissed, cocky as ever.
“I heard Cherian is anal though,” Alok said.
We’d find out soon; it was finally time for Cherian to start teaching industrial engineering
and management or Indem.
“Yes, the bastard will teach us finally. I am not attending any of his classes,” Ryan said.
“You don’t have to. It’s Hari’s course under C2D,” Alok said and winked, “our guy wants
to impress the dad.”
“Well, at some point I do want Neha to tell her dad about me. Wouldn’t be a good start if
I skip all his classes,” I said.
“I hate him,” Ryan said simply.
No one skipped Cherian’s first class. That is, no one apart from Ryan. I was curious to see
in person the devil who tormented my girlfriend and my best friend. Others went to see the
head of the mechanical engineering department of the best engineering college in the
country. They said Cherian was a perfect 10 in his IIT student days. I didn’t know much
about the man, apart from the fact that his daughter was a perfect 10 to me.
I had reached five minutes early, and for the first time in three years, had taken a seat in
the first row. I don’t know why, but I really wanted to do well in his course. Perhaps an A in
Indem might give a good first impression, leading the way for Neha to introduce me. It just
sounded better – “Dad, meet Hari – the guy who topped your Indem course,” rather than
“Dad, meet Hari. The loser who scraped a C in your course.”
Prof Cherian walked in precisely at nine, and brought with him a huge pile of books as if
he had just robbed a library.
“Pay attention everyone. Let us start with the lecture,” he began in a firm voice.
There is something about seeing your girlfriend’s parent for the first time. I couldn’t help
but notice how Cherian was an extremely bad replica of Neha. Like her wax statue had
puffed up first and then begun to melt haphazardly. He had the same jaw and round face like
hers, however, his face was twice as big, with chunks of loose flesh hanging where Neha
had these super-smooth, taut cheeks. Instead of Neha’s long and beautiful hair, Cherian had a
bald spot bigger than a Nirula’s hamburger. If she dressed to act in a horror movie, Neha
would look like her father.
“Time and motion studies are the essence of Indem. As engineers you should be able to
reduce human actions to measurable tasks and stop talking there in the third row,” Cherian
said as he threw a piece of chalk at two students who had found a private joke too good to
resist sharing it in class.
“Meet your father-in-law,” Alok whispered.
“Looks like he can eat me alive,” I said.
Cherian heard the whispers and stopped writing on the board. He turned around and
banged a duster on the table. “No one talks for the next sixty minutes,” he pronounced in a
no-nonsense tone that would make Saddam Hussein shudder, “is that clear?”
Chalk dust formed a cloud as if Cherian had burst a grenade in the classroom. Behind
this, one could barely see his contorted face. I wondered how Neha had spent an entire life
living with him, wanting to rescue her that very instant. I thought of eloping with her, making
the escape through the roof while Cherian slept. But where would I take her? The hostel
was hardly handy, what with all of us sleeping in one room.
Cherian’s first example of time and motion study was of a shirt factory. Let us say there
were five workers, now they could either make individual shirts each, or one could divide
the shirt making tasks. For instance, the first worker could cut the cloth, the second worker
put in the first stitch, the third sews buttons and so on and so forth.
“This breakdown of tasks is called an assembly line. But you have to ensure that each
task is of equal time to avoid bottlenecks.”
Therefore, if cutting cloth took six minutes and the first stitch took three, two workers
could do the first job. “This way, you can have a fast assembly line. Workers focus and get
more skilled at their tasks. And what is more, you don’t need extra equipment – like instead
of five scissors, you need only one,” Cherian said.
It all sounded very reasonable. After all, that is what engineers should do right? Tell
workers how to work more efficiently, thinking up clever ways to save resources.
“He makes sense,” I said.
“Just take notes. Anything can come in the quiz,” Alok said.
The Fatso will remain a loser, I thought, except at nose, where his pickings were rich. I
mean, I am no great thinker or anything, but sometimes one does listen in class. All this guy
wanted to do was mug in class and puke in tests. I thought of discussing Indem with Ryan.
Sixty minutes later, Cherian put his chalk down. He modified the shirt example ten times,
to show various time and resource allocation combinations. In typical IIT fashion, the
simple example somehow converted into complex equations. The prof gave an assignment
for the next class using these equations, which meant two hours at least in the library that
night.
“Are you stupid. You found this Indem crap interesting,” Ryan said as I told him about the
class.
“Why? Think about it, instead of each person cutting and then sewing…”
“So, you want to reduce each tailor to a cloth cutter or button sewer. What are they,
bloody robots?”
“No, just being smart. See if you apply the optimization equation…”
“Screw the equation. What do you want the worker to say at home? That I made ten shirts
today? Or that I cut fifty pieces of cloth? Do you realize how mind-numbing each job willl
become?”
“That is silly,” I said, “it is about improved efficiency.”
“But what if each worker wants to make his own shirt and wants to improve the design? It
is just the same Cherian crap, treat humans like mindless machines.”
“I think you should attend his class, Ryan. I can’t explain it. He seemed to make sense.”
“Of course, he makes sense to you. You want to nail his daughter that’s why.”
“Aw, shut up, just come to class all right. It is high time you give this system a chance.”
“It’s a screwed up system, so no more chances. Now, give me the assignment so I can cog
it.”
I met Neha outside the insti gate for a walk-date. A walk-date is where you go with your
girlfriend for a long walk to get some fresh air and quality conversation, or at least you say
so. The real great thing about walk-dates is that they are free. To me, nearly broke as it was
my turn to fill Ryan’s scooter tank last time, it was the obvious choice. Neha chose the route,
a five-kilometer return trip from the campus via nearby villages.
“So, tell me. What did you think of my Dad?” Neha said as if she expected me to jump in
excitement.
“Don’t really know him, but pretty strict I think. How do you live with him?”
“You know he is really impressed by good students. I hope you are going to do well in his
course.”
“I am trying. But I have never got an A. And he gives like a dozen assignments a week.
Plus there is a viva component that I hate.”
“If you do get an A, I’ll probably tell him that we are friends.”
“Well, I am trying. Anyway, where are we walking to?”
“Just keep walking, I have a place in mind.”
I kept silent, hoping she had thought of a secluded place. That is all one wants when one
is dating, an empty place with nothing to do, no one around. Yet, you see dozens of fast-food
places, cinemas, and ice-cream parlours, all targeting the dating crowd. Why don’t they just
make rows and rows of empty rooms instead?
Neha took me through a mud-path that led to Katwaria village. A few semi-naked kids
looked at us curiously as if we were a different species. Two buffaloes loose from their
sheds were also taking an evening walk, and one seemed to follow us.
“Are you sure you know where we are going?” I asked doubtfully.
“Of course, I am. See that temple at the end of this path, over there.”
I squinted my eyes. There was a temple flag, around a kilometre away. After a while, the
buffalo following us gave up on the idea, and the two of us were alone.
We reached the temple and sat down at the parapet of the neglected steps. A stray
snoozing dog opened an eye to look at us. In front of the temple was a railway line. I
guessed it was for the Delhi ring railway, the local city train that no one really used and ran
only once every couple of hours.
“What is this temple doing in the middle of nowhere?” I said, casually picking up her
hand. The dog didn’t care, and no one else was really around.
“I think only some villagers use it on special days. But I like it here,” Neha said, leaning
against me.
We kissed, I don’t really know who started it. That is the cool thing about having a steady
girlfriend. You don’t have to struggle every time you want to kiss. But that was the farthest
you could go with Neha. I put my hand on her shoulder for support. Then in a completely
planned but seemingly unintentional manner I let it slip down toward her chest. Maybe this
time her reflexes wouldn’t be as strong.
“No!” Neha said the moment it got interesting. She pushed me away and sat up.
“You are so beautiful,” I said, trying to be as mellow as possible.
“Shut up,” she said and giggled, “your corny lines aren’t going to get you anywhere. Have
some shame, we are near a temple.”
Yeah right, I thought. As if kissing next to a temple was okay but somehow the classic
‘slide the hand carelessly down’ was not. Neha, I tell you, is the queen of contradictions.
I tried to get close to her again, it was useless to argue.
“Just kisses. You know this is wrong,” she warned.
We did our making out, or rather me-trying-to-make-out routine for half an hour, after
which she had to go home or something. We stood up, threw the dog a last glance and started
walking back.
“Do you know my brother died on those tracks?” she said.
I hadn’t really heard much about how her brother died. Gory stories kind of just put me
off but I guess guys have to listen to their girlfriends. “Really? No, I didn’t know. How did
it happen?”
“I still remember the date, May 11. Bhaiyya had gone for a jog. We got the call midmorning.
I mean, Dad got the call. He told us only in the evening and I …wasn’t even
allowed to go see the body.” Her voice began to quiver.
We were nearing the village, so I wasn’t sure if I should let her cry on my shoulder. But
she herself chose to, and I couldn’t do much.
“Neha, it’s okay,” I said, conscious of two urchins staring at us. The only time they had
probably seen a guy and a girl embrace was on screen.
She only moved away from me when the number of kids watching us had gone up to eight.
“Wow, now where did they come from?” She wiped her eyes. The eight kids, mostly
naked, looked at us intently as if they were watching a film.
“See, she is a heroine,” I said to the kids.
“Raveena Tandon,” said a three-year old in the crowd.
Neha started to laugh, much to my relief, given her moods tended to be long.
We walked further, until we came close enough to campus where we adopted separate
paths.
“Perhaps I can introduce you as his course topper to him some day.” She winked, walking
ahead.
I waited the prescribed five minutes and then headed for campus. Was I in love with her?
I kicked a pebble out of my way; if only she wouldn’t be so good all the time!
I Love u Rachu
Dear Frnds pls spread this msg until its reach to my rachu
I thinks see knows my name
Downloaded from EBOOK4IN.BLOGSPOT.COM
14
—
Vodka
ALOK RETURNED HYPER-HARRIED FROM HOME.
“How are your dad and mom?” I asked, alerted by his unusual silence at Sasi’s, not even
asking what the daily specials were.
“Miserable as usual. There was another big drama at home last weekend. There’s yet
another suitable match for my sister but we can’t cough up the suitable money. Hence, either
we say no or sign IOUs, meaning give it later when I pass out of the insti, get a job and then
pay for it.”
“That’s tough,” Ryan noted, who had just joined us after waking up from his royal siesta.
“But it is my duty man and I love them. I don’t see it as trouble,” Alok said dully.
“So what job are you going to take up?” I said.
“Whichever pays the most, I don’t care,” Alok said.
“That is crap. Don’t you want to do something you really like?”
“I like money,” Alok said as he finished his food. Until he had the money, paranthas
would do.
We were mid-way through the semester now, and every now and then I would start
thinking about my goal – to do well in Indem. By third year, ever y IITian knows his place.
We were now five-pointers frozen in our place; we had modest expectations, and our grades
never disappointed us. However, in Indem I wanted an A, something that had never been on
my grade sheet. Alok warned me about my lofty ambition. “Cherian will chew you alive
man. You hardly sleep these days. You know he gives only two or three As, right?”
“I do. But I have to give it my best. It is not just a stupid grade, but Neha at stake.”
“How much have you scored so far in the assignments?”
“Thirty-three out of forty. Worked like a dog on all of them.”
“Yes right. You need eighty total to get an A.”
“I know, out of that the viva is ten, and the major is fifty.”
“So unless you get almost a full score in the majors, you have to do decently in the
vivas.”
“I know. So this time, I have to pull it through,” I said, abjectly nervous at the thought.
“Just relax man, a B won’t be that bad.”
“An A Alok, I want an A.”
“Fine then. All the best,” Alok said as Sasi delivered more paranthas.
“How is your girl?” Ryan said.
“Neha is fine. Just took me to the place where her brother met with the accident. Isn’t that
weird?” I said.
“Maybe because you are special. And the place holds special meaning for her,” Alok
shrugged.
“Fatso is right. She likes you man,” Ryan said. “When did her brother die anyway?”
“Around three years ago. May 11 to be precise. He had gone jogging when they got a call
mid-morning, hit by a ring railway train.”
“Wow, that is incredible,” Alok said, “and I thought no one used the ring railway.”
“He wasn’t using it Fatso. He just got hit by it,” Ryan clarified.
“Yes, pretty gory.” I rolled my eyes.
“Though who goes jogging on a bloody hot May morning?” Ryan wanted to know.
“Shut up man. The guy is dead, and you are making fun of him,” I protested.
“No. That is not what I mean. I mean, hey Fatso, what time does the first ring railway
train run?”
“I don’t know,” Alok said, busy eating his paranthas and somewhat pissed at the frequent
reference to him as Fatso.
“I know, ten I think. Why?” I said.
“Well, think about it, ten in the morning in May. I think it is close to forty degrees and
crap hot. Who goes jogging on a May morning?”
“Well, he did. Otherwise he wouldn’t have died, right?” Alok said, obviously irritated.
He never went jogging, so I guess he didn’t know better.
“I know he died. But my point is…” Ryan said, “anyway, forget it.”
“What? I want to know,” I said.
“My point is, was it an accident at all.”
I woke up with a headache on the day of Cherian’s viva. There were a couple of weeks left
until the majors, but today would seal my Indem fate. “Try to sleep, try to sleep,” I had told
myself about a million times the night before, all to no use.
“God, you look a mess,” Ryan greeted in the toilet as we were shaving together.
“Couldn’t sleep much. Hell, I know I am going to screw this one up,” I said and slapped
water on my face.
Ryan pressed the nozzle of his Gillette shaving gel and prepared his twin-blade sensor
razor. His parents had sent him all these contraptions to look even better as if the guy
needed to improve his looks. Why couldn’t he get a few pimples now and again like say
Alok?
“Listen Hari,” Ryan said making clean strokes across his cheek, “you have busted your
ass for this course already. You mess this up, and there is no hope for you man. You
probably know the answers better than anyone else.”
“Since when has knowing the answers been a problem? And this is Cherian, even normal
guys get scared,” I said.
“See, I am not even going for his viva. But if you are so scared, I have an idea.”
“You aren’t coming? Ryan, it is ten percent. And Cherian will go ape-shit if a student
doesn’t even come to the viva.”
“I have vowed not to view that bastard’s face as much as I can. And who cares about ten
percent, I don’t have to impress the dad.”
“Up to you. I still think you should come. Anyway, what is your idea?”
“I don’t know if it will work.”
“Just tell me man. I am desperate,” I said.
Ryan wiped his face with a towel. He opened a bottle of some fancy overpriced
American aftershave and splashed it liberally on his cheeks.
“Vodka: the solution to all problems.”
“What? Vodka? I am talking about a viva Ryan, I am not organizing a party.”
“I know. But you know how vodka makes one less inhibited and makes you talk more?
Who knows, a couple of swigs and it may work for you.”
“You are crazy. The viva is at eleven in the morning. It is hardly the time to drink...”
“If you get a zero in his viva, you think Neha will ever introduce you to daddy?”
The image of a zero and a B or C in Indem flashed across my mind. “How much?”
“Just a couple of shots. Come, I have some in my closet.”
I went to Ryan’s room where amidst branded clothes he hid his stash of alcohol.
Alongside the bottle were envelopes, all with US stamps.
Ryan poured vodka in a steel glass, making it a third-full.
“What are those envelopes?” I said.
“Nothing. Here, one shot…one, two, three,” Ryan said.
I couldn’t believe the envelopes were unimportant. I mean, there were like a hundred of
them literally.
“Letters from your parents, aren’t they?” I hazarded a guess.
“Yeah. Here have another one,” Ryan said.
“You sure this won’t be too much?” I said.
“No. In fact have a third one just to be sure. Here, I’ll accompany you.”
With that, Ryan joined me in my third shot. The vodka went down like a fireball, hitting
my empty stomach, spearing my intestines.
“All right then, off I go to meet the daddy,” I said cheerfully.
“All the best, Hari. And listen, just don’t tell Alok about the envelopes.”
“Tell what?” I said. I hardly knew anything about them and I wouldn’t have if Ryan hadn’t
mentioned it.
“Nothing, just don’t mention it. They write ever y week, and send a cheque once a month.
I never reply, that is all.”
“Why don’t you reply?” I asked, basking in the spirit inside of me.
“’Cause I hate them. Actually, I don’t care about them. I mean, neither do they about me.
So why pretend?”
Ryan said. “Ryan, you know this whole big deal you make about not caring about your
parents?” the vodka spoke for me.
“Yeah, what about that?”
“I don’t think it is true. I mean, how can it be true?” I said, ignoring his hostile stance. I
kind of meant it. With all the Gillette and aftershaves they sent, how could he not love them?
“It’s true. You are a kid in life man, just go give your viva,” Ryan said and lit up a
cigarette. Smoke made the man more profound.
“I am going. But if it were true, why would you keep all the letters?” I asked, beating a
retreat.
Cherian was already in class. My turn came in ten minutes and I sat next to Alok.
“Where is Ryan?” he whispered, flipping through his notes. Alok always revises until the
last minute.
“He is skipping it,” I said.
“What? He is crazy man,” he shook his head.
“Says he doesn’t care. Just as he doesn’t for his parents,” I said, obviously the second
phrase came because of the vodka.
“Are you okay, Hari? You sound kind of garbled. And what is that smell…wait have you
been drinking?”
“Shh...keep quiet. Just a little bit. Ryan said it helps relax.”
“Ryan, Ryan, Ryan. Do you ever think for yourself?” Alok said.
“Hari,” Prof Cherian called my name even before I could answer Alok. My moment was
here. My first A was to be decided in the next five minutes.
“So, what is the Japanese system for manufacturing that lowers inventories?” Prof
Cherian started as usual without any greetings or pleasantries. Just a straight firm voice like
from a machine.
“Good morning, sir,” I said.
“Good morning, Hari. Now answer my question.” His eyes looked like big, bulging
versions of Neha’s eyes.
“Good morning, sir,” I said again, to kick-start my brain.
“That is fine, Hari. Now answer please, if you don’t mind.”
“Sir, the Japanese inventory lowering system…” I began.
“Yes, that one. You know the answer or not?” Prof Cherian said, his voice getting louder.
“I sir….I sir…” I said.
“It is JIT or Just in Time. Cannot believe students today cannot answer such simple
questions. Next one, what is the difference between assembly line and batch
manufacturing?”
“Sir, very simple question sir…hic,” I said.
“Why are you talking like that? And what is this smell? Are you drunk Mr Hari? Are you
drunk in my class?”
“No sir, sir, I actually know answer, sir,” I reiterated desperately.
“You are actually drunk. The guts of these students today!” Prof Cherian said and threw a
piece of chalk right at me. It hit me on the chest and hurt a little. Even though I was drunk, I
knew something was going wrong. I was actually speaking at this viva, but not making any
sense.
“Sir,” I said.
“Get out of my class now. Get out now.” Prof Cherian’s face turned red and he slammed
his files on the desk.
I picked up my notebook to leave when Cherian came toward me. He took out a red pen
and marked a circle on my sheet. Then he made another circle over it.
“Zero, that is what you deserve. I wish I could give you negative,” he said, “and you
better do well in your majors for I am not going to let you get away from this that easy.”
I kept quiet. All those shots for a zero, which I could have earned myself anyway with or
without vodka.
“Fuck!” Ryan slammed a fist against his palm when he heard the story back in Kumaon.
“What fuck? Who told you to suggest such a weird idea?” Alok said.
“I thought it would work but the shots were too big,” Ryan said. He was playing with a
basketball, bouncing it back and forth on the wall.
“Will you cut out that noise?” Alok said, “So what are you going to do now Hari?”
“Do what? I lose the A for sure. And Cherian thinks I’m a drunkard. Way to go for his
daughter’s boyfriend,” I said, covering my face with my hands.
Thump, thump, thump. Ryan kept silent as the only noise he made was with the ball.
“Stop it,” Alok said, grabbing the ball from Ryan, “say something solid now!”
“Alok!” someone shouted from outside. It was the security guard downstairs.
“Phone call for Alok,” the guard shouted.
“Must be from home,” Alok said, “Come Hari, no point discussing Indem now.”
I came down with Alok if for nothing else but to be distracted from the Indem fiasco.
“Hello, Mummy. How are you? Yes, I know I have not come home for a long time,” Alok
said on the phone.
“What? Didi got engaged? Oh, you mean the boy’s side have agreed,” Alok said, his
voice excited.
“Yes, I am really happy, how is Dad…I know…of course I’ll pay for everything once I
get a job Mom…yes, you are taking a loan for gifts…”
I could hear only half the conversation, but could pretty much figure out what was going
on. Alok’s parents had finally managed to palm off their daughter to someone. As he
explained later, the groom’s family wanted a Maruti car in dowry, but had agreed to defer it
until Alok passed out and started working. That’s when the marriage would take place but at
least they had a deal.
“Congratulations, your sister is getting married. Is your family excited? Or like sad or
something since she’ll go away?” I said to Alok after the call.
“They are relieved more than anything I think. I just hope I get a job that pays for this
damn affair. Apart from the car, there will be a function as well.”
“Why don’t you guys marry her off later? What is the big hurry?”
“The older she gets, the more dowry people will demand. Waiting will mean more
expense later. I’m happy the deal is cut.”
It sounded like credit card debt. If you don’t get rid of it now, it will cost you a lot more
later. The relief was understandable.
“What does the groom do?” I said.
“Oh. I don’t know. I forgot to ask,” Alok said.
Several weeks later, we were in the Kumaon mess eating dinner. It was Thursday I guess,
for that is when Kumaon had ‘continental’ dinner. In reality, it was just an excuse for messworkers
to not give us real food. The menu sounded nice – noodles, French fries, toast and
soup. It tasted awful. The cooks made the noodles in superglue or something – they stuck to
each other as one composite mass in the huge serving pan. The French fries were cold and
either extremely undercooked or burnt to taste like coal. The cream of mushroom soup could
have been mistaken for muddy water, only it was warmer and saltier.
“This is bad man,” Alok said as his noodles refused to vacate his fork, “I told you let’s
go out.”
“I didn’t know it would be so bad. And the semester is almost over. I am totally out of
cash.”
“That is right actually,” Alok said, “better start studying for the majors. Less than ten days
now.”
“Yes, not that I care now. After Indem messed up, I don’t really care beyond passing each
course.”
“Ryan, I think you should focus on Indem. Cherian didn’t like you missing the viva. He
smirks when he mentions your name in class attendance.”
“I know,” Ryan said, dropping his half-eaten French fry in disgust, “I got sixteen out of
forty in quizzes and zero in viva. Need twenty-four out of fifty in majors to pass it.”
“Not that easy,” I pointed out the obvious.
“Worse case, I flunk. So what?” Ryan said and tried the soup. Without caring for
etiquette, he spewed the contents out from his mouth back into the bowl.
“Cherian will make you do it again, it’s a core course,” Alok said. “Like drinking the
soup you just spat out.”
“Fuck,” Ryan said. I wasn’t sure if his comment was aimed at the food or the prospect of
repeating Cherian’s course.
“Man, if only I had an A, I could finally get Neha…” I said.
“I think we can still do something,” Ryan said.
“What? Drink enough to forget Neha?” I mocked.
“No. If you completely crack the majors, you can still make it, right?”
“I have thirty-three on forty, need eighty for an A. Major is fifty points. How am I going to
get forty-seven on fifty?”
“No way man. Ryan, don’t trouble the guy more. It is over.”
“It is not over, my friends, it never is. If I tell you that you can get a perfect score in
majors, will you believe me?”
“Don’t be crazy. I’d have to spend twenty hours a day on Indem and will probably not
make it. Cherian’s major test will be full of surprise questions. I am screwed…” I lamented.
“What if you knew the questions?” Ryan said.
“What if, what if? Ryan, are you dreaming?” Alok said.
“No I am not dreaming, Fatso. I am trying to help my friend. I think we can get the major
paper.”
“How?” I was arrested.
“By sneaking it out of Cherian’s office,” Ryan said.
Alok and I fell silent for a full minute, took us around that much time to digest the
preposterousness of the idea, along with the unpalatable food.
“You mean steal it? Steal a bloody major paper from an IIT prof? Is that what you said?”
Alok said.
“Don’t make it sound so dramatic. It is not such a big…”
“Are you nuts? Tell me, are you nuts?” Alok said and walked out of the mess. I went out
as well, preoccupied with my coming encounter with Neha, especially with how I could
dismiss my past encounter with daddy dearest.
15
—
Operation Pendulum
THE NEXT DAY AT KUMAON LAWNS RYAN WAS HIS LORDLY best. “Guys, just
listen to me.”
“No way, you can’t do this. Please, stop this nonsense,” Alok said.
“He has a point,” I conceded, not fully sure of what it was though.
“Can you guys just listen to me for a minute? You don’t have to do anything,” Ryan said,
sounding almost reasonable.
“Sure,” I said.
“We have lived in this place for three years, right? And what have we got?” Ryan said.
“Oh, don’t start about the system being crappy, Ryan. Just come to the point,” Alok said.
“I will, I will,” he said, realizing that he didn’t exactly have a patient audience in hand.
He took out a sheet from his pocket – two A4 sized sheets stuck together – and laid it out on
the grass. Employing two pebbles as paperweight, he began with a flourish, “This,
gentlemen is a map of the insti building. All profs get the major papers ready and printed a
week prior to tests but our Cherian’s a paragon, so his must be ready even earlier. Here,
Cherian’s office is on the sixth floor. The roof is on the ninth floor…”
Ryan’s face was intense like Alok’s while writing his exam paper. This was not a casual
conversation; he had pondered over this for a while.
“I told you the whole idea was crap. How can you force these details on us as if we’ve
said yes,” Alok said.
But that is how Ryan is, he decides, and then he proposes, and then he does whatever he
wants to anyway.
“Ryan, what is all this man?” I said.
“Just listen to me. Hari, I could get you the A grade you want here. Imagine, your girl will
finally not be ashamed to acknowledge you. And you too Fatso, an A won’t look so bad on
your grade sheet when you apply for jobs either.”
“But it is so warped, so…so wrong,” Alok protested, looking at me for support against
Ryan’s latest madness. But I was already thinking of walking hand in hand with Neha in the
insti gardens when the moon was out. Could I really get an A?
“It is wrong only if you get caught right?”
It was kind of hard to argue with Ryan’s logic, especially if you were dreaming about
your beautiful girlfriend at that time. Yes, it is a crime only if someone catches you.
Otherwise, it is just a neat plan.
“But…” Alok tried again.
“Anyway, let me finish,” Ryan said, without letting Alok finish now that I looked half way
there.
“The roof is on the ninth floor. So, if I suspend myself with ropes and then sail down to
Cherian’s window, I can get to his room. You guys can help me, just like we got Hari into
Neha’s room.”
“Are you crazy? Neha’s room was easy, no ropes or anything. And the insti building is
nine floors high,” I said.
“I am not scared. I have done rock climbing in school,” Ryan said.
“What if the window is not open?” Alok said.
I could see Ryan liked Alok’s question. Not only because Ryan had thought about it
before, but because it meant Alok was buying into this. But wait a minute, was I on board
with this just because it was Ryan? An A would be nice though.
“Yes, what about the window?” I said.
“The insti windows have latches that are weaker than rubber bands. They are the same
windows as in Kumaon hostel. One bang on the back and it opens.”
“Still, you will suspend yourself from the roof?” I said.
“I said I wasn’t scared.”
“What if someone sees us?” I said.
That is the thing about Ryan. He is brilliant, but also fearless. This machismo might lead
to an over-confidence that could kill the plan.
“No one will see us,” Ryan said.
“Yeah right. Just three guys hanging on to the insti roof as usual. Institute security
wouldn’t care, eh?” Alok smirked.
“Fatso, it will be super dark,” Ryan said.
“But we could make a noise, or the movement could be seen by the security jeeps on the
roads. Remember, we are not on the roof, but hanging by the sides. We just might be seen.”
“C’mon guys…” Ryan said, looking bored.
“Too risky. Forget it,” Alok said, tearing blades of grass. I had to nod, too. Besides, just
the thought of Ryan bungee-jumping upward made me sweat.
“Well, you got any better ideas?” Ryan said, irritated.
“What were you planning to do next anyway?” My curiosity got the better of me.
“Okay, here are the next steps,” Ryan pointed to the side of the paper. “One, switch on
light on the opposite right wall. Two, scan the room for a sealed brown bag. Three, open the
seal with a knife, and take out one copy of major paper. Four, using a candle and fresh seal,
fasten the bag back. Five, get the hell out of there.”
“Sounds simple enough after that,” Alok said, “but I guess we can’t get in. Let’s go now,
I’m hungry.”
“There could be a way,” I said.
“What?”
“Through the door. His main regular office door,” I said.
“How? Break the lock? Of course, you know that is impossible, with the noise and
everything. And he’ll know the next day,” Ryan said.
“No lock breaking. Just get in elegantly with the key,” I said.
“Key? Where the hell will you get the key?” Alok said.
“From Neha’s car keys. Her dad’s office keys are in the bunch,” I said.
Everyone fell silent for five seconds. It was the silence of admiration for sheer brilliance.
“Wow. I guess you just have to steal the keys then,” Alok said.
“Why not just sneak them out for half an hour and make a duplicate?” Ryan said.
“I guess. Not the easiest thing to do, but can be done,” I said, and smiled smugly at my
own genius. Cherian’s office was an open door.
“Hari, you are a killer man. That is awesome,” Ryan said.
He finalized the revised plan again. It seemed simple enough now, and we had invested
too much time in it to walk away from it.
“So we go up at night, just as we go to the roof for the vodka. But we stop at the sixth
floor and raid Cherian’s office,” Ryan said.
“Not raid, just turn the key and slide in,” I said, impersonating a mock key with my
fingers.
“Yes, up yours Cherian,” Ryan poked air with his middle finger. We all laughed and
shook hands.
“Let us give this operation a name. Something sexy, something unsuspicious and simple.”
“Something that will swing our miserable fortunes in this place,” I said.
“Yes, this swinging operation can be called Operation Pendulum,” Ryan said.
And on that bright lawn with our sun-lit eyes, we blithely cheered in unison, “Operation
Pendulum!”
16
—
The Longest Day of My Life I
THEY SAY NO ONE DAY CAN BE TOO SIGNIFICANT IN YOUR life, but I tell you the
day of Operation Pendulum was the most memorable and longest of all my IIT days. Each
moment, each event is vivid and fresh in my mind as if it happened yesterday. It was the day
that changed our lives, or at least changed us.
There was no formal date set for Operation Pendulum. It was kind of like, we’d do it the
day I got the key thing done. The majors were less than a week away, so we were sure
Cherian would have the papers by now. And of course, we’d need some time to figure out
the answers to those questions. So the sooner the better.
April 11, the day of Operation Pendulum, a day that started with my date with Neha. I
should have seen the signs the moment Neha told me she’d sprained her ankle.
“What?” I said over the phone, “I am dying to meet you. Don’t cancel today. The majors
will begin after that.”
“But Hari, I can’t even walk ten steps. Please, can’t we do it some other time?”
“Can I just see you for half an hour. How about I come home?”
I knew Neha’s mom would not be at home that day. It was the eleventh, the day she went
to that temple by the tracks and sobbed for her son. That is why Neha had agreed to the date
in the first place.
“Home? Are you mad? What if someone sees you?”
“Third year is ending, can you stop being so scared?”
“But...”
“And what if I get an A, you’ll introduce me then anyway right?”
“Okay, but only for half an hour. And come exactly at 11.30, so I’ll leave the doors open,”
she said.
“Great. I’ll see you then,” I said, keeping the phone down with a sigh of relief. I just had
to see her that day, or rather see her car.
“Everything okay?” Ryan quizzed as I left Kumaon.
“Of course. See you in two hours,” I said.
“Shh, quiet, just come in quickly,” Neha said, whispering quite unnecessarily.
“No one is here,” I said.
“You’re crazy. So, why the big urge to see me today?” Neha said, leading me to her room.
“Well, you know third year is ending and majors and everything,” I said, my eyes roving
around the room to spot any key-racks.
“So?” Neha said.
“So I thought meeting you would be good luck for the exams,” I said sitting down on the
bed by her side.
“Wow, how romantic!” she said, “and I thought my loafer was pining for me and dying for
me and whatever…”
“Oh, I was,” I said and leaned forward to hug her. It was true. I was always pining for
her. She looked beautiful. Even with her sore ankle, all pink and wrapped in a crepe
bandage, she managed to look beautiful.
“Ouch, careful,” she said, pushing me back on the bed, “I know what you pine for.”
“What?”
“My body, not me,” she said, nose up in air.
What is the difference? I thought. You just cannot understand girls sometimes.
“That is not true,” I said, just guessing that it would be the right response.
“Come here,” she called me and kissed me.
“When does Mom get back?”
“In two hours. You know, Samir Bhaiyya’s date.”
“I know, it’s the eleventh. You know Neha, I wanted to ask you about that.”
“What about it?”
“I was talking about it to Ryan...”
“You talked about Samir to Ryan?”
“No, just discussing how he well, died. You know the jogging and everything.”
“So?”
“So Ryan made a point. A good point.”
“What was that?”
“That who goes jogging on a hot May morning?”
She fell silent, released me from her hug and sat away.
“Neha?” I prompted.
“Hari,” she said and sobbed, “Hari, I didn’t want to tell you this, but I have to.”
“What?”
“Wait,” she said and went to open her cupboard. A bright mélange of clothes appeared,
quite unlike an average Kumaon guy’s closet. Neha took out a folded piece of paper. “Read
this,” she said.
I opened the page and my eyebrows jumped up in shock, it was signed Samir.
Dear Neha,
I love you my little sister, as much as the day I first held you in my arms when you were
born. I was so proud that day, and will remain so forever.
Neha, can you keep a secret? By the time you get this, I may not be in this world. But
you must understand that no one in the world must know of this letter.
I have tried three times to get into IIT, and each time I have disappointed Dad. He
cannot get over the fact that his son cannot handle physics, chemistry and maths. I
cannot do it Neha, no matter how hard I try, no matter how many years I study or how
many books I read. I cannot get into IIT. And I cannot bear to see Dad’s eyes.
He has seen thousands of IIT students in his life, and cannot see why his own son
cannot make it. Well Neha, he sees the students who make it, but he doesn’t see the
hundreds of thousands who don’t make it. He has not spoken to me for two months. He
doesn’t even talk to mom properly because of me. What can I do? Keep trying until I die?
Or simply die?
If anyone finds out that I took my own life, Mom would probably not be able to survive.
But I had to tell someone – and who else but you. I love you Neha. And you tell them I
went jogging.
Yours in eternity,
Samir
“What the heck is this,” I said, feeling creepy . It is not ever y day that you hold a suicide
note in your hand.
“It’s true. I should have never told you. But I’m so close to you and you start all this
investigation thing and…” She burst into tears.
“Listen, now calm down,” I said, speaking more to myself than to her. She stopped crying
after five minutes and I gave her a glass of water.
“You want to know what happened in my viva?” Maybe it would make her laugh. “Ryan
made me have vodka shots,” I said.
Neha lifted her head up and squeaked, “That was you? Dad mentioned it. That was you?”
She started hitting me with a pillow. She was laughing again. She looked beautiful, and I
could have sat there admiring her beauty forever but I was on a mission today, to get the
keys for Operation Pendulum.
“Stop, that hurts,” I said, moving toward her on the bed.
“Don’t come near me, you drunk loafer. You know Dad brooded for two hours that day.”
She was laughing so hard, she had to press her stomach with a hand.
I curled up next to her and held her. She turned her face towards me, almost in reflex. We
kissed, and then we kissed again. Then she held my hand and did something that she had
never done before; she put it on her breast.
Wow, my head went into a tizzy. What happened to this girl? Had she lost her mind? I
certainly lost mine and forgot about Operation Pendulum.
My hand slid under her T-shirt and then clumsily under The Bra. Life would be so much
better without hooks.
“Easy Tiger easy,” she said. I liked it that she called me Tiger.
She sat up to remove her T-shirt. And then the rest. I sat there transfixed, trying hard not to
let my tongue hang loose and pant like a dog.
“Well Tiger, are you going to remove anything or not?” she said.
“I..I…” I said as she pulled me close.
Half an hour later, we lay on the bed, spent but completely content. I looked up at the old
ceiling fan in Neha’s room, going around in awkward circles and felt dizzy with happiness.
“So?” Neha said.
“So what,” I said, regaining my equilibrium.
“Say something.”
I was bloody beyond happy. If I did not have that key to steal, I would have stayed put
forever.
“That was quite…amazing,” I said in an understatement.
“Thanks. I liked it too. I guess I am a bad girl now,” she said.
“No, you are not,” I said, scared she might regret this and never do it again.
“Yeah, right. Here I am, lying naked with a man who was drunk in his viva, while my Dad
is less than a kilometer away in his office,” she said and laughed, “It’s so liberating.”
“Really?”
“Yes, so liberating, yet so sad,” she said.
“Relax, Neha,” I said, fearing an inexplicable round of tears. “Do you want to go out?”
“No. Why, don’t you like it here?”
“I do. Just wanted a cigarette,” I said.
“Oh yes, I have heard cigarettes are great after sex. Please get me one too,” she said.
“You don’t smoke!”
“I don’t sleep with guys either. Hurry, get me a fag please.”
I saw the opportunity, and jumped at it. “Can I take your car?”
“Why? You didn’t get Ryan’s scooter?”
“No, he wanted it for squash. Can I?”
“Okay, the keys are on top of the fridge. Be quick though,” she said as she got up and
picked up my shirt.
“Hey, that’s my shirt you’re wearing,” I pointed out.
“I know. I like it, it is so loose and perfect for a little nap,” she said and pretended to fall
asleep.
“Neha. Don’t be ridiculous, how am I supposed to go out?”
“Wear my top,” she said lazily.
“It’s pink, and all tight. Are you nuts?”
“Just take one of Dad’s shirts in the closet downstairs.”
“Neha, don’t be silly…”
“Get lost and get the fags Hari, you have tired me out,” she said and threw a pillow at me.
Thinking if I could take Prof Cherian’s car and daughter, I could totally take his shirt, I
took out a white shirt from his closet, plain apart from the DC monogrammed on the sleeve.
I picked up the bunch of keys from the fridge. Six of them, one surely for Cherian’s office.
“Yes!” I said to myself as I left the house.
I drove out on the empty road, as the mid-day sun had forced most people indoors, drove
to Jia Sarai and went straight to the duplicate key shop.
“Which one?” the shopkeeper said.
“All six,” I said.
As the shopkeeper carved the new keys, I bought a pack of cigarettes. This was simpler
than I thought. I lit one and drifted into thoughts of hugging Neha again. This had to be the
most wonderful day of my life.
The keys were ready soon. I put the new bunch in my pocket and drove back into campus
through the insti gates.
Just as I turned toward faculty housing, I saw a bicycle ahead of me. I am mad, I am
stupid, a freaking jerk I thought as I honked – and turning around to look at me was Cherian.
17
—
The Longest Day of My Life II
THERE ARE TIMES IN YOUR LIFE WHEN YOU ARE SO SCARED you scream, and
there are times you are so beyond scared you just freeze. I mean you kind of get fossilized in
an icebox and never come back to life ever again. When Cherian got off his bicycle and
walked toward me, or rather his car, I went into deep freeze.
He came and stood next to me. I should have probably got out, but I was crap scared to
move an inch. I heard my heart, which was louder than Cherian’s words. “This is my car,”
he said.
True, I thought, ten out of ten. I can control this, I said to myself and tried to breathe.
“Yes, sir,” I said.
“Who are you? And what are you doing in my car?” he asked next.
“Sir, just driving back…sir,” I said, probably looking as stupid as I sounded.
Cherian parked his bicycle on the side of the road and abandoning my role as a wax
model, I got out of the car. Oh, where were the dinosaurs when you needed them?
“Were you driving to my home?” Cherian said, opening the front door. Yes, he was going
to drive now. Could I go home?
“Yes, sir.”
Suddenly his mighty brow furrowed. “I know you. You are a student, right? What is your
name?”
“Hari, Sir,” I said, glad he had asked the only thing I was sure about.
“You are the one who was playing tricks in my viva?”
I nodded, guilty as charged.
“Get in,” Cherian said.
I quietly opened the other front door and sat next to him. He started the car.
“Who gave you the keys?”
I jumped at the last word. My hand caressed my trouser pocket from the outside. Yes, the
set of duplicate keys was still there. I had to think of something now. Any reason why I
could be driving his car apart from buying post-coitus cigarettes for his daughter.
“Neha, sir,” I said after a deliberate pause.
“You know Neha?” the professor’s eyebrows shot up.
“Sir, I met her on the road. The car had a flat tire.”
“So?” Cherian said.
“Sir, I was passing by and offered to push the car to the mechanic. She had to go back and
I offered to bring the car home.”
Silence from Cherian. Had he fallen for it? I guessed he had, for he started the car and
started driving it slowly.
“Why did you offer that?”
“Just wanted to help,” I shrugged modestly like I go about scouting for good deeds all
day.
“And you don’t have classes to attend?”
“A free period, sir.”
“Silly girl,” Cherian spoke aloud to himself, “Gives the car to any stupid stranger. I have
to talk to her about this.”
I kept silent; a new thought had crossed my mind; if Neha would be dressed. The last
thing I wanted right now was a surprise hug from her when she opened the door. If only I
could get ten seconds before she spoke to Cherian. Or if only I could disappear.
Cherian parked the car at his house.
“Sir, can I go now?”
“No, come in. This stupid girl should at least thank you. Not that I’d ever let boys like
you come near my house.”
“Right, sir.” I totally understood him.
Cherian pressed the doorbell. Neha opened the door wearing just a bed sheet.
“Have you…” Then she saw her father. “Dad,” Neha said, blinking her eyes and adjusting
her bed sheet to cover the maximum. Surely, this was one hell of a kick compared to
cigarettes.
“Your keys, ma’am,” I spoke quickly, “Don’t worry, I got the puncture completely fixed
and brought your car back.”
“Huh?” she looked at me.
“Neha, are you out of your mind? Why aren’t you dressed?” Cherian said, controlling the
volume of his voice only because I was there.
Neha blinked again before disappearing into her bedroom, presumably to change.
“This daughter of mine is mad. Sit down,” Cherian said.
“Sir, we pushed the car for twenty minutes. She must be tired,” I said. Well, sex was like
pushing a car sometimes, only a lot more pleasant.
Neha came back wearing a very daddy’s-good-girl salwar-kameez and holding a tray
with two glasses of water.
As Cherian drank his glass, I repeated, “I was just telling your dad how your car got a flat
tire and I helped you take it to the mechanic and then brought it back. I met Sir on the way
here you see.”
“Oh?” Neha said, striving for an intelligent facial expression.
“How can you dump the car on a stranger?” Cherian asked her.
“Sorry Dad,” Neha said and collapsed on the sofa.
“Sir, can I go now?” I said.
Cherian gave half a nod and I was out of the house. I walked as fast as I could without
running.
“Hari,” Cherian shouted when I was at the gate.
I froze and turned. “Yes, sir.”
“You are not that smart, you know,” he said.
I’d always known of Cherian’s disdain for students with low grades. I didn’t know he’d
be so direct about it.
“Sir, I know sir. I will study harder.”
“That is not what I meant.”
“Sir?”
“I was a student once too you know. And the best one, a straight 10 all four years.”
“I know Sir.”
“And if you think you can mess with my daughter and get away with it, you are wrong.”
I stood silent.
“You drink in my viva, and now I find you fooling with my daughter, in my car and
wearing my shirt,” Cherian said and tugged at my collar. “You watch it Hari, you watch it.
This is IIT, not some bloody regional college. First the viva, and then my daughter. My
daughter!”
“Sir, it is not what you think.”
“Don’t tell me what to think. I knew my daughter was distracted these days. God, and
because of scum like you! You stay away from my home and my daughter. Just away,
understand?”
“Yes, Sir,” I said, wishing Cherian would let go of my collar. I was beginning to go limp.
I mean being caught by him on top of losing my virginity was hardly conducive to
strengthening me.
“Good. I don’t want people talking, so I won’t bring this up again. But you stay away
from her and focus on your courses. For, Hari, one slip in the insti and I will ruin you. I will
bloody ruin you,” Cherian said, his face an unpleasant red.
“Sir, I will stay away. Just let me go,” I pleaded.
He released my collar, his fingers still trembling. I ran out of his gate and toward
Kumaon. It was the fastest jog of life. I stopped only once, when I passed Cherian’s bicycle.
I don’t know what struck me. I turned to make sure no one was around, and then released the
air from both the tires. Damn, that monster deserved some revenge. And that just might make
the bastard believe there are flat tires in this world.
“No way man,” I said, panting as I reached Ryan’s room.
“No way what? Did you get the keys?” Ryan said.
I tried to catch my breath.
“What happened?” Alok asked as he came to Ryan’s room.
“Hell. Hell happened.” I regained my pulse and related the whole story.
Ryan started laughing. Even though he is bold and everything, that is not what I expected
from him. Cherian was there, holding my bloody collar and threatening to ruin me.
“Fuck Ryan, this is not funny,” I said.
“Oh really,” he said, laughing even harder, “then what is it? Cherian’s shirt, Neha in a
bedsheet. The prof must have gone psycho,” Ryan paused to laugh some more. “I wish I was
there.”
“Shut up. This is added tension man,” Alok said.
“What tension? You got the keys right?” Ryan said.
I nodded as I took out the bunch.
“So we’re still doing this?” I said.
“Why not? How does Cherian know about this?” Ryan said and dangled the keys in front
of him like a tempting bunch of ripe grapes.
“I don’t know. I’m scared Ryan. I really am.”
“Just relax dude. You are in shock, sex and horror on the same day,” Ryan said, laughing
again.
“Hari is right. We should re-evaluate Operation Pendulum.”
“Nonsense,” Ryan said and became serious again, “if at all, it makes the case stronger.
Hari’s only hope is if he cracks the majors. He can then still make Cherian feel that he is not
such a loser after all.”
“Thanks Ryan,” I said.
“Oh come on Hari. You had a few hitches today, but still managed fine. Let Cherian think
what he wants.”
“Wonder what he will do to Neha,” I said.
“You can’t do anything about that, can you? And not today at least. Let’s get the major
paper and then worry about other stuff.”
“You should talk to Neha after a few days only. Don’t worry, Cherian will try and bury it.
He wouldn’t want the world to know. And he doesn’t look like the dad who can talk to his
daughter about this sort of stuff,” Alok said and put his arm on my shoulder.
“We are friends man. Just have to wait for the evening now. Remember co-operate to
dominate,” Ryan said and hi-fived both of us.
Two hours later, at exactly five p.m. Alok got a call from home. We were sitting in Ryan’s
room and playing cards.
“Alok! Urgent phone call!” the guard below shouted at the top of his voice. Alok threw
back his set of three cards.
“What is it?” I said.
“I don’t know. Maybe my sister’s engagement date got fixed,” he yelled as he ran down
the stairs.
“Let’s go down. If that is true, we can get Fatso to treat us,” Ryan said as we followed
Alok down to the booth.
“Yes Mom, yes, I am fine. What happened, you don’t sound so good,” Alok said.
Ryan and I looked at each other and shrugged our shoulders.
“Really? What? I mean how could they?” Alok said as his own face dropped. Ryan and I
backed away from the booth. No treat this time.
“What happened to Dad? Mom, speak louder this line is not clear. What happened? Not
eating anything? For how long?” Alok said as the line got disconnected. The phone had gone
dead.
He sat down on the floor of the telephone booth. The flimsy wooden box shook with the
weight. “Can you believe this?”
“What? The phone has been giving trouble all week,” Ryan said.
“The boy’s side cancelled the proposal,” Alok said.
“Why?” I said.
“They wanted a portion of the dowry right now. To lock in the boy. Mom said she will
apply for a loan but it will take a few months. Meanwhile, they get another deal and it is all
over. Bloody idiots,” Alok said.
“That sounds sick. Why would you want to marry your sister off to such a family
anyway?” I said.
“I don’t know. All boys-side families are the same. And Dad is upset and has not eaten
anything since I don’t know when. There is mayhem at home, and the bloody phone is dead.”
“It is probably good the phone is dead. What could you have done? Get up now, let’s go
up and talk,” Ryan said, giving Alok a hand.
We went upstairs and stayed quiet for a while. Ryan finally broke the silence.
“Six o clock,” he said like a don to fellow-gangsters, “four hours more. We leave
Kumaon at ten for the operation.”
I nodded my head, barely listening to him. I was wondering what Neha was doing right
now.
“Ryan,” Alok said, “I am really not comfortable right now...”
“About what?” Ryan said.
“I am getting nervous about this operation. First Hari runs into Cherian. Then Didi’s
proposal flops. And Dad might just fall sick again if he doesn’t eat properly. I mean, we
don’t have to do this, do we?”
“Hey wait a minute now,” Ryan said as he stood up, “what has your sister’s proposal got
to do with this? And your dad will be fine.”
Alok remained silent with an unconvinced expression.
Ryan look at me and then back to Alok a couple of times. He paced around the room and
started speaking again, “But tell me, is this the time to discuss all this? I thought we had
made the decision. Look, we even have the keys.”
He jingled the bunch in his hand.
“But Ryan, we don’t need the risk now,” Alok said.
“There is no risk. Just four hours, and we will have the paper. End of story.”
“Hari, what do you think?” Alok said.
“Wait a minute,” Ryan said, his voice louder. “Are you going to make him take sides
again? Hari, does this Fatso want to do what he did after the first sem?”
“Relax Ryan,” I said, interrupting my re-playing of the last moments with Neha, “why are
you shouting?”
“Then tell Fatso to make up his mind,” Ryan said and sat down. He lit up a cigarette and
took a hurried puff.
“Of course I don’t want to split, guys,” Alok said.
“Or does he want to stay here and make us do the work? So he can get the paper for
free?” Ryan said.
“See, that is what he thinks. He doesn’t trust me,” Alok said.
“Relax guys, I said, “I think all of us are getting tense here. We have four hours until the
insti gets empty. We have the keys. We want the paper. If we do it, we do it together, right?”
“Right!” Ryan said.
We looked at Alok.
“Right” Alok said in a volume one-tenth that of Ryan.
“And we have thought through the risks right?” I said, looking at Ryan “Of course,” he
responded.
“Then let us just go for it. And Alok, your didi will find another match. If not now, maybe
when you get a job and can pay for the wedding. What is the big hurry? Right?” I said
looking at Alok.
“Right,” Alok said, his voice sounding more confident and relaxed.
“Friends?” I said, looking at both of them.
“Of course,” Ryan and Alok said in unison. “I’m in,” Alok said.
“Good. Let’s stay quiet for the next few hours,” I said, wanting to dream about Neha.
We kept quiet for the next three hours. Alok said something about being worried about his
dad. But we told him to relax, as his mom had handled such situations before. We did not go
down to the mess to eat dinner. Somehow, we felt the crowds in the mess would read our
minds.
“Ten o’ clock,” Ryan said and we jumped up as the clock struck the hour.
18
—
The Longest Day of My Life III
WE WANTED TO LEAVE NO TRAIL OF OUR PRESENCE. FOR the first time in years,
we walked to the insti instead of using Ryan’s scooter. We walked quietly past the hostels,
with books in hand as if going to the library for some midnight reading.
“So why did your parents start looking for your sister so early, how old is she?” I
whispered, nervous as hell.
“Just twenty-three. I think they should look for a boy only when I start working. It would
be much easier for me to get a loan,” Alok said.
I agreed.
“If I get a job that is. Not much out there for a miserable five-pointer,” he said.
“Well, maybe this A will lift you up a bit,” I said.
“Shh,” Ryan said as we reached the insti building.
We were being overcautious, as we scanned every corner for insti security guards. They
never hung around the lobby at this time, and we’d sneaked up the stairs dozens of times for
our vodka sessions. But we still split up and looked around all sides of the building – there
was no one.
Cherian’s office was on the sixth floor. There was minimal lighting on the stairs, and we
counted aloud as we finished each flight of stairs.
“…and six. That is it guys. We get out, and Cherian’s office is seventh door on the right,”
Ryan said.
We stepped on to the sixth floor. There was only one small bulb lighting the entire
corridor.
“D C Cherian, Head of the Department. Bloody pig,” Ryan said as he read the nameplate
outside Cherian’s office. Alok crouched behind me as Ryan examined the lock.
“Keys,” Ryan extended his left hand.
I took out my bunch of keys and they jingled as if on stereo.
“Keep it quiet,” Alok said.
“Stop being so scared, Fatso. No one knows we’re here.” He was freaking me out.
“Ryan, find the right key man,” I said.
“I’m trying. There are like a million of them in this bunch. Wait this one, no this one, no
this… ah I think this is it.”
“It is?” Alok looked dazed.
Ryan opened the bolt in one stroke, kicking the door open. There it was, the lair of the
head of the department of IIT Delhi Mechanical Engineering was ours. Ryan searched the
wall and flicked the light open.
“What are you doing?” Alok asked.
“How else will we search, Fatso? Just relax, no one can see us. Take your time and
search. And I want to search for something else too.”
“What?”
“My lube project proposal. Cherian bloody stuck it in his office and it got nowhere. Prof
Veera told me there is a copy here somewhere with his comments.”
“Whatever Ryan. Can we search for the paper first?”
“Where do we start?” Alok said as he scanned the piles of paper kept on Cherian’s
shelves. This could take all night.
“Look for brown bags with a red wax seal. They always open the seal at the time of the
papers,” Ryan said.
We divided the shelves to save time, and started a quick scan. I ran through journals,
administrative documents, course outlines and timetables. Nothing for twenty minutes.
“Anything?” I asked.
Ryan and Alok shook their heads. Ten minutes later, Ryan stepped back and sat on
Cherian’s chair.
“What?” I said.
“I have checked my shelves. There is nothing in mine. Got my lube project though. He just
says ‘no commercial viability or academic value’. What a prick.”
“Well, I can’t find anything either. Do you want to help?” I said.
“Red seal and brown bag. Indem Majors - Confidential. Is this what you are looking for
gentlemen?” Alok said and waved the bag in front of us.
We jumped up.
“Fatso, this is it man!” Ryan said.
“Yes,” I said as we hi-fived each other.
“I cannot believe it,” Alok said.
“That is because you don’t trust me. Though we still have stuff to do. So, wait while I
deal with this seal,” Ryan said as he emptied his pockets. A blade, candle, lighter and some
wax to re-seal the bag.
“Man, you come prepared,” Alok said, not able to resist a smile of relief.
“Well, what do you expect? Give me a few minutes now.” Ryan held the blade between
his thumb and the forefinger and got to work. He slowly sliced the seal open as neatly as
possible.
“Where did you learn all this?” I was impressed.
“I am training to be an engineer. This is not that hard to figure out. Now keep quiet,” Ryan
said.
“How long?” Alok said as sat down on the chair opposite to Cherian’s. “Ten minutes.
Quiet now else I’ll rip off some of the paper,” Ryan said. Two minutes passed. I looked at
Alok, who sat with his hands in his face. I could tell he was thinking about home again.
“I hope Dad feels better soon. He can really fall sick if he doesn’t eat properly. I wish I
could do something.”
Given Alok’s family’s love for food, I was pretty sure either of them would fall sick if
deprived of it.
“Don’t worry, it is nobody’s fault. The guy’s side seems too greedy if you ask me,” I
consoled.
“They are all the same. I just want to check on Dad. If only the bloody phone in Kumaon
was working,” Alok said.
“Yes!” Ryan said as he opened the seal with minimal damage. There were a hundred
crisp sheets inside. The fresh copies of the major paper!
“Wow, it’s the paper. Let me see it,” I said.
“No. I know you guys. You’ll just start discussing it right now. I am keeping this with me
until we wrap up and get out of here,” Ryan said.
“What else needs to be done,” Alok said.
“I have to put a fresh seal. Why do you think I brought the candle?” Ryan said.
“Anyway, I think he’ll take another million hours to finish,” Alok said.
“Hurry up, Ryan,” I said.
“Shut up,” he said as he heated a fresh blob of wax on the candle. He looked like a
craftsman intently at work.
“Hey Hari, Cherian’s office has a phone,” Alok said.
“Yes, it’s right there,” I said, pointing to the bookshelves where the instrument was kept.
“Maybe I can just make a quick call from here,” Alok said.
“Really? Don’t you want to wait and call from outside?”
“It’ll get really late. Besides, I just need to check how Dad is. What else do we have to
do now?”
“Okay,” I shrugged.
Alok stood up and went near the phone.
“I think you have to dial nine to get an outside line,” I said.
“Now what the heck are you guys doing? Can’t you just sit still,” Ryan scolded as he
spooned molten wax from the fresh seal.
“Just calling home for a minute. It is too much to wait for you to finish,” Alok said.
“Can’t you call from outside,” Ryan said, “or you are too cheap to spend a buck.”
“I just need a minute. You just pay attention to the seal,” Alok said as he dialled the
number.
He got through pretty soon, and it was clear that his mother had been waiting for Alok to
call back. Alok hardly spoke, as his mother vented about her miserable life and the hapless
fate of his didi.
Ryan continued dabbing some fresh wax on the underside of the old seal. I tried to pass
my time flipping through Ryan’s lube proposal. This is when the wires got ahead of us.
I did not know this then, but this is how the insti phone system works. Each prof has a
phone in the room that is part of the IIT network. One uses it mainly to dial internal campus
numbers. To dial outside, the network connects to a few external lines. When nine is
pressed, the internal phone requests an external line, and the campus telecom exchange
switches the lines. A control switchboard in the telecom exchange does this automatically.
The switchboard lights up a small red bulb for every engaged line. Every time one requests
an external line, the light turns green. This control room is in the institute security office on
the ground floor of the insti building. One night operator and a guard sit there at night,
mostly gossiping and snoozing through their shift. So, a little red bulb lit up on one of the
sixth floor phones, and then that red bulb turned green. What was Prof Cherian doing in his
room this time of the night? the guard wondered. The operator had the option to listen in to
the conversation if he wanted, and he did. This wasn’t Prof Cherian. It was a mother
reciting the sad tale of her daughter to someone called Alok. The security guard opened his
walkie talkie, and requested patrolling guards to check on Cherian’s room. The patrolling
guard was joined by another guard as he walked up to the sixth floor.
Unfortunately, like I said, we did not know all this then.
“There are some comments given on some of the pages though,” I said.
“All crap. Cherian just didn’t want to give this project a shot. I have demonstrated results
of efficiency improvements. How could he close this because of no viability? That bastard,
ouch!” A drop of wax fell on his fingers.
“Don’t worry. You concentrate on the seal. And hurry up, Alok,” I said.
The two guards came and stood outside our door. They must have been standing there for
two minutes before they opened the door. A lit candle, melted wax, someone on the prof’s
chair, a few strewn papers. The guards did not need to be too educated to figure it out.
Alok dropped the phone from his hand as he froze. His poor mother must have felt the
phone go dead again. Actually, we all went dead. I froze in my chair too, and I don’t know
how, but Ryan figured out what to say first.
“Oh, guard sahib. Hello, come in let me explain,” he said, trying to be as calm as
possible.
“Who are you?”
“Guard sahib,” Ryan said as he stood up, almost ready to dash out if needed. Alok and I
came up behind him as well, waiting for any sudden instructions.
“Don’t come near us,” the guard said, “we are calling the prof now.”
“Oh no guard sahib, listen to us,” Ryan said as he went near the door. It was clear we had
to make a dash now.
The guard picked up our intentions or something, or maybe he was just scared and stupid.
He backed off, and shut us inside the office. We heard him bolt the door and tell his fellow
guard to call the prof and the chief security officer. Ryan tried calling the guard again, but it
was to no avail. There we were, three of us locked in Cherian’s office on the sixth floor at
midnight.
We didn’t say a word, we just looked at each other’s faces. We could do nothing but wait
and wait and wait. The longest day of my life wouldn’t get over…
19
—
The Longest Day of My Life IV
I KIND OF WENT INSIDE MYSELF IN THAT SHORT SPAN OF time before Cherian’s
office door opened again and sealed our fate, just sat quietly and ignored what Ryan and
Alok said, that is if they did say anything. Future scenes erupted in my mind. By tomorrow
morning, all profs, all students at Kumaon and other hostels would know about us. Caught
stealing the major paper from Prof Cherian’s office, no less! Probably the insti director
would also come on this special occasion. Cherian would get us all shot if he could, but
either way he would definitely not go easy on us. What did they call it? Disciplinary
Committee or Disco, for deciding the fate of the students who broke discipline. Suddenly,
my five-point GPA seemed wonderful to me. If only I could pass out of this place with a
simple job and this could all be over. But even keeping that GPA and passing out was not
going to be easy now. Will Cherian soften if we grovelled? Should we just deny that we
had come here to cheat? Should we just admit everything and apologize? Can we just
rewind a few minutes and stop Alok from making that call? Could I just re-live this one
day?
These stupid questions darted about like rabbits inside my head. I took a deep breath; we
just had to live through these moments.
“Someone’s come,” Ryan said and we stood up. The bolt was opened and around ten
people swarmed in. I recognized the two security guards and the chief security officer by
their uniforms. The other guy with them was the telephone exchange operator, I knew since
he wore an insti uniform. These morons with dull jobs were the heroes of the day.
And then it was a couple of profs from the Mechanical Engineering department. Even
Prof Veera was there. And of course, there was the man whose office we had temporarily
occupied – Cherian. He stood there shocked, wondering how his office was broken into so
cleanly. It was the Who’s Who of IIT, most of them in their pajamas. People get more pissed
off if they are disturbed in their pajamas.
The guard told everyone to come inside the room, keeping an eye on us as if we’d try to
make a dash again.
“You?” Cherian said, looking straight at me. He must have been wondering: his daughter
in the morning and his office in the evening. I’d be pissed if someone screwed all over my
life in one day.
“What are you doing here?” Prof Veera said, probably aware of what we had been up to.
The guard had told everyone what he had seen a million times; the candle, the seal and the
major papers. Maybe Prof Veera was just giving us a chance to verbalize a good lie to get
out of this.
We said nothing, hoping silence would evaporate us.
“Cheating, sir, stealing major paper. My boys caught them,” the security chief said, proud
as if they had broken a CIA ring.
“You were stealing the paper from my office? How did you get in?” Cherian asked me
directly.
“You know him?” one of the profs asked Cherian.
“Not really. I have just seen him in class, a very poor student. He was even drunk in my
viva, you know Dean Shastri. Yes, that is the only time I remember him from, Hari Kumar,
isn’t it?”
I guess Cherian did not want to mention our morning tryst to the rest of the profs.
“And the others? What are your names?” the Dean said.
“Alok Gupta, sir. Kumaon hostel, Mechanical Engineering,” Alok said.
“Ryan Oberoi, same,” Ryan said.
“And you think you are too smart?” the Dean said.
“No sir. That is why we wanted the paper, sir,” Ryan said.
Slap! The Dean slapped Ryan right across the face. I don’t blame him, Ryan could have
chosen a better time to make a wisecrack.
Slap! Slap! Before I realized what was happening, the Dean deposited a slap on Alok and
me as well.
God, I tell you, it was humiliating. Profs, security guards and Cherian all staring at us
while our faces turned red on the left. But we kept quiet. I secretly hoped they would all
slap us and get it out of their system. Heck, they could trash us senseless as long as that was
the only punishment. Please don’t do a Disco and screw with our career.
“You are criminals. You realize? You are criminals. Call the police,” Cherian said, his
whole being trembling, as if he was the one being slapped around.
He was walking to the phone when Prof Veera spoke, “Cherian sir, one minute before you
call the police sir, this will become a big deal.”
“It is a big deal,” Cherian screamed out loud. Just slap us, Cherian, I thought. I know he
wanted to, especially me.
“Dean Shastri, you explain to him. Police will mean the case will hit the papers. I mean,
do you really want IIT in the news for all the wrong reasons,” Prof Veera reasoned.
“Hmmm,” Dean Shastri said, rubbing his hands.
“Sir, we have mechanisms in the insti to deal with this, right? The police will not arrive
without reporters,” Prof Veera said.
“Veera might be right. I don’t want the IIT name in mud because of these miscreants.”
Even in this situation, I felt the word ‘miscreant’ was quite cute and funny. I almost
smiled.
“Sir, I don’t want to spoil the IIT name either. But I want these boys to suffer. Who do
they think they are?” Cherian said as he stopped cuddling the phone.
“I agree, this is quite outrageous. We cannot decide their fate so easily. We have a
mechanism, not that we use it often. Take them to Disco.”
It was time for us to shiver as we heard the last word. Maybe our silence was not so
golden after all. Do something oh clever Ryan, I wanted to say but he stood silent. Only
Alok did something. In his usual manner, he began to cry.
“Sir, please sir. We are so sorry, sir…” he said.
“No more discussion. Bloody standard of these students falling every year. We’ll talk in
an urgent Disco – tomorrow!” declared the Dean.
“Dean sir, you can test intelligence in entrance exams, but how to test for integrity?” the
security chief said. He probably got less credit for his achievement that night.
A crowd gathered around the Kumaon hostel notice board the next morning. On a small
piece of paper, the size of a bank cheque, the short notice was enough to start long
conversations.
“This is to inform that there will be a Disciplinary Committee meeting starting at
10:00 pm tonight in the Mechanical Engineering Department Conference Room. The
agenda of the meeting is to decide the course of action for alleged disciplinary breaches
by Hari Kumar (Kumaon), Alok Gupta (Kumaon) and Ryan Oberoi (Kumaon) on April
11.”
The three of us were too ashamed to come to the notice board. We cut through the crowd
as quickly as possible, even though we heard some questions.
“What happened?” said Anurag, “skipping too many classes or what?”
“That doesn’t lead to a Disco. Must be something else.”
“I think this is big. They are holding the Disco in one day,” another Kumaonite said.
“Yes, at night too. Something to do with the Mechanical Engineering department.”
We let the smart inmates of Kumaon figure out what was going on. We simply looked
down and headed out of campus. Courtesy Neha, I knew a few places where no one would
find us. The ice-cream parlour seemed perfect. Alok reached straight for the counter and
came back with three strawberry cones.
“Ryan, you got cash? I don’t have any,” Alok said, passing us our treats.
“Fatso, you can’t resist food even at this time,” I said.
“It is ice-cream man. Just trying to distract myself, you know I didn’t sleep for two
seconds last night.”
“Me neither,” I said.
“What do you think they’ll do?” Alok said.
“Maybe an F in Indem,” Ryan hazarded a guess.
“An F! I have never got an F. And we’ll have to repeat the course,” Alok said.
“I know. But it is not the end of the world,” Ryan said.
“Are you guys dreaming? They will hold a night-time Disco with all these profs and all to
give just us a measly F?” I said.
Ryan and Alok looked at me as if I just stolen the cherry off their ice-cream.
“Sir, come to reality. The Disco meets rarely. And when they do, they have no mercy.”
“So what can they do?” Alok said.
“They could expel you from college. Or more commonly, suspend you for a year or a
semester.”
“Expel?” Alok said, shivering as if the ice-cream had given him a cold.
“They won’t expel. That has never happened. Even to people who have been caught
stuffing coke bottles you know where,” Ryan said.
“They could suspend you for a semester or a year. That is enough to fuck your future. You
try getting a job after that,” I said.
“For a whole semester? What will we do then?” Alok said. Looked like our man was just
waking up.
I kept silent. Ryan finished his strawberry cone and tossed the tissue straight into the bin.
“Say something guys. What will happen then?”
“Figure it out Fatso. Your grade sheet will have no grades for a semester or two. It may
actually have ‘suspended’ stamped all over it. Makes for a great conversation starter in a
job interview, eh?” Ryan said.
“I think no one will give you a job, the bloody US types take this cheating stuff pretty
seriously. No admission to MBA colleges either – they will ask the same in an interview.”
“In other words, our lives are screwed,” I said, noticing I had not touched my ice-cream.
The cone was a gooey mess, I passed it to Ryan to chuck into the bin.
“And you guys are calm about it? How can you be so calm about it? What will my parents
think? What will happen to Didi?” Alok said, putting his elbows on the table and pulling at
his hair. Then he tucked his face in his arms, to hide his tears.
“Who the hell says I am calm about it?” Ryan said and stood up, his voice loud enough to
stir the sleepy cashier at the counter.
“Be quiet and sit down. There might be people from the insti here,” I said.
“Fuck the people. And fuck the insti. And fuck this Fatso who feels only he loses sleep at
night and cares about his future! Wake up Mr Alok, this is not the time to cry and pull hair.
We have a bloody Disco in ten hours, and maybe we should think about how we are going to
answer the bloody profs.”
“Oh yes,” Alok stood up this time. I guess it is easier to shout when you are standing up.
“Oh yes, Mr Ryan,” Alok said, “so it is you with all the brains to think strategy at this
moment. I say, fuck you and your strategy. What happened to Operation Pendulum?”
It was pointless for me to try and keep them quiet. They needed this I guess.
“Operation Pendulum? You are telling me that was bad strategy? Which bloody baby had
to call Mom?” Ryan said.
“Oh yes. And which IITian in history breaks into a prof’s office? ‘Nothing can happen’.
My bloody ass nothing can happen.”
They argued for five minutes after which I broke into tears. They were coming on their
own, even though I didn’t think this Disco would get the better of me. Man, I was crying like
Alok. It was embarrassing as hell, but at least they noticed me.
“What is wrong with you now?” Ryan said.
“Nothing. Just stop shouting both of you. This won’t help. We need each other now.”
“He is right. Sit down, Fatso,” Ryan said.
All of us sat in the ice-cream parlour for the next five hours. Over two banana toffee
cones, one mint chocolate chip and three raspberry delights we figured out the best
arguments to save our lives. There was little hope, but we had to do what we could. Our
strategy was hardly creative – it was to be honest, stay calm and beg for mercy. We only
reached Kumaon at six p.m., where I had at least six phone messages from Prof Veera. He
wanted to see us before the Disco, and we agreed to meet him at nine.
“You got duplicate what made?” Prof Veera asked again, more in shock at the story we had
told him.
“Keys sir. For six rupees at Jia Sarai,” I said.
Prof Veera sat back in his chair and burst into laughter.
“This is incredible. I have never heard this in IIT. So Ryan, you thought you could just go
into the head of department’s office and steal the paper and end up with an A.”
“Yes sir,” Ryan said in a suitably humble voice.
“And you Hari went and sneaked out the keys from Neha, who you say is your girlfriend,
so that you could steal from her dad’s office.”
“That is correct, sir,” I said.
“And you Alok, just went along with this crazy plan of theirs.”
“They are my friends, sir,” Alok said.
I have to say this statement touched me. For a moment, I forgot the hell around me and felt
good that Alok found that reason enough.
“You guys are idiots. You know, just big idiots, that is what you are,” Prof Veera said. He
seemed pretty harsh, but we liked him. Besides, he was right.
“Sir, we almost made it. Alok made this phone call…” Ryan said.
“Almost made it?” Prof Veera interrupted, “is that what it is all about? You think I am
calling you an idiot because you got caught?” The tone of Prof Veera’s voice had become
firmer. This was the closest he got to being real mad.
“You, Ryan Oberoi, I thought was one of the most brilliant students we had ever had.
Your lube project was the best work I have seen come out of a student. I don’t care about
your grades at all. But you were stupid enough to risk your future for a stupid letter on your
grade sheet.”
Ryan hung his head.
“And the three of you are best friends. But none of you was able to stop each other from
this madness. You know Cherian would have thrown you into jail.”
“Sir, we’ll say we are sorry sir. Maybe they will be kind,” Alok said.
“Kind? This is the Disco, not Mother Teresa’s home. You saw Cherian’s face,” Prof
Veera said.
The three of us became silent. We could hear the clock ticking in Prof Veera’s office. It
was nine-thirty.
“So what is your plea to the Disco? Guilty or not guilty?” Prof Veera said.
“Guilty. They caught us red-handed sir,” I said.
“Hmm. I think the first thing you have to do is get the expulsion stuff out of the way,” Prof
Veera said.
“You mean there is a chance?” Alok said.
“Not too high, unless Cherian is hell-bent on it. What are you going to say about the
keys?” Prof Veera said.
“I don’t want to bring Neha into this. I thought we’d just say we collected lots of keys and
tried them until one worked,” I said.
“Why not tell them the truth? You have told me everything,” Prof Veera said.
“I don’t want Neha to know,” I said.
“Listen boys, I am trying to help you here. I think you are in a big mess but if you can
twist this a bit, you may save yourself some trouble.”
“Like how?”
“One, we should try and present some alternatives of punishment. I will be there, so I can
suggest an F in the course, a public apology and hundred hours of community service.”
“What is community service?” Ryan said.
“Just helping around in the campus – painting cycle parks or planting trees - that kind of
stuff,” Prof Veera said.
“I hate that stuff,” Ryan said.
“Shut up Ryan. That is fine. Please continue sir,” I said.
“Two, I want you to twist the story a bit. I hate lying, but you won’t have much of a
chance other wise. So, instead of saying you tried different keys, say that Neha gave the keys
to you,” Prof Veera said.
“What?” all three of us said in unison.
“Listen, if you say that you know Neha, and somehow she was upset with her father and
gave you the keys to get even, it will get personal. The Disco committee will think you
didn’t actually break in. I don’t know, they may see right through it, but I think you should
take a chance.”
“What will Neha think when she finds out?” I said, “No way we can do this.”
“An upset girlfriend is better than a tainted degree and no jobs after college,” Prof Veera
said.
“Prof Veera is right Hari,” Ryan said, “you bring Cherian’s family into this and he may
withdraw. Last thing he wants is everyone to know that you are his daughter’s boyfriend.”
“But this will let the whole world know,” I said.
“You don’t have to tell the whole story. Just say Neha is a recent friend of yours. I am
sure Cherian will not dispute that,” Alok said.
“Alok, even you think this is the way?” I said.
“Yes, we have to save our ass right? C’mon, it is just a last-ditch survival strategy. Lastditch
survival,” Alok said.
I hated myself for agreeing to that story. What would Neha think when she heard what I
said? That she helped me by giving the keys? She’d probably hate me forever. The clock
struck ten, and it was time to go to the departmental committee room.
Romance was secondary to survival right now.
I Love u Rachu
Dear Frnds pls spread this msg until its reach to my rachu
I thinks see knows my name
Downloaded from EBOOK4IN.BLOGSPOT.COM
20
—
The Longest Day of My Life V
THE IIT DISCO IS ABOUT AS FAR AWAY FROM DANCING AS it can get. Here the
lighting is dull, the room dead silent and almost everyone elderly. Around ten profs sat
around a semicircular table, while the accused students were bang in the centre. Profs fire
questions at students from all directions, the location placing us at minimum distance to each
one of them. It is essentially a more efficient design of a courtroom, I guess, Indem-inspired.
Dean Shastri asked us to take our places. Dean Shastri, Director Verma and Prof Cherian
formed the co-chairpersons. Prof Veera was one of the other seven profs who mattered little
in the scheme of things. A lot of them yawned, probably used to being in bed at this time. Of
course, for their students, dumped with another set of assignments, the night would have just
begun.
“May the disciplinary committee begin, fellow co-chairs,” Dean Shastri said in what I
felt was a complete waste of courtesy.
“You may begin,” the Director and Prof Cherian said. I guess this formality gave them an
extra sense of power.
What if I was speechless today, I thought and sweat broke out all over me. All the profs
opened the special Disco file, which contained a description of last night’s shenanigans.
Ryan noticed my nervousness. It is amazing how people who know you well can sense
everything. “Hari,” he whispered.
I looked at him.
“I know what you are worried about. Remember, this is not a viva. If you don’t open your
trap here, you will be in deeper crap than a bloody zero. You understand, don’t you?”
“Uh, yes,” I said.
“And I want you to know that even though I hate to admit it, you are a bloody stud,” Ryan
said.
“Why?”
“Because, in front of you lies a man who controls your future right now. Yet, whatever he
may do, he can’t take away one fact.”
“What?”
“That you went and slept with his only daughter in broad daylight. That my friend is a true
stud,” Ryan said.
“You think so?” I perked up.
“I do. I salute you man. I am proud to have a friend like you,” Ryan said.
I beamed.
“No talking amongst the students,” Dean Shastri said and looked up from his file.
“Sorry sir,” I said. Ryan and I pointed thumbs at each other. Damn it, I could answer these
old bozos any time.
“Mr Hari Kumar, the files here state that you were found in Prof Cherian’s office last
night with two friends. Is that right?” Dean Shastri said.
“Yes sir,” I said.
“Ryan Oberoi, we learn that security found you with a candle, wax seal and the packet of
major papers in hand. Is that right?”
“Yes, sir,” Ryan agreed.
“Alok Gupta, we learn that it was you who was making a call from Prof Cherian’s phone
last night.”
Alok nodded.
“Do you boys realize the gravity of this incident?” the director said.
“Yes sir, we got carried away sir,” I said. Man, I was surprised I was taking the initiative
to answer these questions.
Other questions were part-rhetoric, part-moral in nature. I can’t even remember all of
them now, it was about integrity and strength of character and all that stuff. We just
apologized, probably a million times. Ultimately they asked the question we were waiting
for.
“How did you get into my office?” Prof Cherian said.
“We had the keys, sir,” Ryan said.
“How did you get the keys?” He looked baffled.
“Sir, we sir…” I said and turned silent. No, I couldn’t do this.
“Hari’s friend Neha gave it to us,” Ryan supplied.
“Who is Neha?” Dean Shastri asked.
“Neha Cherian is Prof Cherian’s daughter. I know her as a friend for the past three
months,” I said.
The room fell silent as Dean Shastri and Director Verma’s mouths went slack. They
turned toward Prof Cherian, as if he was next in the firing line. But that was not Disco
protocol.
“What? You sure of what you are talking about?” Dean Shastri said.
“I am. She was upset with her father and wanted to get even. She offered the keys and we
got carried away,” I said.
There were not too many questions after that. But somehow, every prof wanted to talk to
their neighbour. Even the seven sleepy profs woke up; this was more interesting than a
simple caught-red-handed case.
Cherian whispered something in Dean Shastri’s and Director Verma’s ears. Dean Shastri
nodded and made an announcement.
“We are done with investigating the students. I think we now need to deliberate in the
committee to come up with the important decision. This may take some time, even a couple
of hours. But once we finish, we will have a final decision. No appeals, no pleas. The
students may leave now.”
Dean Shastri signaled us to leave the room. We left the Disco room and came out to the
campus lawns.
“How do you think that went?” Alok said.
I shrugged my shoulders. The thought of Neha kicked me in the stomach.
“Who knows? Let’s wait near here,” Ryan said, sitting down on the wet midnight grass.
“It could take hours,” I said.
“What else do we have to do? But let’s not wait near here. Let’s go to the insti roof,”
Alok said.
I liked the idea of the insti roof. It was the one place where we felt secure now, as even
Kumaon was difficult to be in right now, with a million eyes on us.
“How will we find out they are done?” Ryan said.
“We’ll keep looking down. The corridor light is on. When they come out, we should be
able to see something.”
“Fine, let’s go up,” Ryan said.
We sat on the roof of the institute building, each of us five feet apart at the ends of an
imaginary triangle. The moon shone too audaciously for what is, after all, just reflected
light. It was different on the roof that day. I hated myself for dragging Neha into this. In fact,
I hated myself for being a cheat. And for everything else – agreeing to duplicate the keys,
being a part of Operation Pendulum and bringing my life to this. How did I get here? I was
a topper in my school all my life. That is how I got into IIT, right? But then why am I now
a low-performer, five-point something cheat sitting on the insti roof at midnight, unsure
of my future?
It is funny how your mind comes up with questions. Damn it, it is up to the mind to come
out with the answers, so why can’t it just keep its doubts to itself? I realized I was not
making sense. Two sleepless nights in a row didn’t help. But the questions would not stop.
I looked at my friends. Friends? What the hell is that anyway? Who is this Alok? And
what the fuck do I care that his father is half-dead and his sister can’t be married without
cash? Then I turned to look at Ryan. Yes, the stylish, smart and confident Ryan. The man
who was so sure of himself, he could take on the world. He wanted his revenge on Cherian.
Now what exactly is the point of that? Doesn’t seem like all his ideas are quite so smart
after all. Why do I listen to him and not Alok? And why is everybody so quiet now?
I bent my head to check the time on Ryan’s Swiss watch. It was three in the morning.
“Tea?” Ryan said, rubbing his hands.
“No, I’m already wide awake, thank you,” I said.
“Yeah. I am fine too,” Alok said.
Tea. That is the best Ryan can come up with right now. A shot of caffeine as compensation
for throwing away everything that mattered to us.
“It’s cold here,” Ryan said.
I nodded my head. Yes Ryan, it is miserably cold, infect, almost like a December night in
Delhi, I wanted to say. But you know what, I don’t feel it. There are more important
miserable things happening right now. Like we could be thrown out of IIT in a few hours,
and may never find a respectable education or job again. I chose another response. “Yes,
must be five degrees,” I said.
Half an hour passed. Ryan stood up and walked to the precipice of the roof. Nine stories
high, this is the highest point in the institute. Yet, there is no parapet, as the roof is officially
out of bounds. One step more and Ryan could enjoy his last few seconds of free-fall
weightlessness. He stands on the edge and bends forward to look down. He extends one leg
out.
“What are you doing?” Alok said.
Yes, what exactly are you doing Ryan, I thought. Haven’t we lived on the edge long
enough? Isn’t our life screwed up enough already? Can’t we wait for the Disco results in
silence without engaging in attention-seeking behaviour, please?
“Come back, Ryan,” I called out.
He turned around. “It is really high here.” Slowly, he retreated and came back to where
he’d been sitting.
Yes, it is high. Yes, it is cold. Any other insightful statements, sir, I wondered.
If there is one thing men completely lack, it is the ability to communicate during tough
moments. Alok and I have no words at all, while the best Ryan can come up with is
comments on our thermodynamic and spatial state. So different from Neha who always has
something appropriately verbal for any occasion. But there won’t be any more Neha after
this, especially after Alok’s so called “last-ditch survival” strategy in the Disco interview.
No more Neha – my stomach churns as the fact finally registers. So here I am, sitting with
my two best friends, one will get me thrown out of the college that I worked two years to get
into and endured for another three years. The other has ended whatever semblance of a love
life I ever had.
“You think the Disco might be lenient?” Alok said.
“It is the disciplinary committee, not a joke. You know the Disco never spares,” I said.
Disco, what a name, I find it funny even at this hour, even when I am in the middle of it.
Ryan looked up at both of us. “This was all a bad idea,” he said.
Thank you, Ryan. It is cold, it is very high and yes, Operation Pendulum was a bad idea.
Just keep these obvious statements coming.
We heard a noise downstairs at four-thirty. A few scooters started, as tired profs wanted
to rush back home. That was our cue; the results were out.
“C’mon guys, we need to race down,” I said.
“Yes, let’s go. Prof Veera should be there,” Ryan said.
“I am going to stay here. Just come back and tell me,” Alok said.
“Just come down, Fatso,” Ryan said.
“No, I can’t face the profs when they tell me,” he said.
“Whatever then. Let us go, Hari,” Ryan said.
We ran down the stairs. Most of the profs had left. Dean Shastri, Cherian and Veera
remained.
“Prof Veera sir,” Ryan said as he approached him from behind.
“Ryan,” Prof Veera said, “just a second.”
Prof Veera spoke to Cherian and Dean Shastri for a few more minutes. Soon all of them
wished each other good night. Cherian went to his car, the one that had allowed all this to
happen.
“Sir?” I said.
“Ryan and Hari, you have not been expelled,” Prof Veera said.
“Really? So what was the decision?” I said.
“We talked for hours. There was divided opinion, but ultimately the Disco decided that
the three of you are suspended for one semester.”
“Sir?” I said.
“I tried guys. But the Disco doesn’t go easy. You lose a semester, which means you have
only one last semester to do fourth year courses. Also, you get an F in Indem, and you have
to repeat it again. Not to mention the final year project. As of now, insti rules do not allow
to take that much course-load,” Prof Veera said.
“So we have to do courses next year. And we can’t sit for job interviews either,” I said.
“I am afraid so. I tried talking to Prof Cherian about allowing some project credit in the
suspended semester. I asked if you guys could work with me. But he just said no.
Suspension means full suspension.”
“It’s over. Our grade sheets are ruined. We can’t get a job. And we have to wait an extra
year to get a useless degree,” I said.
Ryan kept silent.
“I am sorry it turned out this way guys,” Prof Veera said, patting our shoulders. He
walked past us to his scooter. A few seconds and some exhaust smoke later, he was gone.
We climbed up to the insti roof, where Alok waited with his hands folded. Maybe he was
praying. Or maybe he was just cold.
“Kicked out for one sem. F in Indem. Need to stay until next year to complete course,”
Ryan said, summing it up for Alok.
“What?” Alok said, coming out of his trance.
“Prof Veera tried, saved an expulsion. But it is still pretty screwy. I don’t know what
we’ll do,” I said.
We sat down again. It was five a.m., just one hour before daybreak.
Alok stood up without saying anything. I wished he would, as his face seemed tense as
hell. He walked to the edge of the roof where Ryan had stood just an hour back.
“You were right Ryan. It is pretty high here,” Alok said.
“You okay Alok?” Ryan said.
“Yes. You think only you can stand on the edge of the roof?” Alok asked.
“No. Just come back and let us go down. I have had enough,” Ryan said.
Alok continued to look down as he replied, “For once Ryan, I agree with you. I’ve had
enough too. I think I’ll just go down.”
There was something messed up in the tone of Alok’s voice. I turned around to look at
him. He stood straight, then one jump up and then straight down. In half a second, he was out
of sight. Gravity had done its job.
21
—
The Longest Day of My Life VI
I HAD NEVER BEEN INSIDE AN AMBULANCE BEFORE. IT WAS kind of creepy
inside. Like a hospital was suddenly asked to pack up and move. Instruments, catheters,
drips and a medicine box surrounded two beds. There was hardly any space for me and
Ryan to stand even as Alok got to sprawl out. I guess with thirteen fractures you kind of
deserve a bed. The sheets were originally white, which was hard to tell now as Alok’s
blood covered every square inch of them. Alok lay there unrecognizable, his eyeballs rolled
up and his tongue collapsed outside his mouth like an old man without dentures. Four front
teeth gone, the doctor later told us.
His limbs were motionless, just like his father’s right side, the right knee bent in a way
that would make you think Alok was boneless. He was still, and if I had to bet my money,
I’d have said he was dead.
“If Alok makes it through this, I will write a book about our crazy days. I really will,” I
swore. It is the kind of absurd promise you make to yourself when you are seriously messed
up in the head and you haven’t slept for fifty hours straight…
The ambulance took us to AIIMS, the biggest hospital in Delhi. The blood and two
sleepless nights had made me numb. I don’t know who called the ambulance, or who made
the choice of hospital. Maybe it was the security guard. Everyone around me seemed to be
acting urgently.
More medical professionals at the AIIMS emergency ward. This was a government
hospital, so lots of people but little service. Ryan screamed at a few of them, shaking them
into action.
“Nine stories?” one of the stretcher-bearers asked, probably wondering if it was even
worth it to carry this heavy weight to the intensive care unit.
The doctor told us to leave the ICU and wait outside. Damn, I was tired of waiting. I sat
outside on a wooden stool. Relatives of patients fighting for life inside sat around me;
mothers, daughters, sons and fathers. I tried fighting sleep, but it wouldn’t work.
Ryan woke me up at noon. My entire left side had cramped.
“He is going to make it! Doctor said it is pretty bad, but he is going to make it!”
“What? How? I mean really?”
“Yes, he fell on his bottom, right into the fountain by the insti building. Can you believe
that? Doctor said his fat bottom and the six inches of water cushioned the impact.”
Thank god Alok was a fatso. And thank god they made that useless fountain by the insti
building. Eleven fractures in the legs and two in the arms isn’t so bad. Given how much
Fatso eats, he could probably build his bones back in a day.
“I thought he’d die, I really thought he would,” I said and hugged Ryan. And then I started
crying. I don’t know why I did an Alok then. It was embarrassing but kind of okay in a
hospital.
“Is he awake?”
“Not much. But mostly because he hadn’t slept for two days. Let us go pinch his butt,”
Ryan said.
We went inside the ICU and saw Alok asleep.
“Patient needs time to rest,” the nurse said and signalled us to keep quiet. We left the ICU
and took a bus back to Kumaon.
On our way back in the bus, Ryan turned to me. “You know Hari, I owe Fatso a lot.”
“Really?” I said.
“If it weren’t for him, I would have never studied to even reach a five-pointer,” Ryan
said.
I guess he was right. It was only he who brought us to our books. And now as he lay
there, we didn’t have any books to study from.
“You think he will be okay?” Ryan said.
“He will Ryan. He will,” I said and hugged Ryan. For the first time, he felt more heavy
than strong. He hugged me back tighter.
“I am sorry Hari,” Ryan said and his voice sounded like he was fighting back tears, “I am
sorry.”
“It’s okay, we can get through this,” I said.
All of us needed time to rest. And we had time – four months of it – to take all the rest in
the world.
I Love u Rachu
Dear Frnds pls spread this msg until its reach to my rachu
I thinks see knows my name
Downloaded from EBOOK4IN.BLOGSPOT.COM
22
—
Ryan Speaks
IBLEW IT. DAMN, FATSO WAS IN THE ICU BATTLING TO breathe. That really was
disaster, eh? This whole Operation Pendulum was a mistake – in hindsight of course. It
could all have been dif erent you know. If Fatso had just not tried to save a buck and
make that phone call, or better yet, if he hadn’t come at all. If nothing else, at least he
should have known better than to jump. What is it with Alok, or for that matter, even with
Hari? When will they grow up?
Now you will say, I really don’t want to accept that it was my fault. Ryan will blame
anyone – his parents, his friends, his college, even god – anyone but himself. He is that
boy with the grudge!
I don’t blame you. You are reading Hari’s version. How can he be the bad guy, right?
After all, Hari is just a bumbling IITian who can’t get his grades or life in order. He is
just kind-hearted and confused – hopelessly in love, physically unappealing, wants to
keep his friends together, fumbles in vivas – whatever, whatever, whatever. Can’t help but
feel sorry for that guy right?
Did it ever occur to you that at one level Mr Sorryboy has a layer to him that he
doesn’t want to unpeel and will not bring up in his, yes that is the key word – HIS, book?
Like he will never really bring up his parents. Or if you think he will reveal the big bad
story about why his vivas get screwed up – sorry, no luck there. Or why does he always
make fun of Alok’s family – I mean it is funny but it isn’t what you could call sensitive.
No, he won’t go into all that. Maybe I can touch on it at least (too much and he’ll edit
it right out). But before that, I want to come back to Alok. Man – you don’t jump nine
stories because some old bozos do a Disco on you. Or if you can’t pay for the car that
will buy your sis a loser for the rest of her life. Why is he so stupid? If he was so mad, he
should have pushed me instead.
You know what, despite what you might think, I like Alok. Yes, we fight, we argue and
sometimes I hate his mugger-whiner guts. But at the end of the day, the guy lives a
selfless life. He doesn’t really want to get that high average in the quiz. Damn, he doesn’t
even want to be an IITian (but then, who would). It is something he does for his folks
back home, day after day after day. Just as he has been serving his dad since he was
twelve, locked in that room full of books, medicines and misery. That is why he never
grew up. That is why he thinks its okay to – ugh – cry at twenty.
And that is why he never had fun. But does that mean he doesn’t want to? Why do you
think he stuck with us? Or why did he come back? Because at one level, he knew that he
wasn’t Venkat. He was just a boy who wanted to be an artist – and couldn’t become one.
And he was a boy who never had real friends in his life – but he wanted them. And when I
saved him from that hideous ragging, it wasn’t something that happened to him every day.
So he stuck with me, and fought with me, and cursed me and hated me – while all he was
doing was fighting, cursing and hating himself. I shook his convictions – one didn’t have
to care for parents at all costs, one didn’t have to accept the system, one didn’t have to
sacrifice fun. I pushed him, he resisted and liked it at the same time. And I pushed some
more, and more, until I went too far. God, please let him live.
But Hari? Him I want to ask a few questions. Like what’s with your parents Hari? Is
there going to be no chapter covering that? What about your Dad – the colonel in the
army? What is the rule in the house – no TV, no music, no laughing loud? It is all for
discipline, right?
And your mother – she turns silent for days, right? Oh, wait a minute, I am not
supposed to talk about that. What about the belt your father hangs in the closet. Do you
still dream of that sometimes, Hari? He told you not to answer back. If you answer your
superiors back, you will be punished. Severely. Is it viva-time? Does it still hurt, Hari?
Okay, I think I am pushing it. Hari is okay, he just has some issues he doesn’t want to
talk about. And just because one writes a book doesn’t mean one has to bare all. After all,
this is a book about IIT – the place where one makes a future. What is the point of
digging up the past?
So let me come back to IIT. Hari (with more vodka inside him than he can handle) once
told me his view on friendship.
He said, “Ryan, you are stupid to want to sacrifice so much for your friends. In some
ways, it is the same madness that Alok has for his family. Both of you have lost touch with
what you really want.”
Profound eh? So, I asked him if he was in touch with what he wanted. And he nodded.
“What do you want?” I asked.
“To be you.”
“What?” I hadn’t heard right!
“I want Neha,” he said and passed out, the horny bastard.
So what’s the deal here – he may not live for others, but he wants to be like others?
Confused, I tell you.
23
—
Kaju-burfi
TWO MONTHS INTO OUR SUSPENDED SEMESTER, ALOK finally returned to
Kumaon. The casts were still on, and doctors said that even when they came off, he would
be left with a slight limp in his left leg. Small price to pay for one’s life I guess, though it
meant Alok would never forget that night for the rest of his life.
We visited him daily in the hospital, as we had nothing else to do anyway. We never
discussed going home for the semester. Somehow, we knew we had to stay in Kumaon and
be near each other. No one really talked to us much. If they did, they only wanted to know
the inside story – what we did, what was the Disco like, why did Alok jump etc. It suited us
to stick to our rooms and limit our outside trips to the hospital.
Alok swore us into keeping his high jump a secret from his family. His bones healed
gradually and after a month he could at least hop-and-walk to the toilet and not embarrass
himself with company there. Though docs had warned us not to mention the fall, Ryan
couldn’t resist asking once, “Stupid or what?”
But Alok kept silent. A couple of times, Prof Veera visited at the hospital. He kept our
spirits high, saying how he would try to get us to take extra course-work in the last semester
to complete our credits. He even unsuccessfully tried talking to Cherian on a mercy plea.
Prof Veera even came to Kumaon, to welcome Alok back. “So Tiger, you are back in your
den,” he greeted.
Alok was sitting on my bed, his torso propped up on pillows. “Sir, you shouldn’t have
bothered to come.”
“No big deal,” Prof Veera dismissed and took out a box from his bag, “Here have some
sweets. On Alok’s return home and for something else.”
Alok looked at the box and almost snatched it out of Prof Veera’s hand. When it comes to
food, Fatso forgets all formalities. The box contained kaju-burfi, his all-time favourite.
“You shouldn’t have, sir,” he said, the three pieces stuffed in his mouth muffling his
voice.
“Just enjoy guys. Thirteen bones broken and home in two months, that is worth
celebrating,” Prof Veera said, stroking Alok’s head.
We were happy at Alok’s return too, and now at the box of kaju-burfis. If only Alok
would leave the box alone for one second.
“Sir, what was the other reason for the sweets?” Ryan eventually enquired.
“Yes, of course. I have some good news for you guys finally,” Prof Veera said.
“What? Cherian wants to do another Disco?” Ryan said.
“Easy Ryan,” Prof Veera said, “I know it has not been cool for you guys. But this time I
arranged it through the Dean.”
“What?” Alok and I said in unison.
“You remember the lube project? Well, Prof Cherian never approved further research, but
I went to the Dean and said we would like to revise and re-submit our proposal based on
Prof Cherian’s feedback.”
“I am not working on any feedback from that bastard,” Ryan declared.
“Will you relax, Ryan? Sir, why would we re-submit?” I said.
“That is where lies my idea. If they allowed us to re-submit, we will do some more
experimentation in the lab to prove that our lube additives do have potential. In some ways,
doing some of the research at the proposal stage,” Prof Veera said.
“And?” Ryan squinted his eyes.
“And that means you guys can help do those experiments. I asked the Dean if he would
allow you guys to work in the lab to revise the work we had done, since it will be a
productive use of your time. And the good news is the Dean agreed. Of course, on a noncredit
basis.”
Ryan snatched the box away from Alok’s hands, took two pieces of the sweets, and sat
down to light a cigarette. “Will someone explain what will be the point of this? Working our
butts off for no reason,” he said.
“There maybe a benefit,” Prof Veera said, pulling the cigarette out of Ryan’s mouth and
stubbing it on the floor, “for one, you could later explain the absence in your grade sheet.
And I don’t know, if they like the proposal this time, you may be allowed extra credit for
this work in the next semester.”
“Really?” Alok said, “You mean we will be able to graduate like normal students, in four
years?”
“Wow! Sounds like you gave it a lot of thought Prof Veera,” I said.
“Cherian will never allow it. I am not falling for this,” Ryan said.
“Maybe he won’t. But if the work is good and the Dean likes it, who knows? At least you
have something to do in your spare time.”
“We have plenty to do in our spare time,” Ryan said.
“Ryan, will you talk properly to Prof Veera,” I said. Somehow, the Disco had changed my
attitude toward Ryan. It had become easier for me to tell him things he didn’t want to hear.
He didn’t argue much either.
“It is okay Hari. Ryan is obviously mistrustful of everything about the insti. But guys, this
is the only chance you got. And if you do more work on the lube proposal, who knows, we
might get an industry sponsor this time?”
“Sir is right, Ryan. And we can’t do this without you. It is your project.”
“You guys really want to do this?” Ryan said.
“Yes,” Alok and I said.
“On one condition then,” Ryan said.
“What?” Prof Veera said.
“I get the rest of the kaju-burfi,” Ryan said.
“Ten o’ clock in my lab then, we start tomorrow,” Prof Veera said even as we burst into
laughter.
24
—
Will we Make It?
NEHA. THE NAME THAT DID NOT ALLOW ME TO SLEEP nights.
True, my engineering degree was in the dumps. True, we probably pointlessly slaved in
Prof Veera’s lab mixing one type of grease with another all day. True, I may get expletives
in my grade sheet that would prevent me from getting a decent job. However, none of these
bothered me enough to cause insomnia. In fact, the four months off were great to catch up on
sleep. But the one person whose voice, smell, image, feelings crept up next to me at night
and made sleep impossible was Neha.
I tried calling her on an eleventh. She hung up in two minutes, telling me she never
expected me to be like this. I guess for someone she called a loafer, she had pretty high
expectations.
I had called right back, trying to explain in vain how the whole idea was not mine, and it
was stupid for me to fall for it.
“You used me Hari. Like all men, you used me,” she said. Like all men? How many men
had she been with anyway, I thought. What has she been reading these days, some
Femina-Cosmo crap?
I was just trying to sneak out a major paper. Okay, it was pretty sick of me to duplicate
the keys – but I did it only because it was convenient. Ryan would have found another way
in any case. I tried telling her that, but she was like ‘you men just don’t get it, do you?’ I
thought she wasn’t getting it either, but I still loved her like mad.
“And you told the Disco I gave you the keys? I Hari? You know Dad still believes that?”
Wow, I was kind of glad Cherian believed it. How would Neha understand? If they knew
we had duplicated the keys, we would have resembled those real criminals. We probably
were real criminals. But that was not the point. Man, why is it so hard to explain stuf to
girls. Can’t she just get on with it? Should I say something dumb that she wants to hear?
“Neha, I know I did all those things. But at one level, it wasn’t me. It wasn’t your Hari,” I
said. Obviously, I made no sense. But that is the thing with girls. Give them confusing crap
and they fall for it.
“Then why Hari? Why?”
“I don’t know. Can I just meet you once?” I said.
“No way. We are through.”
She hung up after that and took her phone off the hook for the rest of the day. It meant I had
to wait another month, or suffer another thirty sleepless nights.
Then the next eleventh came around, and I couldn’t wait to make that call.
Woke up at ten the next morning. The eleventh finally, I told myself and left my room
immediately. I had to make my call fast and think up really good lines this time. I was on my
way downstairs when I noticed an elderly lady come up. Probably someone’s parent, I
thought even as I couldn’t help thinking she looked familiar. Then it struck me – Alok’s
mom.
“Hello Aunty. It is me, Hari,” I said.
“Oh hello Hari beta. Where have you all been? I had to come to the hostel because Alok
hasn’t been home for two months. Is he all right?” she asked, breathing heavily.
“Huh? Alok is fine Aunty. Must have been busy with the project,” I said, thinking of a
way to prevent her from meeting Alok.
“Uncle is downstairs in an auto. Call him quickly, we are all worried for him,” she said.
“Yes Aunty sure,” I said as I ran up. Alok was sitting on his bed, reading a magazine and
eating chips.
Ryan sat next to him, a porno mag in hand, his cigarette filling Alok’s room with smoke.
“Are you guys nuts? Smoking and porn early morning,” I tut-tutted.
“What are you so worked up about? Why not do the best things when one is still fresh,”
Ryan said.
“Alok, your parents are here,” I said.
“What?” Alok said as the chips in his hands fell.
“Yes, your mom is climbing the stairs. She sounds mad and worried you didn’t call.”
“You mean she is coming here?” Alok said, waving his hands to get rid of the cigarette
smoke.
“Yes, and I think she is going to see your broken bones now.”
“Fuck,” Alok said.
“Just stay in bed. We’ll cover your legs with sheets,” Ryan said, stuffing the porno under
Alok’s mattress.
“Can’t. His dad is downstairs waiting to see his only son,” I said and dug into the chips.
It was fun to see these two guys worked up now.
“Fuck. Fuck. Fuck,” Alok said, trying to arrange his pillows.
“And I think you should keep the curses down,” I said.
Alok’s mom knocked about a minute later. It is amazing how much can get done in a minute.
Ryan threw out the ashtrays, pornos and vodka bottles. He also arranged the course books
and assignments on the study table. All dirty clothes stayed hidden in an overstuffed
cupboard.
“Hello Mom. What a pleasant surprise,” Alok said.
“Alok. I am not talking to you. You have completely forgotten us,” Alok’s mom said as
she put boxes of sweets on the study table. I wondered if it was okay for us to strike at them
now.
“I was busy,” Alok said.
“Shut up. Two months have passed. You haven’t called since that day you called about
Dad and Didi’s proposal. What happened? You don’t want to talk about our problems?”
“No Mom. It is just this assignment for Prof Veera. It keeps us so busy,” Alok said.
“My son works too hard,” Alok’s mom said looking at me and Ryan, “You guys should
take a break now and then. After all, your jobs are just a semester away,” she said.
Ryan and I smiled, continuing to stare at the boxes of food. Please Aunty, of er them
once.
“Alok, you must come home next weekend. Look, even Dad had to come all the way in an
auto,” she said.
“You took an auto! It is seventy rupees,” Alok said.
“So what to do with Dad? And after all, my son will be working soon,” Alok’s mom said,
“and Hari, why don’t you have some laddoos I made.”
Ryan and I jumped on the boxes before she finished her sentence.
“Mom but still,” Alok said.
“Keep quiet. Look Didi also sent this new pair of jeans for you. She saved her pocket
money you know,” she said, passing a brown bag.
“Thanks Mom. I’ll keep it for a special occasion,” Alok said.
“But at least try it now. Come get up,” Alok’s mom said.
“No Mom. I’ll do it later,” Alok said.
“What later? We can change size now if it doesn’t fit. Don’t be lazy get up,” Alok’s mom
said, shaking Alok’s leg. I am sure that hurt.
“No Mom,” Alok said, clenching his teeth.
“Get up,” Alok’s mom insisted, pulling the bed sheet off him. She shouldn’t have. For
Alok still had the signs – plaster casts covered both thighs and legs. The feet still showed
marks where doctors had done the stitches. It was something even we didn’t fancy seeing.
“Oh my god,” Alok’s mom said as her face dropped along with her hands. “Mom please,”
Alok said, pushing her away and wishing she had never come.
Alok’s mom felt nauseous and Ryan had to help support her back to a chair. I gave her a
glass of water.
“What is going on? Will someone please tell me?” she said.
Ryan looked at me. It was time for us to leave the room.
“We’ll go downstairs. We’ll say hello to Uncle and say Alok is in the lab. Okay Aunty?”
She nodded, her eyes filling with tears. Could any male in her family stand up on his own
legs?
“Easy Mom. It was a scooter accident that night…” Alok said as we shut the door behind
them. I was sure she’d know he was lying. A scooter accident with Ryan and me perfectly
fine was somewhat unbelievable. We saw her leave after half an hour, wiping her tears. We
stood by the auto, trying to make conversation with Alok’s dad. He was in a happy mood,
probably enjoying his rare day out.
“Alok busy eh?” he said, pursing his lips.
“Yes. They have an important project,” Alok’s mom said, sitting in the auto.
“Bye Aunty,” Ryan and I waved.
“Back to Rohini madam?” the auto driver said, starting the scooter.
“No. Take me to the Mechanical Engineering department.”
“Aunty?” we chorused.
“There are things which a mother can sense, even though her son may not talk about it. I
want to meet your Prof Veera before I go home,” she said as the auto buzzed off.
“She’ll find out. She’ll find out about the Disco,” I said, shaking Ryan’s shoulder.
“Let her. She deserves it,” Ryan said as he put his arm around me.
We went to Sasi’s for breakfast after Alok’s mom left.
“I have to make my call today,” I said.
“Is she real mad at you?” Ryan said.
“She was a month ago. She’s got to miss me right?” I said.
“I don’t know. What is the whole deal about missing people and not doing anything about
it anyway?” Ryan said, and took out a brown envelope from his jeans pocket.
Sasi served a plate of paranthas. Ryan left the letter on the table and started tearing up the
hot paranthas.
“It is so different when you come and eat here without Alok. There is no frantic urgency
about eating,” Ryan said.
“Is that a letter from home?” I said.
“If you say so. Where are they now – LA or something,” Ryan said.
“How often do your parents write?” I said.
“Used to be every week, then once in two weeks. Now they write once a month,” Ryan
said, smothering each chunk of parantha with yellow butter.
“Do you write back?” I said.
“No. Not unless it is a couriered letter. In that case the delivery guy asks me to write a
few lines right there.”
“So what is the deal here Ryan? I mean, they are just abroad trying to make a buck. What
have you got against them?”
“I have nothing against them. I am just indifferent. I need another parantha.”
“Shut up. How can that be? I mean, how come you save all their letters? I saw them,
hundreds next to your vodka stash.”
Ryan stopped chewing. “It is too complicated. I don’t want to talk about it.”
“You won’t talk to me?”
“They are too strange. I kept telling them let us stay together after my boarding school.
But the international business was really taking off then and they had to leave. I guess what I
wanted was never in the picture. So, okay I get the dollar cheque, thank you. But spare me
the we-miss-you shit. If you do, what the hell are you going to do about it?”
“Did you tell them about the Disco?” I said.
“Are you crazy?” Ryan said.
“You know, you could join their business after IIT. I mean, you know what our job scene
will be. But you won’t have to worry.”
“No way in hell,” Ryan said, and clenched his hands. “Never. I will open a parantha
shop, become a coolie, wash cars but I am not going to go to them.”
“They are your parents…”
He gave me a dirty look. “So thank you very much. I am going back to Alok. You have a
good time with your girl.”
“Ryan, could you give up your lube project right when it was about to become
successful?” I said.
“What?”
“Answer me,” I said.
“That is the only good thing I ever did in IIT. It is my passion, my sweat, and my belief.
No, how could I give it up?”
“Maybe this pottery business is your parents’ lube project,” I said as I stood up too.
He picked up his letter again and walked away.
“Reply to it Ryan,” I shouted across the road.
He put the letter back in his pocket.
“Neha, is that you?” I said, even though I was a hundred percent sure it was.
“Hari?” she said, her voice unable to hide the fact that she was expecting this call.
“Before you hang up, can I just say something?” I was suitably humble.
“I am not hanging up. What do you want to say?” she said.
“I miss you. And I love you. God, I was so close to you and then I blew it up. I wanted an
A in your dad’s course. I thought I could impress him. Somehow, in our twisted minds we
planned this Operation Pendulum. And they did a Disco on us, ruined our lives. And now
you also don’t want to talk to me…” My voice dwindled to a whisper.
“Hari?”
“What?”
“I missed you too.” She broke into tears.
I wished I could cry too. But her words made me too happy. I mentally hi-fived myself
and tried to control my elation. Keep serious tone, keep serious tone, I told myself.
“Oh Neha, don’t cry,” I said, probably to make her cr y a bit more. I can’t tell you how
good it feels when a girl cries because she missed you.
“I can’t Hari. I can’t forget you. Why did you do those things?” she said.
Okay, this is progress, I thought. From ‘how could you’ to ‘why did you’ is not bad.
Twisted they may be, but I did have my reasons. And I didn’t have to give them all now.
“I can explain more. Can we meet? Just for ten minutes,” I said.
“Should we? I mean, Dad made me swear I’d never see you,” she said.
Now how does one answer that? I tried to think of some rational premise on which
swears to dad could be broken. Nothing came to mind.
“I miss you, Neha,” I said. When in doubt, be sappy.
“I miss you too. Can you come to the ice-cream parlour at two,” she said.
“Sure. But on one condition,” I said.
“What?”
“Can we not have strawberry this time? I like chocolate more,” I said.
“Shut up, Hari,” she said, unable to hide a laugh. There, I had done it. Tears to titters in
one call. Plus, a tiny date thrown in too. I did a mini jig at the public phone booth, which
made the other customers in the shop think I had won a lottery.
“See you then,” I said and hung up the phone. I heard the coin go in. What a wonderful
way to spend a rupee.
Neha stayed at the ice-cream parlour for two hours, twelve times more than the ten minutes
she had come for. By the end, I’d told her everything. She couldn’t really remain upset for
too long. I guess it could be because I bought strawberry as well as chocolate, but maybe it
was because she was just happy to see me. We fixed the next date for a week later, and soon
we were back in the ‘fix the next date on the previous’ cycle. It helped me pass all the idle
time in the dropped semester. We worked eight hours a day in Prof Veera’s lab, sometimes
ten or twelve. Ryan worked longer, even up to sixteen. He ripped open his scooter for
experimentation, making it a pain to move around in the insti. Alok used crutches for a
month and then got by with a limp. Prof Veera liked the second proposal a lot, and he kept
informing the Dean of the progress we were making. He never brought up the issue of a
clean grade sheet or extra credits, but we knew there was little chance until we finished the
proposal. We gave the final draft to Prof Veera one week before the semester ended. It was
two hundred pages, and from Ryan, Alok and I this time.
“Wow. This is a fat proposal,” Prof Veera said.
“It’s literally the whole study. We have isolated the optimum mix already,” Ryan said.
“I know. This is way beyond a proposal,” Prof Veera said as he flipped through the
pages, “I cannot believe the four months are over.”
“Me neither. I guess it will be time to attend classes again,” I said.
“And loads of them. Maximum credits this time, and I am not skipping any more,” Alok
said.
“Me neither, right Ryan?” I said.
“Yeah. I’ll come along as well,” Ryan said, “So Prof Veera, what do we do with this
tome now?”
“Well,” Prof Veera said, putting the proposal on his desk, “let me take a final read and
unless there are big corrections, I’ll just submit it. Good job and take your week off before
your loaded semester begins.”
“And the credit and grade sheet, sir,” Alok prompted.
“Later guys. It depends on the reception to the proposal. Don’t be too optimistic, but we
shall see,” Prof Veera said.
We left his office, leaving our work of three months. It could get us nowhere, but we had
given it our best shot. The final sem began on Jan 5, just a week from now. And six days
later, on the eleventh, was my big date with Neha, when she would be free for the whole
day. If she would let me come to her home again, I thought.
25
—
A Day of Letters
THE FIRST DAY OF OUR FINAL SEMESTER FELT AS SPECIAL as the first day of
classes in the institute. We got up at six-thirty for the eight o’ clock class. Ryan took a
shower and then proceeded to carefully comb his hair for the next twenty minutes.
Even then we made it before class began. It was Prof Saxena’s ‘Refrigeration and Airconditioning’
or RAC class. He was a senior prof, and touted to be next in line for head of
the department. That is, if Cherian moved on to something else, retired or just died. None of
that was imminent as of now so Prof Saxena was content teaching final year students how to
keep things cool. We were the first students to arrive, and he was already in the class.
“Welcome, welcome,” Prof Saxena said, “now this is a surprise. Who would have
thought fourth year students will reach early for class.”
I guess he was right. In the final semester, people were more interested preparing for job
interviews and MBA admissions. We hadn’t even bothered to see which companies were
recruiting this time, for we didn’t know if we were getting a degree this year.
“Good morning, sir,” Ryan said as we took front row seats. We were sitting in a
classroom after four months. A blackboard never looked so great. I wondered when the
class would begin.
“What are your names?” Prof Saxena asked.
“I have heard those names,” he said after we told him. His forehead developed creases as
he tried to remember.
“We had a Disco last semester, sir. You were part of the committee,” Ryan said.
“Oh yes,” Prof Saxena said, “Yes, the Cherian case. So, this must be your first class in
months.”
We nodded solemnly.
“That explains it. So, what is your situation? Will you be graduating on time?” Prof
Saxena said. I couldn’t say if there was real concern in his voice or if he was just passing
time before class.
“We are five credits short, sir. Even though we have loaded up courses for this semester,”
Alok said.
“How many courses do you have?”
“Six,” I said.
“Wow. Most final semester students do just two. And that too they hardly attend class.
You will be in classes all day,” Prof Saxena said.
“Yes sir. No choice.” I shrugged.
“Have you talked to Cherian about credits?” Prof Saxena said.
“Prof Veera is trying for us,” I said.
“Hmm. Anyway, the system is harsh. Look at you boys, could have got a job even with
your low GPAs. Lots of software companies this time. But this Disco might spoil your entire
degree,” Prof Saxena said.
A few other students trickled in over the next few minutes. I think there were ten of us in
class, while over thirty had signed up for the course. I remembered earlier eight a.m.
classes, how we never attended them even in the second and third years. But right now, I
couldn’t wait to learn.
“Third law of thermodynamics,” Prof Saxena said as he got up to turn to the blackboard.
Ryan, Alok and I took out our pens and jotted down every word the prof spoke for the
next hour.
I met Neha a couple of weeks into the final semester. For the first time, I had to scramble to
make it for a date. I had to finish five assignments on the weekend, not to mention revise
notes for the coming minor tests. I couldn’t afford to fail in any course, and somehow I had
this big urge to learn a lot in my final days at IIT. But a date with Neha was a date with
Neha, so stapling my sheets for the ergonomics assignment, I ran out to the ice-cream
parlour.
“Twenty minutes late! Do you realize you are twenty minutes late?” Neha said.
“Sorry, this assignment…”
“I have to go back early today. Dad’s elder brother and family are coming for dinner. Dad
is going mad preparing for them. And since when were you into assignments so much?” She
hadn’t removed hands from hips.
“I don’t know. Just don’t want to take any chances. Can I buy you an ice-cream?”
“No thanks. I have already had one waiting for you. And with my relatives home tonight,
there will be a big meal. And I am trying to reduce,” she said.
“Reduce what?” I asked.
“My weight,” she said.
“Really? Why? You look great,” I said.
“No way. You should see the girls in my college. Anyway, what have you been up to?”
she said.
“Classes, classes and more classes. Eight to six ever y day. Then another three hours in
the library. Then another two for assignments and revisions. I am going mad. But what to
do? Never had this much course-load before.”
“What about Ryan and Alok?” she said.
“They are equally overworked. And we’ll still fall short of credits,” I said.
“What about your C2D, the whole cooperate to dominate…”
“That was all crap. It doesn’t work that way Neha. I know it doesn’t. I might be busy
now, but at least I am learning something. I am not just cogging assignments and beating the
system. That is not what it is about.”
“Wow, my loafer has become all serious. What is it about then?” Her voice went playful,
always a good sign.
“It is about knowledge. And making the most of the system, even if it has flaws. And it is
about not listening to bloody Ryan all the time,” I said.
“You are getting all wise. I miss my loafer,” she said.
I became quiet and looked into her eyes. Then, in one instant I got up and kissed her on
the lips.
“Hari! Are you crazy? People know me here,” she said.
“Just to let you know the loafer is still there,” I said.
“Yeah right. Anyway, look what I got,” she said and took out a piece of paper from her
bag.
“It’s your brother’s letter,” I said.
“Yes, his last. I want you to keep it,” she said.
“Why?” I said. It was a weird gift, to say the least.
“I don’t know. Dad doesn’t trust me anymore. And he comes and searches my room now
and then. I don’t want him to find this.”
“Really? Is he giving you a lot of trouble?” I said.
“Not much. I just don’t speak to him much. I did hear him talk about you guys the other
day though.”
“What? Where?”
“I’ll tell you. Will you keep my letter then?”
“You know I will. What did he say?”
“Dean Shastri came home the other day. They were talking about this proposal.”
“The lube project,” I said.
“Yes, something like that. Prof Veera had given each of them a copy. Dean Shastri was
quite impressed with the findings.”
“What did your dad say?” I said.
“I don’t think you want to hear it,” she said.
“No tell me,” I fairly shouted. Why do girls take so long to come to the point?
“He said it was an okay-ish effort. But he told Dean Shastri not to trust these students. He
said, ‘who knows? They have cheated once, they could have cheated to make the findings.
They just want their credits,’ and that was it.”
“Complete crap. That is complete crap. You know Neha, how much we worked our asses
off on it.”
“I know. But that is what he said. And Dean Shastri told him to think about it some more.”
I put the letter on the table. I spread it out; Samir’s last words. Someone so sick of his
father’s desire to get him into IIT that he preferred death. I wondered how much a train
passing over you could hurt.
“Two large bricks of strawberry please,” I heard a voice in the background.
“Hello Cherian sahib. What happened, big guests tonight?” the counter boy said.
“Yes, my brother is coming from Canada. He loves ice-cream,” I heard Prof Cherian’s
voice.
I froze at my table, like all the flavors of ice-cream in the fridge. Neha froze too. We
were sitting right opposite him, and couldn’t run out of the parlour. We silently prayed he
wouldn’t see us. But this was Cherian. A reflection on the steel counter frame was enough.
“Neha!” He turned toward us. I think all the ice-cream in the parlour melted at that tone.
Neha didn’t say anything. I didn’t move. I recalled last seeing Cherian when he was head
of the Disco. Will he ruin me again? I hadn’t even ordered my ice-cream.
Cherian came and sat next to me. My heart raced as it attempted to leave my body and
escape the parlour.
“You have guts. You bloody rascal, you do have guts,” Cherian said as he stared at me.
Neha cleared her throat but he signaled her to keep quiet.
“Sir, I just…sir...just had to...sir just ran into her,” I said, talking and thinking at the same
time.
“Are you bluffing me again?” Cherian banged his fist on the table. It landed on the open
letter and almost tore it.
“Dad, be careful,” Neha said as she tried to push his angry fist away.
“What is this?” Cherian said.
Neha opened her palms and covered the letter.
“Nothing. It is nothing, Dad,” she said.
“What is it, you rascal?” Cherian said looking at me, his fist still firmly on the letter,
“love letters you write to trap my daughter. I told you to stay away from her. So one Disco
wasn’t enough?”
“It is Samir’s letter,” I said.
“Hari, shut up,” Neha said, as a reflex.
I don’t know why I said it. But I wasn’t going to repeat it.
“What did he say?” Prof Cherian said.
Neha and I kept silent.
“Remove your hands, Neha,” Cherian said and glared at her. She withdrew her hands,
only to bring them to her face to wipe her tears. Cherian picked the letter up and read it
silently.
He tried hard to retain his composure, but his eyes contracted and his fingers started to
shiver. He read the letter again and again and then again. The two bricks of ice-cream he
had bought were melting and creating a puddle on our table. but, the puddles in Cherian’s
mind were causing us more concern. He removed his glasses, his eyes then did the
unthinkable. Yes, here he was, the head of our department, the tormentor of my life and his
eyes had just become wet. Two fat tears squeezed out of the edges. And there I was, sitting
with the Cherian family as they cried. I could have joined in, but I wasn’t in the mood.
Besides, ice-cream parlours are hardly the place for group cries.
“Dad, are you all right?” Neha said, wiping her tears.
Her father then cried uncontrollably. It was strange to see a grown-up man cry. I mean,
you expect them to make you cry. I wished Ryan were here.
“Let’s go home, Dad,” Neha said as she got up.
Cherian surrendered himself to his daughter. I gave Neha the bag of ice-cream, mostly a
syrupy mass now. Her father kept kissing the letter.
They left the parlour and I hadn’t gotten a chance to fix my next date with Neha. But I felt
damn lucky to survive meeting Cherian again. Neha drove the car with her dad still sobbing
in the front seat.
“Sir, are you going to pay for that ice-cream?” the counter boy asked me.
“You mean Cherian was in tears. Like real crying-crying?” Ryan was disbelieving.
“Howling man, with hands on face and lots of tears right until he left. Damn it, I had to
pay for two bricks of ice-cream.”
“Totally worth it. I would pay for four for a repeat performance. Yes. Even he suffers.
Yes!” Ryan performed a little jig.
“It isn’t funny Ryan. He must have been in shock,” Alok said.
“So? Not my problem. But I missed it. If only I was there,” Ryan said.
“Can we do the assignments for tomorrow then? Do we have RAC?” I said.
“Yes, we do,” Alok said, “So what is going on about the proposal?”
“I don’t know. Neha told me Cherian wasn’t so keen. Let us talk to Prof Veera some time
next week.”
“The companies have arrived you know. I saw the recruitment notice board. Many new
ones in the software sector,” Alok said.
“No point looking at them yet. If the credits don’t work out, we’ll have another year to
think about it,” I said as we opened fresh sheets to do our assignment.
I slept at four that night. Cherian’s face after he’d read the letter swam before me. Sure, it
was somewhat funny as Ryan said. But it was also sad. How could a strong man like
Cherian get like that? What are these tough people really made of? And the way Neha took
her father back, she must love him a lot. And Cherian must have loved his son a lot, even
though he drove him mad enough to kill himself. Do all parents love their kids? What about
Ryan? Did he love his parents? Did they love him?
And then I got up. At four a.m. I had the urge to write a letter. Maybe the havoc a letter
had wreaked that morning influenced me. I left Kumaon and went to the computer centre.
The twenty-four hour center had students working away on their resumes. The job
interviews were coming, yes, but not for us.
Dear Dad and Mom,
This is Ryan. I am sorry for typing this. I just had to write tonight to tell you what has
been going on in my life. And not all of it is good. But if I don’t tell you, who else will I
talk to… I kept writing for like two hours. I don’t think I made much sense at all times, but I
did write about a lot of things. About our GPAs, our Disco, our tainted grade sheets, Prof
Veera, and our stuck lube project. I also wrote about how they had never really loved me
enough to keep me with them. I kind of knew I was doing wrong, posing as Ryan and typing
away his life story, his deepest secrets. Simply said, Ryan would kill me if he found out. But
I kept writing until daybreak. I thought I’d done a good job with the text, better than Ryan for
sure. When I finally took the printout, it was ten pages long. It was easy to fake Ryan’s
signature, and his parents would hardly compare for identity. I had stolen the address from
Ryan’s room. It took thirty rupees of stamps to mail the damn thing.
“Where are you coming from,” Ryan said as he noticed me come to my room at dawn.
“Nothing. Just went for a walk,” I said.
Is lying bad?
26
—
Meeting Daddy
PROF SAXENA HAD TO INTERRUPT HIS CLASS THAT DAY. A peon had delivered a
message to him, which he read and then turned to the class.
“Who are Hari, Ryan and Alok?” he asked, fully aware we sat in the front row.
We duly raised our hands.
“Go to Prof Cherian’s room. He wants to see you right now.”
I tried to be calm, but my heart was beating fast like it had a mind of its own. Could it be
the end of the lube project? Will Cherian hold another Disco? Will he hand me over to
the police for buying Neha an ice-cream? Did he realize I paid for his bricks as well?
Irrelevant thoughts darted back and forth until we reached Cherian’s of ice, where I
noticed there was a new lock.
Inside, Prof Shastri and Prof Veera sat next to Prof Cherian. No one asked us to sit down.
“Sorry to bring you boys out of class. But just thought we’ll talk to you while we were
still together,” Dean Shastri said.
Profs together is always trouble, I thought. We maintained a deep and meaningful silence.
“We have gone over your work with Prof Veera and your proposal, and we understand
you worked on it in your suspended semester,” Prof Shastri said.
We looked at Prof Veera.
“Yes sir, they worked for three months in my lab,” Prof Veera said.
“Now Prof Veera has made an appeal that we show your absence in the seventh semester
for research work instead of disciplinary reasons. Is that right?”
We had promised ourselves not to say a word in that room. It was a simple question, but
we didn’t want any more trouble.
“Answer Dean Shastri,” Prof Veera bade us.
“Yes sir,” Alok said.
I never made eye contact with Cherian, but his silence was unnerving. Why wasn’t the
kingpin in all this saying anything?
“Then I guess you will have a clean grade sheet, right?” Dean Shastri said.
Alok, Ryan and I nodded.
“Well, the final decision in these matters is with your head of department. And you well
know your mistakes are quite unpardonable. But this time, Prof Cherian has agreed to show
your seventh semester as a research semester.”
“What?” the three of us said in unison. Sometimes, even good news can be a shock.
“Yes, Prof Cherian has agreed. Congratulations and good work,” Prof Veera said.
I looked at Cherian for the first time. His face remained frozen, as if he was not part of
this room. What is up with him? Has he tripped out on grass, I wondered. Whatever the
reason, I wanted to get the hell out of that room before he changed his mind.
“Thank you sir. Thank you so much,” Alok said.
“Thank you sir. Can we go sir?” I said.
“Sure. We were leaving as well,” Dean Shastri said as he and Prof Veera stood up.
“By the way, how is this semester going?” Dean Shastri said.
“It is okay sir. We are still five credits short,” I replied.
“Short for what?” Dean Shastri said.
“We don’t have enough courses to finish the degree in four years. So we can’t apply for
any jobs or admissions,” I said.
“Well, did you take a full course-load?” Dean Shastri said.
“Of course. We have packed classes,” Ryan said.
“Well, again this is a departmental issue. That is why I tell these boys not to get into
disciplinary trouble,” Dean Shastri said and left the room.
Prof Veera patted my shoulder and left as well.
“Thank you sir,” I said to Cherian. I don’t know why I did it, kind of just felt like a good
exit line.
“Hari, can you stay back for a minute,” Prof Cherian spoke for the first time.
“Sure,” I said as Alok and Ryan gave me curious glances before vacating the room.
“Sit down,” Cherian said and pointing at a chair before him, he got up to lock the door.
Why did he ask me to stay back? Was he going to kill me?
“So five credits short, eh?” Cherian said. So he was listening to what people had said in
his room.
“Yes sir,” I said.
“You know if I sanction you all to work with Prof Veera this semester to follow through
on this project, we could get you laboratory credits.”
Now what was that supposed to mean – ‘if I sanction’? Was Cherian just reminding me of
how much he controlled my fate. Hell, I know that Sir. I am just excited to have a clean
grade sheet for now. Maybe one day after several years I might get a job. Can I go now?
“What are you thinking?” Cherian said.
“Uh, nothing sir,” I said, returning hastily from my thoughts.
“I said I could get you lab credits, that is if you are ready to work on this project this
semester. I know you are already overloaded,” Cherian said.
Had Cherian totally lost his mind? What was he saying? He was offering to rescue my
degree. And if I was ready to do some lab work. Hell, I’d live in the lab for the next four
months for five extra credits. I’d eat lubricants for lunch to get my degree on time.
“I think we can manage some extra lab work, sir,” I said when my Adam’s apple allowed
me.
“Good. Let me speak to Prof Veera and see what he can get you guys to do. If all is fine,
we’ll add five credits to this sem.”
“For all of us sir? I mean, Alok and Ryan too.”
“Yes, of course,” Prof Cherian said.
“Thank you sir,” I said, wiping sweat off my forehead. This wasn’t a real moment.
“Thank you, Hari,” Cherian dismissed me.
“For what?” I said.
“Nothing. I think you should go back to Prof Saxena’s class. And start preparing for those
job interviews,” Cherian said.
“Of course, sir,” I said and stood up.
“And don’t behave in the interviews like you did in my viva,” Prof Cherian said and
started laughing. I tried to sense if there was malicious intent in his laughter, but he sounded
genuinely amused. I joined in the laughter.
“Right sir,” I said and left his room grinning like an idiot.
We had promised to drink less since the Disco, but Cherian’s news was huge and worth
intoxication.
“Open the second bottle,” Alok said, “today I am telling you Ryan, open the second
bottle.”
“Take it easy, Fatso. We still have assignments and lab work, not to mention those job
interviews,” I said.
“How? How did you do it Hari?” Ryan said, by now already high.
“I didn’t do anything. I really thought he was going mad. But that is what he said.” I
shrugged.
“You are awesome man,” Ryan said as he came forward and kissed my cheek. I hate it
when he does that.
“Which is the next interview then Alok?” I asked, pushing Ryan away.
“Okay guys, here is the deal,” Alok said, taking out a file full of brochures of companies,
“we are five-pointers, remember? So a lot of these jobs won’t even short-list us.”
“I don’t care man. Tell me any job that will,” Ryan said.
“Software. That is the hot sector this year. They hire in droves and don’t have GPA-based
short-listing criteria,” Alok said.
“I love software,” Ryan vouched.
“When is the interview?” I said.
“Well, a good one is in three weeks. What do you say? All of us apply? Who knows, we
can all be together,” Alok said.
“We will be,” I said and raised my glass.
“Cheers, to five credits,” we all said in unison.
The alarm rang at six a.m. The big interview day had arrived. For the first time that
semester, we skipped the first three classes. The last few weeks had been backbreaking
with Prof Veera’s lab work adding three hours to the already full fourteen hours a day
workload.
But today was the software company’s interview; the best chance for low-GPA students
like us to get employment.
“Wake up, Fatso. We need to dress up for these interviews,” I hollered.
“Will we get it?” Alok said.
“Not if you stay in bed,” Ryan said, pulling his quilt away.
IITians really dress up for interviews. For the first time in four years, I wore a tie. It was
a weird tie, with orange spots on black or the other way round, I forget. But it had worked
for a senior last year and Kumaonites considered it lucky. Ryan had got a new Italian silk tie
from his parents, bastard. For some reason, his gifts had increased the last few weeks. I
wondered if they had received my letter.
Ryan’s scooter was now engineless, so we had to take an auto to the institute. We couldn’t
walk and spoil the creases on our shirts and trousers, as Ryan pointed out.
“Technosoft Software inter views here,” said a sign in the insti building. There were over
fifty of us, all students from my batch dressed like we were attending our wedding.
“Apparently, half the batch has already got jobs. This is the best chance for the underperformers
like us,” Alok sighed.
I tried to think of the day when I had started relating so well to the word under-performer.
Was it the first quiz we messed up? Was it our first GPA? Was it the Disco? I guess there
were enough things we screwed up to earn our place in that club.
Amongst the three of us, Ryan had his interview first, followed by Alok and then me.
Before the interview, we took an aptitude test. It had simple IQ type questions that any
IITian could answer after a bottle of vodka in him.
“It is the interview. That is where they decide,” Alok said.
We submitted our grade sheets. The seventh semester column was blank, with ‘Research
Absence’, emblazoned across it. The rest of the semesters were pretty ordinary, lots of Cs
and Ds.
“Best of luck, Ryan,” Alok said as he hugged Ryan.
“Careful, don’t spoil the crease,” Ryan warned.
He came out after twenty minutes.
“How was it?” Alok said.
“Don’t know. Not too great I guess. They only asked about my low grades, and why I
wanted to do this and all that,” Ryan said.
“So what did you say,” I said.
“Just whatever. Let us just wait and see,” he said.
Alok went for twenty minutes. It was my turn as soon as he came out.
A thirty-year-old man welcomed me into the interview room.
“Hi, I am Kamal Desai. You are Hari, right?” he said.
“Yes sir,” I said.
“Sit down, sit down. And don’t sir me, call me Kamal.”
I sat down quietly. Kamal browsed through my files and then stopped at the grade sheet.
“Hmmm…5.48 overall, what happened?” He looked into my eyes.
It was right at this moment when I should have had my panic attack. But I didn’t this time.
I don’t know why, but ever since I saw Ryan’s plan fail, Alok jump and Cherian cry, the
whole wide world didn’t intimidate me anymore.
“I screwed up my first semester, sir…I mean Kamal. And it is really hard to come back in
IIT if you miss the first time.”
“That is very interesting. What happened in the first sem?” Kamal said
“Don’t know. Felt like enjoying college life a bit. I guess IIT is not that type of college,” I
said.
“Yes, IITs are truly different. Tell me, do you like IIT?” Kamal said.
It was a loaded question. A question no one had asked me before. I had thought I’d be
quick to say how I hated every living moment of it, but couldn’t. I remembered my first day
– the day Ryan saved me from Baku and his coke bottles. Four years, and soon it would be
time to leave this place. Did I like it here?
“I don’t know. There are things I’d rather forget. But I met my best friends here, and
hopefully this place will get me a job,” I said.
Kamal laughed. I could see him as one of the students ten years ago. I wondered what his
GPA had been in his time. That is the thing about IIT, you see people and you wonder what
their GPA was. You kind of need that to judge them. Sad.
Kamal asked me a few more questions about why I wanted to join the software sector.
Hell, I’d kiss any sector that would give me a job. And this was my one chance.
“It was very interesting talking to you. That’s all for now,” Kamal said as he escorted me
out of the room.
“Interesting talking to you” – I repeated the phrase three times in my head. What was that
supposed to mean? Just a polite way of saying I was weird and stood no chance? Or did
my pathetic resume file really charm him?
We waited another hour for the results. And that is when I realized that for once my luck
might have turned for the better.
“Hari, you and I have made it! You got an offer in Bombay and I got Delhi,” Alok said
and tugged at my shirt.
I became numb and couldn’t answer him for the next five minutes. A crowd of students
almost crushed me in their rush to the notice board. I was lost in my thoughts. Just a few
days ago, I was planning to spend an extra year to complete five credits and collect a tainted
grade sheet. Now I had a way out. And I had a job.
“I didn’t get it,” Ryan said.
“What?”
That had to be a mistake. How could Alok and I get a job while Ryan not?
“What happened?” I said.
“I don’t know. Fuck man, fuck-fuck-fuck,” Ryan said as he walked away from us.
“Where is he going?” Alok said.
“I don’t know,” I said.
For a couple of moments I forgot my own job. Ryan had not got a job? He was the
creative, confident, smart one. He was what I always wanted to be. So he had almost the
lowest grade in the insti, but this is Ryan, hello?
“We got a job, Hari. Six grand a month,” Alok said.
“Huh? Oh, yeah,” I said, suspending my concern for Ryan for a while. “So, we’re not just
five-point somethings anymore, we are five point somebodies.”
Alok spoke to his parents on the phone for two hours that night. I think he read out the whole
offer letter to them. His mother noted down the entire package – basic salary, travel
allowance and of course, the much needed medical benefits. Alok was thrilled.
I was still kind of numb. When good things happen to you, you kind of feel there is
something odd. Like this could be a dream. That Kamal Desai of Technosoft will call me
and say it was all a bad joke. And then again, the job was in Bombay.
“What is with you? You don’t seem so excited,” Alok said as he got out of the phone
booth.
“I am. I am. But it is in Bombay. What about Neha?” I said.
“What about her? You’ll still continue after IIT?” Alok asked naively, as if she had been
part of my curriculum here.
“Why not?” I said, placing my fingers in the booth’s grill.
Alok shrugged his shoulders. It was pointless talking to him. He would have rather
discussed the dental benefits that the job gave us.
“Where is Ryan?” I said.
“I think he went to the lab. He said he wanted to talk to Prof Veera,” I said.
“I hope he finds something. I think that is the other reason why I can’t be so fully excited,”
I said.
“It’s hard for him. He is only 5.01, and the last in class. It is difficult for him to get
placed,” Alok said.
“But he is so smart. I mean, the lube project is basically all his,” I said.
“GPAs matter,” Alok said and walked away.
Ryan did not get a job for another month. Our semester sped by really fast, especially since
we were so busy trying to meet our deadlines. Ryan kept applying to companies, but he only
got two more interviews. The last guy in the class always found it hardest to get a job. For
that matter, if Kamal Desai was not into honesty appreciation that day, I might have been in
Ryan’s situation.
“You guys can’t lose heart. Ryan, you must keep trying,” Prof Veera exhorted as we stood
in the lab.
Ryan’s scooter engine was running at full blast. Today’s mixture had an unusually bad
smell, stinking up the whole lab. I kind of wished this was not the optimal mix for our final
lubricant.
“I can’t Prof Veera. It is not going to work,” Ryan said, looking at the exhaust fumes
coming out of the engine.
“Of course, it will. But I do feel you are made for better things than a run-of-the mill
software job,” Prof Veera said.
“What do you mean?” Ryan said.
“I mean you should work in research. What is in a software job? You are contract labour
at cheap prices for foreigners. Ryan, you really think you will be happy there?”
“I would be,” Alok said.
“I am asking Ryan. You guys are friends, but you all could want different things you
know,” Prof Veera said.
“Like what? What else can I do?” Ryan said.
“Would you like to work as my RA?” Prof Veera said. “Research Assistant. I can get you
a two-year contract. Will not pay a lot, say two thousand a month. But you live on campus,
and you can continue research on lubricants.”
I saw Ryan’s face. The Rs 2000-number was writ large on his face; a third of what our
jobs would pay us. Would Ryan be able to accept that?
“It is an idea,” he said eventually.
“It is a great idea. And if we find an investor who is willing to commercialize your
product, who knows how successful you can be,” Prof Veera said.
Ryan looked at me. Somehow, I felt he wanted me to make a decision for him. I thought
about it less than I should have, but gave my answer.
“I think you will be happy doing this, Ryan. And I am sure you will find an investor for it
one day,” I said.
“I project the market for this product at atleast ten crore. You’ll get a royalty of, I don’t
know, say ten percent. Of course, if we find someone who invests in the factory first,” Prof
Veera said.
“I’ll do it,” Ryan smiled, “I am your RA, sir.”
“Yes!” I said and hi-fived him.
“I guess all of us are officially employed,” Alok said, “can we party now?”
“Of course, you should. But go easy on the vodka,” Prof Veera said but he was grinning.
27
—
Five Point Someone
IT WAS THE CONVOCATION DAY, OFFICIALLY OUR LAST DAY at IIT. We’d
struggled unto the end, but had finally made it! We had passed all our final semester courses,
finished our lab work and had all secured some sort of a job. It is the least any IITian can
expect in four years, but to us it was nothing short of a miracle. I had hardly spoken to Neha
in the past few weeks. I called once after I got the job, and she cried because (a) she was so
happy for me and (b) because it was in Bombay. It is not easy to figure out how girls cry for
two different reasons at the same time. But I didn’t push her much. She also said it was best
we didn’t meet for a while, lest Cherian find out and flare up again. Frankly, that was fine
with me (even though I made a big fuss) with all these damn courses. I had not seen Cherian
after that day in his office when he was stoned enough to pardon me. But today, I would see
him again. After all, the head of the department makes a speech to the passing-out batch. We
were part of the passing-out batch and that was celebration in itself.
Alok, Ryan and I wore our graduation robes. As usual, Ryan looked the best. “I am not
sitting in front. You can’t fall asleep in front,” I protested, as we reached the convocation
hall.
“No, it is our last day. I want to see everything,” Alok insisted.
“Then get your glasses fixed,” Ryan said.
Alok insisted on sitting in the first row and we sat down facing the podium. We looked
back at the guests’ gallery.
“That is my mom and didi in the aisle. See Dad is there, too,” Alok said as he waved at a
wheelchair.
“Your parents are here too, right?” I said to Ryan.
“Yes, they flew in last night. I told them not to come, but they did. See, there they are in
the third row,” Ryan pointed out with quiet pride.
Yes, there they were, along with the parents of three hundred students. The huge
convocation hall held them all, the whole insanely proud lot.
I saw Neha. She had come with her father, and sat primly with other faculty families. I
waved to her and ten other profs waved back.
“Sit down Hari. It is about to begin.” Alok pulled me down.
Prof Cherian took the stage, all the waving and murmurs ceased, and the convocation hall
became silent as a tomb.
“Good morning. As head of the Mechanical Engineering department I welcome everyone
to this convocation ceremony. Today we are proud to give a new batch of the brightest
mechanical engineers to this country. I give this speech every year, and I have done so for
ten years now,” Prof Cherian said and paused to have a sip of mineral water.
“Ten years! This guy’s really been around,” Alok whispered.
“To torment class after class,” Ryan supplied.
“Shh!” I said.
“And every year I make a similar speech, congratulating our best students and talking
about how they should continue to achieve in the future. In fact, I make the speech by looking
at what I said last year. However, this year I am going to do something different. In fact, I
don’t even have a written speech. I just want to tell you a story.”
A murmur threaded through the crowd. No one expected Cherian to tell stories. Announce
the toppers, wish everyone the best and close it. What was going on?
“Once upon a time there was a student in IIT. He was very bright, and this is true, his
GPA was 10.00 after four years. He didn’t have a lot of friends, as to keep such a high GPA,
you only have so much time for friends.”
The crowd dutifully chuckled.
“But he did have classmates. Classmates who this bright boy thought were less smart than
him, classmates who were selfish and wanted to make the most money or go to the USA
with minimum effort. And the classmates did exactly that. They went to work for
multinationals and some went abroad. Some of them opened their own companies in the
USA – mostly in computers and software. This was twenty years ago mind you, so
computers were a very new thing.”
Prof Cherian paused again for water.
“What is his point?” Alok said.
“I don’t know. I told you not to sit in the front row. We can’t even sleep now,” Ryan said.
“But the bright boy stayed behind. Because he had principles. He did not want to use his
education for selfish personal gain. He wanted to help the country. He wanted to do
research and he stayed back at IIT. Of course, getting a research project approved in IIT is
harder than inventing the telephone,” Prof Cherian said as the faculty in the audience smiled.
“So our bright boy was disappointed. He still kept trying but apart from being a
Professor, there isn’t much one could achieve here. Ten years passed, when his friends from
college visited home. One of them had a GPA of seven point something, and he had his own
software company. The turnover had reached two hundred million dollars. Another friend
was heading a toothpaste MNC, and came in a BMW. Of course, this didn’t bother the
principled bright boy. Or so he thought.
“As you guessed, that bright boy was me. And at that time I thought it didn’t matter if
others had achieved more personally. I was still the one with the better GPA, the smarter
one, the brighter one. Somehow, on that day, I decided my son must get into IIT. I wanted
him to carry on my family’s strong intellectual tradition. Strong intellectual tradition – that is
what I called it. But it was just my big ego. My son wanted to be a lawyer, hated maths. I
hated him for hating maths. I pushed him just as I pushed students in my class. He failed to
get in the first time and I made life hell for him. He failed a second time and I made his life
an even bigger hell. Then he failed to get in the third time. And this time, he killed himself.”
The crowd gasped. Students and even some of the faculty members started whispering.
“You all know that I have a daughter. But I also had a son, who died in a rail track
accident five years ago. At that time, we thought it was an accident. But this…” Cherian
said as he pulled out Samir’s letter, “is my son’s letter I got only a few weeks ago. He wrote
this to my daughter on the day he died. He killed himself because he did not get into IIT. He
killed himself because of me,” Cherian said and paused for a long time. He removed his
spectacles and wiped his eyes. The audience was silent enough to hear Cherian’s mild sobs.
“He is crying,” Ryan said.
“I told you. This is nothing compared to…” I stopped as Cherian began again.
“I am sorry everyone for bringing up this sad story on your special day. I told myself that
if I admit to my mistake publicly, perhaps my son will forgive me. And I wanted to thank the
one student in this class because of who I found out the truth. It is my daughter’s boyfriend –
Hari. And he is here sitting right in the front row.”
“Wow!” Alok and Ryan said in unison. All eyes turned to me. I have never been so
embarrassed in my life. This is not the limelight one wants. I wished he’d just move on from
here, but he didn’t.
“Let me tell you something about this boy Hari and his friends Alok and Ryan. They are
the under-performers. That is what I used to call students with low GPAs. And they do have
a low GPA – five point something is low, right?” Cherian asked in a jestful manner.
“My daughter found it easier to trust Hari with the letter. She defied me, lied to me and
ignored me just to meet him. Somewhere down the line, this perfect ten-GPA Professor
standing in front of you had gone wrong. Really wrong.”
I sat back, listening to Cherian carefully. I kind of felt sad and for the first time felt he just
may have a heart.
“And that is when I realized that GPAs make a good student, but not a good person. We
judge people here by their GPA. If you are a nine, you are the best. If you are a five, you are
useless. I used to despise the low GPAs so much that when Ryan submitted a research
proposal on lubricants, I judged it without even reading it. But these boys have something
really promising. I saw the proposal the second time. I can tell you, any investor who
invests in this will earn a rainbow.”
“Did you hear that Hari?” Ryan said.
I nodded.
“Anyway, this is my message to all you students as you find your future. One, believe in
yourself, and don’t let a GPA, performance review or promotion in a job define you. There
is more to life than these things – your family, your friends, your internal desires and goals.
And the grades you get in dealing with each of these areas will define you as a person.
“Two, don’t judge others too quickly. I thought my son was useless because he didn’t get
into IIT. I tell you what, I was a useless father. It is great to get into IIT, but it is not the end
of the world if you don’t. All of you should be proud to have the IIT tag, but never ever
judge anyone who is not from this institute – that alone can define the greatness of this
institute.”
The crowd responded with wild applause.
“And lastly, don’t take yourself too seriously. We professors are to be blamed even more
for this. Life is too short, enjoy yourself to the fullest. One of the best parts of campus life is
the friends you make. And make sure you make them for life. Yes, I have heard the stories.
Sometimes I wish I had had a friend, even if that meant a lower GPA. It must be good to
have vodka on top of the institute roof at night.”.
Cherian got a standing ovation.
The applause got louder, in fact it was right under my ears, on my shoulder.
“Wake up you lazy bozo,” Ryan said, clapping my shoulder so hard my dream paused and
faded out like a defective videotape.
“What?” I rubbed my eyes.
“Yes, it is me. So tell me Mr Hari, how does it feel to miss your convocation after you
make all this effort to get into IIT.” That was Ryan’s cocky voice all right.
“What the...what time is it?” I craned my neck to look at the alarm clock. It said seven
a.m, clearly in contrast to the sun outside.
“Looks like your clock has also had enough of this place. It is past eleven. Both of us
slept through our convocation,” Ryan said wryly.
I got out of bed and went outside to the balcony; the hostel was empty.
Damn, I had slept through graduation day. Worse, Cherian had not really cried.
“Fuck!” I said, borrowing Ryan’s vocabulary. “Fuck. Does that mean they’ll not give us
the degree?”
“Of course they will. Just means we weren’t there when the rest of the class shook hands
with Cherian and parents applauded.”
I wondered if it made sense to brush my teeth or eat at Sasi’s first.
“Sasi’s?” Ryan read my mind.
Man, four years of freaking craziness to get a degree, and when the time came to collect,
Ryan and I sat in our pajamas circling our paranthas with dabs of butter. I really don’t
deserve this degree!
“Hari, you know Dad said he wants to invest in the lubricant project. He is in touch with
Prof Veera,” Ryan said as Sasi looked at us slyly. Even he knew we should have been at the
convocation.
“That is great.”
“It’s crap. I told them I don’t want their money,” Ryan said.
“Are you an idiot?”
“And then guess what they said? They said they thought I would be okay because of that
letter,” Ryan said.
“What letter?” I said, struggling to keep a straight face.
“This letter,” Ryan said and took out a fat envelope, “and guess what I noticed on the
cover?”
Yep, there it was. The thirty bucks of postage that I put on it was stamped all over.
“So you wrote to them?” I said, still appearing as casual as I could.
“Okay Mr Hari, will you give it up. You made all the effort of typing the damn thing,
could you at least have been careful while writing the address? This scrawny handwriting
of yours is a dead giveaway,” Ryan said.
“What?” I said. Crap, I should have thought of that.
Ryan got up and mock punched me several times over. “You ass, when did you become so
senti?” he said as I wriggled my way out of his punches. We burst out laughing. I looked into
his eyes. He wasn’t mad, maybe even a bit glad. But that changed fast into a serious
expression. Yes, Ryan will never admit to wanting this.
“You shouldn’t have,” he said.
“Oh well, I must have been drunk that day. And I do think your parents are nice. Anyway,
it is a good project. Your dad will probably make money out of it.” The big picture, that’s
what I should focus on, not spoil things with paltry confidences on letter-writing.
“I am sure he will. Prof Veera accepted his funding.”
“Prof Veera knows what he is doing,” I said wisely. “When the hell will Alok come
back? Do you think we missed much?”
“All convos are the same. Cherian gives medals to nine pointers. Five-pointers collect
their degrees in the background like extras,” Ryan shrugged.
I saw a silhouette limping towards us from a distance.
“Alok!” I shouted.
“You fuckers! Chomping paranthas while the country got another batch of engineers,”
Alok said.
“Whatever Fatso, you want one or not?” Ryan said, making the rare gesture of offering his
plate.
“Of course I do. After all that Cherianspeak for an hour,” Alok said, putting out his tongue
to indicate extreme exhaustion.
“Where are the parents?” Ryan said.
“Invited to the faculty club for lunch. I came back looking for you,” Alok said.
“Did Cherian talk a lot? You know I was dreaming of him,” I said.
“Really? And I thought you only dreamt of his daughter wearing nothing,” Ryan teased.
“Shut up.” I turned to Alok. “So what did he say?”
“Nothing. Just the same IITians-are-the-best crap. Though he did mention one thing,”
Alok said.
“What?” Ryan and I cried in unison.
“That we need to look at the system. Sometimes the pressure is too much. Something
about lesser tests and more projects etc. Didn’t really follow it – I was dozing off a bit you
know,” Alok said “You suck man,” Ryan said, subsiding back into his seat.
“Yeah right. At least I made it on my last day of IIT,” Alok said virtuously.
Last day, Alok’s words resonated in my mind. Man, how we had waited for this to get
over. And finally it had. Maybe not in style, maybe not with standing ovations or medals, but
in our pajamas and eating paranthas at a street-side vendor, we had made it. Yes, the three
of us were IIT graduates. Not the ones that would make it to the cover of Time magazine,
but at least we could be called survivors. “Yes, it was over!” I tried telling myself – but at
one level, it felt sad.
“It really is over then, eh?” Ryan echoed my thoughts.
“Yes it is. Time to enter the real world – as they said at the convo,” Alok said, showing
off.
I wish I had never met Neha. Separating from her would hurt.
“Have you talked to Neha?” Ryan asked, uncannily reading my mind.
“I will. We are meeting tonight,” I said casually.
“Does Cherian know?” Alok said
“I don’t think so,” I said. He may have relented here and there, but me and Neha together
was still a no-no.
“And what about us?” Ryan said.
We looked at each other. Hell, this was going to be hard. Why is it that when the bad
things about IIT come to an end, the good things end as well. It sucks to leave the hostel, to
not be able to see your friends every day.
“We’ll be friends. For fucking forever and ever,” I vowed filmily and got up to give a
group hug.
“Enough guys, this is a decent establishment,” Ryan said and we sat back, laughing an
embarrassed laugh.
That was the last time we were together at IIT. After that, our lives changed. But I don’t
really want to get into all that. This is an IIT book after all.
And I didn’t know what would happen between Neha and me. I mean I could tell you now
what happened, but I don’t really want to go into all that either.
Yes, that night we met and said we loved each other and other sappy stuff. And we talked
about practical things like how to stay in touch And we promised to keep meeting forever
and ever.
But forever is a long time you know, even longer than the four years at IIT. A lot can
happen between now and forever, and it will – it is just not something we have to talk about
in this book. The convocation was over. Our bags were packed, and that was the last time
the three of us were together in IIT.
Alok started his job in Delhi, and with no Ryan and me to bother him, totally immersed
himself in it. As a result, his software company sent him to the US for six months. The US
assignment earned him a dollar stipend that in one stroke wiped out his family woes. A
spanking new car arrived at the Guptas, and I was tempted to consider marrying his sister.
Alok’s father got a full-time nurse, and his mother is considering leaving her job to do
private tuitions. I think she needs to keep a job just to keep sane, but who listens to me?
Ryan worked with Prof Veera, and with all that cash from his dad, is investing in a
factory about two hours from Delhi. Local villagers from nearby have been hired for
construction, including some women. Sick bastard that he is, he often goes there to check
them out. I think he fancies someone called Roopkunwar more than the others – and I think
there is a disaster waiting to happen.
I went off to Bombay and, like most responsibilities in my life, hated it. I can’t live in
cramped cities, and I can’t stay away from Neha. In the first three months, half of my salary
went in rent for a pigeonhole in the Siberian end of town. The other half went mostly in
phone calls to Neha.
God, I missed her – her hair, her laugh, her eyes, her holding my hand and everything
else. Sure, I missed Ryan and Alok as well, but it was not the same. I pined for Neha.
She finished her fashion design course and had an offer to work for a local designer. I
think she is trying to find something here in Bombay. It should work out, given this city is so
fashion crazy.
Meanwhile, next month I am going to Delhi for Alok’s didi’s wedding. All of us will be
there – Alok, Ryan, Neha and me. And that is what is keeping me going for now. You know,
it is strange, I might have passed out of IIT, but in some ways, my soul is still there. Maybe
in the hostel corridors, or at Sasi’s, or at the insti roof…
I Love u Rachu
Dear Frnds pls spread this msg until its reach to my rachu
I thinks see knows my name

